
A + B + C = Success if, A = Hard Work, B = Hard Play, C = Keeping your mouth shut. -Albert Einstein
A Freudian slip is when you say one thing but mean your mother.
A Robin Red breast in a Cage / Puts all Heaven in a Rage. -William Blake, poet, engraver, and painter (1757-1827)
A bird in the hand is a certainty, but a bird in the bush may sing. -Bret Harte, author (1836-1902)
A bit beyond perception's reach / I sometimes believe I see / that life is two locked boxes / each containing the other's key. -Piet Hein, poet and scientist (1905-1996)
A bit of fragrance always clings to the hand that gives the rose. -Chinese proverb
A bit of perfume always clings to the hand that gives the rose. -Chinese proverb
A book is a garden carried in the pocket. -Chinese proverb
A book is a story for the mind. A song is a story for the soul. -Eric Pio, poet
A book is a version of the world. If you do not like it, ignore it; or offer your own version in return. -Salman Rushdie, writer (1947- )
A book lying idle on a shelf is wasted ammunition. Like money, books must be kept in constant circulation. Lend and borrow to the maximum. -Henry Miller, novelist (1891-1980)
A book must be an axe for the frozen sea inside of us. -Franz Kafka, Austrian Writer (1883-1924)
A brother is a friend given by nature. -Gabriel Legouve, writer (1807-1903)
A calamity that affects everyone is only half a calamity. -Italian proverb
A child becomes an adult when he realises that he has a right not only to be right but also to be wrong. -Thomas Szasz
A child on the farm sees a plane fly overhead and dreams of a faraway place. A traveler on the plane sees the farmhouse and thinks of home. -Carl Burns
A clay pot sitting in the sun will always be a clay pot. It has to go through the white heat of the furnace to become porcelain. -Mildred Stouven
A closed mind is like a closed book: just a block of wood. -Chinese Proverb
A closed mouth gathers no foot.
A committee is a cul-de-sac down which ideas are lured and then quietly strangled. -Barnett Cocks
A critic is one who leaves no turn unstoned. -George Bernard Shaw
A cynic is not merely one who reads bitter lessons from the past, he is one who is prematurely disappointed in the future. -Sydney J. Harris
A decision is what people make when they can't find anyone to form a committee.
A designer knows he has achieved perfection not when there is nothing left to add, but when there is nothing left to take away. -Antoine de Saint-Exupery
A designer knows he has achieved perfection not when there is nothing left to add, but when there is nothing left to take away. -Antoine de Saint-Exupéry
A difference of taste in jokes is a great strain on the affections. -George Eliot (1819-1880)
A doctor saves lives--it's up to people to create lives that are worth saving. -Philip Gold, immunologist
A failure is a man who has blundered but is not able to cash in on the experience. -Elbert Hubbard (1856-1915)
A few observation and much reasoning lead to error; many observations and a little reasoning to truth. -Alexis Carrel 
A first-rate soup is more creative than a second-rate painting. -Abraham Maslow (1908-1970)
A fly that lands on a carabao feels itself to be higher than the carabao. -Filipino proverb
A foolish consistency is the hobgoblin of little minds, adored by little statesmen and philosophers and divines. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
A foolish consistency is the hobgoblin of little minds. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
A free society is a place where it's safe to be unpopular. -Adlai Stevenson, statesman (1900-1965)
A friend is a gift you give yourself. -Robert Louis Stevenson (1850-1894)
A friend is a person with whom I may be sincere. Before him I may think aloud. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
A friend may well be reckoned the masterpiece of nature. -Ralph Waldo Emerson (1803-1882)
A full cup must be carried steadily. -English proverb
A good cook is like a sorceress who dispenses happiness. -Elsa Schiaparelli, fashion designer (1890-1973)
A good heart is better than all the heads in the world. -Edward Bulwer-Lytton, writer (1803-1873)
A good laugh and a long sleep are the best cures in the doctor's book. -Irish proverb
A grass-blade's no easier to make than an oak. -James Russell Lowell, poet, editor, and diplomat (1819-1891)
A great deal of intelligence can be invested in ignorance when the need for illusion is deep. -Saul Bellow, Nobel 1976 (1915-)
A great deal of intelligence can be invested in ignorance when the need for illusion is deep. -Saul Bellow.
A great many people mistake opinions for thoughts. -Herbert V. Prochnow
A great pleasure in life is doing what people say you cannot do. -Walter Bagehot
A great secret of success is to go through life as a man who never gets used up. -Albert Schweitzer
A great war leaves the country with three armies - an army of cripples, an army of mourners, and an army of thieves. -German proverb
A guidance counselor who has made a fetish of security, or who has unwittingly surrendered his thinking to economic determinism, may steer a youth away from his dream of becoming a poet, an artist, a musician or any other of thousands of things, because it offers no security, it does not pay well, there are no vacancies, it has no "future". -Henry M Wriston, 11th president of Brown University (1889-1978)
A handful of sand is an anthology of the universe. -David McCord, poet (1897-1997)
A hero is no braver than an ordinary man, but he is brave five minutes longer. -Ralph Waldo Emerson (1803-1882)
A hero is no braver than an ordinary man, but he is braver five minutes longer. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
A hero is no braver than an ordinary man, but he is braver five minutes longer. -Ralph Waldo Emerson (1803-1882)
A house is no home unless it contains food and fire for the mind as well as the body. -Sarah Margaret Fuller, author (1810-1850)
A language is never in a state of fixation, but is always changing; we are not looking at a lantern-slide but at a moving picture. -Andrew Lloyd James, linguist
A leader who keeps his ear to the ground allows his rear end to become a target. -Angie Papadakis
A lie in time saves nine.
A life spent making mistakes is not only more honorable but more useful than a life spent doing nothing. -George Bernard Shaw
A living language is like a man suffering incessantly from small haemorrhages, and what it needs above all else is constant transactions of new blood from other tongues. The day the gates go up, that day it begins to die. -H.L. Mencken, writer, editor, and critic (1880-1956) [The American Language]
A lot of people mistake a short memory for a clear conscience. -Doug Larson 
A low voter turnout is an indication of fewer people going to the polls. -US Vice President J. Danforth Quayle
A man builds a fine house; and now he has a master, and a task for life; he is to furnish, watch, show it, and keep it in repair, the rest of his days. -Ralph Waldo Emerson (1803-1882) [Society and Solitude, 1870]
A man cannot be comfortable without his own approval. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
A man does not have to be an angel in order to be saint. -Albert Schweitzer (1875-1965)
A man does not show his greatness by being at one extremity, but rather by touching both at once. -Blaise Pascal, philosopher and mathematician (1623-1662)
A man has made at least a start on discovering the meaning of human life when he plants shade trees under which he knows full well he will never sit. -D. Elton Trueblood
A man has to live with himself, and he should see to it that he always has good company. -Charles Evans Hughes, jurist (1862-1948)
A man is a critic when he cannot be an artist, in the same way that a man becomes an informer when he cannot be a soldier. -Gustave Flaubert
A man is not idle because he is absorbed in thought. There is a visible labor and there is an invisible labor. -Victor Hugo (1802-1885)
A man is not old until his regrets take the place of dreams. -Yiddish proverb
A man is rich in proportion to the things he can afford to let alone. -Henry David Thoreau
A man is truly ethical only when he obeys the compulsion to help all life which he is able to assist, and shrinks from injuring anything that lives. -Albert Schweitzer [The Philosophy of Civilization]
A man may be very industrious, and yet not spend his time well. There is no more fatal blunderer than he who consumes the greater part of life getting his living. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
A man of Seville is shaved by the Barber of Seville if and only if the man does not shave himself. Does the barber shave himself? -Bertrand Russell
A man should hear a little music, read a little poetry, and see a fine picture every day of his life, in order that worldly cares may not obliterate the sense of the beautiful which God has implanted in the human soul. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, German writer and scientist (1749-1832)
A man should never be ashamed to own he has been in the wrong, which is but saying, in other words, that he is wiser today than he was yesterday. -Alexander Pope, poet (1688-1744)
A man there was, tho' some did count him mad / The more he cast away, the more he had. -John Bunyan, preacher (1628-1688) [Pilgrim's Progress]
A man too busy to take care of his health is like a mechanic too busy to take care of his tools. -Spanish proverb
A man who dares to waste one hour of time has not discovered the value of life. -Charles Robert Darwin, naturalist (1809-82),
A man who gives his children habits of industry provides for them better than by giving them fortune. -Richard Whately
A man who has never gone to school may steal from a freight car; but if he has a university education, he may steal the whole railroad. -Theodore Roosevelt, Twenty-sixth US president (1858-1919)
A man who is 'of sound mind' is one who keeps the inner madman under lock and key. -Paul Valery
A man who works with his hands is a laborer; a man who works with his hands and his brain is a craftsman; but a man who works with his hands and his brain and his heart is an artist. -Louis Nizer, lawyer (1902-1994)
A man's conscience, like a warning line on the highway, tells him what he shouldn't do - but it does not keep him from doing it. -Frank A. Clark
A man's dreams are an index to his greatness. -Zadok Rabinwitz
A man's first care should be to avoid the reproaches of his own heart, his next to escape the censures of the world. -English Proverb
A man's life is interesting primarily when he has failed--I well know. For it is a sign that he has tried to surpass himself. -Georges Clemenceau, politician (1841-1929)
A man's manners are a mirror in which he shows his portrait. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
A man's style in any art should be like his dress--it should attract as little attention as possible. -Samuel Butler, writer (1835-1902)
A merely fallen enemy may rise again, but the reconciled one is truly vanquished. -Johann Christoph Friedrich von Schiller, German Writer (1759-1805)
A mind all logic is like a knife all blade. It makes the hand bleed that uses it. -Rabindranath Tagore, poet, philosopher, author, songwriter, painter, educator, composer, Nobel laureate (1861-1941)
A misery is not to be measured from the nature of the evil, but from the temper of the sufferer. -Joseph Addison, essayist and poet (1672-1719)
A morning-glory at my window satisfies me more than the metaphysics of books. -Walt Whitman, poet (1819-1892)
A multitude of laws in a country is like a great number of physicians, a sign of weakness and malady. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
A musician must make music, an artist must paint, a poet must write, if he is to be ultimately at peace with himself. What one can be, one must be. -Abraham Maslow
A nation, like a tree, does not thrive well till it is engrafted with a foreign stock. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
A new idea is delicate. It can be killed by a sneer or a yawn; it can be stabbed to death by a joke or worried to death by a frown on the right person's brow. -Charles Brower
A note of music gains significance from the silence on either side. -Anne Morrow Lindberg
A painting is never finished - it simply stops in interesting places. -Paul Gardner, painter
A patriot must always be ready to defend his country against its government.  -Edward Abbey, naturalist and author (1927-1989)
A pedestal is as much a prison as any small space. -Gloria Steinem, women's rights activist, editor (1934- )
A penny will hide the biggest star in the universe if you hold it close enough to your eye. -Samuel Grafton
A person determined never to be wrong won't likely accomplish much. -Ken Wisdom
A person is never happy except at the price of some ignorance. -Anatole France, novelist, essayist, Nobel laureate (1844-1924)
A person starts to live when he can live outside himself. -Albert Einstein
A person usually has two reasons for doing something: a good reason and the real reason. -Thomas Carlyle, historian and essayist (1795-1881)
A person without a sense of humor is like a wagon without springs--jolted by every pebble in the road. -Henry Ward Beecher, preacher and writer (1813-1887)
A pessimist is one who is seasick on the entire voyage of life.
A poem begins with a lump in the throat. -Robert Frost, poet (1874-1963)
A poem is never finished, only abandoned. -Paul Valery, poet and philosopher (1871-1945)
A professional is a person who can do his best at a time when he doesn't particularly feel like it. -Alistair Cooke
A professional is someone who can do his best work when he doesn't feel like it. -Alistair Cooke
A proverb is a short sentence based on long experience. -Miguel de Cervantes, novelist (1547-1616)
A purple cow is a confirming instance of the hypothesis that all crows are black. -Hempel's Paradox
A raindrop, dripping from a cloud, / Was ashamed when it saw the sea. / `Who am I where there is a sea?' it said. / When it saw itself with the eye of humility, / A shell nurtured it in its embrace. -Saadi of Shiraz (c. 1200 AD)
A real patriot is the fellow who gets a parking ticket and rejoices that the system works. -Bill Vaughan, journalist (1915-1977)
A rock pile ceases to be a rock pile the moment a single man contemplates it, bearing within him the image of a cathedral. -Antoine de Saint-Exupery, author and aviator (1900-1945)
A room without books is like a body without a soul. -Marcus Tullius Cicero, statesman, orator, writer (106-43 BCE)
A scholar knows no boredom. -Jean Paul Richter, writer (1763-1825)
A sense of duty is useful in work but offensive in personal relations. -Bertrand Russell, philosopher, mathematician, and author (1872-1970)
A ship ought not to be held by one anchor, nor life by a single hope. -Epictetus, philosopher (c. 60-120)
A shy failure is nobler than an immodest success. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
A single rose can be my garden... a single friend, my world. -Leo Buscaglia, author, speaker and professor (1924-1998)
A small mind is obstinate. A great mind can lead and be led. -Alexander Cannon
A smile is a powerful weapon - you can even break ice with it.
A smile is a whisper of a laugh. -A child's definition
A smile is an inexpensive way to improve your looks.
A smile is the sensation of feeling good all over and showing it in one spot.
A smooth sea never made a skillful sailor.
A society grows great when old men plant trees whose shade they know they shall never sit in. -Greek proverb
A strange form of self-indulgence! There are times when I would be wronged and cheated, that I may laugh at the expense of those who think I do not know I am being wronged and cheated. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
A successful man is one who makes more money than a wife can spend. A successful woman is one who can find such a man. -Lana Turner, actress (1921-1995)
A sweater is a garment worn by a child when his mother feels chilly.
A teacher affects eternity; he can never tell where his influence stops. -Henry Adams, historian and teacher (1838-1918)
A theory is better than its explanation.
A thick head can do as much damage as a hard heart. -H.W. Dodds
A thing long expected takes the form of the unexpected when at last it comes. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
A time will come when a politician who has wilfully made war and promoted international dissension will be as sure of the dock and much surer of the noose than a private homicide. It is not reasonable that those who gamble with men's lives should not stake their own. -H.G. Wells, writer [The Salvaging of Civilization] (1866-1946)
A torn jacket is soon mended; but hard words bruise the heart of a child. -Henry Wadsworth Longfellow (1807-1882)
A true measure of your worth includes all the benefits others have gained from your successes. -Cullen Hightower, salesman and writer (1923- )
A truly great book should be read in youth, again in maturity and once more in old age, as a fine building should be seen by morning light, at noon and by moonlight. -Robertson Davies, writer (1913-1995)
A turtle makes progress when it sticks its neck out.
A visitor from Mars could easily pick out the civilized nations. They have the best implements of war. -Herbert V. Prochnow, banker (1897-1998)
A wise man should have money in his head, but not in his heart. -Jonathan Swift
A woman's head is always influenced by heart; but a man's heart by his head. -Lady Marguerite Blessington (1789-1849)
A word is not a crystal, transparent and unchanging; it is the skin of living thought and changes from day to day as does the air around us. -Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr.
A writer is somebody for whom writing is more difficult than it is for other people. -Thomas Mann, novelist, Nobel laureate (1875-1955)
A youth is to be regarded with respect. How do you know that his future will not be equal to our present? -Confucius, philosopher and teacher (551-479? BCE) [Analects]
ADMIRATION - Our polite recognition of another's resemblance to ourselves. -Ambrose Bierce [Devil's Dictionary] 
About the only worthwhile thing you can learn from a bore is how truly golden silence can be. -O. A. Battista
Absence diminishes commonplace passions and increases great ones, as the wind extinguishes candles and kindles fire. -La Rochefoucauld
Absolute faith corrupts as absolutely as absolute power. -Eric Hoffer, philosopher and author (1902-1983)
Absolute freedom mocks at justice. Absolute justice denies freedom. -Albert Camus, writer philosopher, Nobel laureate (1913-1960)
Absurdity, n. a statement or belief manifestly inconsistent with one's own opinion. -Ambrose Bierce, The Devil's Dictionary (1906)
Access to power must be confined to those who are not in love with it. -Plato
Accustom to the veneer of noise, to the shibboleths of promotion, public relations, and market research, society is suspicious of those who value silence. -John Lahr
Accustomed to the veneer of noise, to the shibboleths of promotion, public relations, and market research, society is suspicious of those who value silence. -John Lahr
Action and faith enslave thought, both of them in order not to be troubled or inconvenienced by reflection, criticism and doubt. -Henri Frederic Amiel philosopher and writer (1821-1881)
Action is eloquence. -William Shakespeare
Adding manpower to a late software project makes it later. -Frederick P. Brooks, Jr. [The Mythical Man-Month]
Adolescence is a period of rapid changes. Between the ages of 12 and 17, for example, a parent ages 20 years. -Changing Times
Adopt the pace of nature: her secret is patience. -Ralph Waldo Emerson (1803-1882)
Adults are obsolete children. -Dr. Seuss, humorist, illustrator, and author (1904-1991)
Advertising may be described as the science of arresting human intelligence long enough to get money from it. -Stephen Leacock
Advice is like snow; the softer it falls, the longer it dwells upon, and the deeper it sinks into the mind. -Samuel Taylor Coleridge, poet and philosopher (1772-1834)
After I'm dead I'd rather have people ask why I have no monument than why I have one. -Cato the Elder, statesman, soldier, and writer (234-149 BCE)
After the game, the king and pawn go into the same box. -Italian Proverb
After two years in Washington, I often long for the realism and sincerity of Hollywood. -Fred Thompson, US senator, lawyer, writer, and actor (1942- )
Ah, but a man's reach should exceed his grasp, / Or what's a heaven for. -Robert Browning
All a man can betray is his conscience. -Joseph Conrad (1857-1924)
All are lunatics, but he who can analyze his delusion is called a philosopher. -Ambrose Bierce, writer (1842-1914)
All art, all education, can be merely a supplement to nature. -Aristotle (B.C. 384-322) 
All change is not growth, as all movement is not forward. -Ellen Glasgow, novelist (1874-1945)
All envy would be extinguished, if it were universally known that there are none to be envied. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
All great masters are chiefly distinguished by the power of adding a second, a third, and perhaps a fourth step in a continuous line. Many a man had taken the first step.  With every additional step you enhance immensely the value of your first. -Ralph Waldo Emerson (1803-1882)
All human beings should try to learn before they die what they are running from, and to, and why. -James Thurber, writer and cartoonist (1894-1961)
All humanity is divided into three classes: those who are immovable, those who are movable, and those who move! -Benjamin Franklin
All know that the drop merges into the ocean but few know that the ocean merges into the drop. -Kabir, reformer, poet (late 15th century)
All labor that uplifts humanity has dignity and importance and should be undertaken with painstaking excellence. -Martin Luther King, Jr.
All labor that uplifts humanity has dignity and importance and should be undertaken with painstaking excellence. -Martin Luther King, Jr. (1929-1968)
All my life I wanted to be someone; I guess I should have been more specific. -Jane Wagner
All our words are but crumbs that fall down from the feast of the mind. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
All political parties die at last of swallowing their own lies. -John Arbuthnot, writer and physician (1667-1735)
All progress is based upon a universal innate desire of every organism to live beyond its means. -Samuel Butler
All rights left. All lefts reserved. All reserves removed. All removes right.
All speech, written or spoken, is a dead language, until it finds a willing and prepared hearer. -Robert Louis Stevenson [Reflections and Remarks on Human Life](1850-1894)
All sunshine makes a desert. -Arabic proverb
All that is necessary for the triumph of evil is that good men do nothing. -Edmund Burke
All that non-fiction can do is answer questions. It's fiction's business to ask them. -Richard Hughes
All that we send into the lives of others comes back into our own. -Edwin Markham
All the arguments to prove man's superiority cannot shatter this hard fact: in suffering the animals are our equals. -Peter Singer [Animal Liberation]
All the time a person is a child he is both a child and learning to be a parent. After he becomes a parent he becomes predominantly a parent reliving childhood. -Benjamin Spock, pediatrician and author (1903-1998)
All the world is full of suffering. It is also full of overcoming it. -Helen Keller
All the world's a stage and most of us are desperately unrehearsed. -Sean O'Casey, playwright (1880-1964)
All the world's a stage, / And the men and women merely players: / They have their exits and their entrances; / And one man in his time plays many parts. -William Shakespeare, poet and dramatist (1564-1616)
All things are possible, except skiing through a revolving door.
All wars are civil wars, because all men are brothers... Each one owes infinitely more to the human race than to the particular country in which he was born. -Francois Fenelon, theologian and writer (1651-1715)
All wood and no ply makes Jack a dull board.
All you need in this life is ignorance and confidence, and then success is sure. -Mark Twain (1835-1910)
All you need in this life is ignorance and confidence, and then success is sure. -Mark Twain, U.S. Author (1835-1910)
All zoos actually offer the public, in return for the taxes spent upon them, is a form of idle witless amusement, compared to which a visit to the state penitentiary, or even a state legislature in session, is informing, stimulating and ennobling. -H.L. Mencken, writer, editor, and critic (1880-1956)
Along this tree / From root to crown / Ideas flow up / And vetoes down. -A senior executive, quoted by Peter Drucker
Although gold dust is precious, when it gets in your eyes, it obstructs your vision. -Hsi-Tang
Always aim at complete harmony of thought and word and deed. Always aim at purifying your thoughts and everything will be well. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
Always bear in mind that your own resolution to success is more important than any other one thing. -Abraham Lincoln
Always do right. This will gratify some people and astonish the rest.
Always hold your head up, but be careful to keep your nose at a friendly level. -Max L. Forman
Always remember that you are unique. Just like everyone else.
Always, Sir, set a high value on spontaneous kindness. He whose inclination prompts him to cultivate your friendship of his own accord, will love you more than one whom you have been at pains to attach to you. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
Am I not destroying my enemies when I make friends of them? -Abraham Lincoln, 16th US president (1809-1865)
America will never be destroyed from the outside. If we falter, and lose our freedoms, it will be because we destroyed ourselves. -Abraham Lincoln, 16th U.S. President (1809-1865)
Among my most prized possessions are the words that I have never spoken. -Orson Rega Card
An act of goodness is of itself an act of happiness. No reward coming after the event can compare with the sweet reward that went with it. -Maurice Maeterlinck, Belgian writer (1862-1949)
An appeaser is one who feeds a crocodile, hoping it will eat him last -Winston Churchill
An artist is not paid for his labor but for his vision. -James McNeill Whistler, painter (1834-1903)
An atheist is a person who has no invisible means of support.
An education isn't how much you have committed to memory, or even how much you know. It's being able to differentiate between what you know and what you don't. -Anatole France
An expert is a man who has made all the mistakes which can be made in a very narrow field. -Niels Bohr, physicist (1885-1962)
An expert is a person who avoids small error as he sweeps on to the grand fallacy. -Benjamin Stolberg
An eye for an eye will make the whole world blind. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (1869-1948)
An honest man can feel no pleasure in the exercise of power over his fellow citizens. -Thomas Jefferson, third US president, architect and author (1743-1826)
An honest man speaks the truth, though it may give offence; a vain man, in order that it may. -William Hazlitt (1778-1830) [Characteristics]
An idea is not responsible for the people who believe in it.
An idea is salvation by imagination. -Frank Lloyd Wright
An inconvenience is only an adventure wrongly considered; an adventure is only an inconvenience rightly considered. -G.K. Chesterton 
An invasion of armies can be resisted, but not an idea whose time has come. -Victor Hugo (1802-1885)
An object in possession seldom retains the same charm that it had in pursuit. -Gaius Plinius (c. 61-112 A.D.)
An old miser kept a tame jackdaw, that used to steal pieces of money, and hide them in a hole, which a cat observing, asked, "Why he would hoard up those round shining things that he could make no use of?" "Why," said the jackdaw, "my master has a whole chestfull, and makes no more use of them that I do." -Jonathan Swift, satirist (1667-1745)
An optimist is a person who sees a green light everywhere, while a pessimist sees only the red stoplight... The truly wise person is color-blind. -Albert Schweitzer, philosopher, physician, musician, Nobel laureate (1875-1965)
An oral contract isn't worth the paper it's written on.
An ounce of mother is worth a pound of clergy. -Spanish proverb
And in the end, it's not the years in your life that count. It's the life in your years. -Abraham Lincoln
And the day came when the risk it took to remain tight inside the bud was more painful than the risk it took to blossom. -Anais Nin, writer (1903-1977)
And the fox said to the little prince: men have forgotten this truth, but you must not forget it. You become responsible, forever, for what you have tamed. -Antoine de Saint-Exupery [The Little Prince]
Anger as soon as fed is dead- / 'Tis starving makes it fat. -Emily Dickinson, poet (1830-1886) 
Anger, if not restrained, is frequently more hurtful to us than the injury that provokes it. -Seneca (BCE 3-65 A.D.) 
Any fine morning, a power saw can fell a tree that took a thousand years to grow. -Edwin Way Teale, naturalist and author (1899-1980)
Any fool can make a rule, and every fool will mind it. -Cousin Woodman
Any life, no matter how long and complex it may be, is made up of a single moment - the moment in which a man finds out, once and for all, who he is. -Jorge Luis Borges, Argentinean writer (1899-1986)
Any mother could perform the jobs of several air-traffic controllers with ease. -Lisa Alther
Any sufficiently advanced technology is indistinguishable from magic. -Arthur C Clarke, science fiction writer (1917- )
Anyone can do any amount of work provided it isn't the work he is supposed to be doing at the moment. -Robert Benchley, humorist, drama critic, and actor (1889-1945)
Anyone can do any amount of work, provided it isn't the work he is supposed to be doing at that moment. -Robert Benchley
Anyone can look for fashion in a boutique or history in a museum. The creative explorer looks for history in a hardware store and fashion in an airport. -Robert S. Wieder, journalist
Apathy Error: Don't bother striking any key.
Appeal, v.t. In law, to put the dice into the box for another throw. -Ambrose Bierce, The Devil's Dictionary (1906) 
Applause is the spur of noble minds, the end and aim of weak ones. -Charles Caleb Colton, author and clergyman (1780-1832)
Appreciation is a wonderful thing; it makes what is excellent in others belong to us as well. -Voltaire, philosopher, historian, satirist, dramatist, and essayist (1694-1778) 
Are they taking DDT? -US Vice President Dan Quayle asking doctors at a Manhattan AIDS clinic about their treatments of choice
Are you a politician asking what your country can do for you or a Zealous one asking what you can do for your country. -Kahlil Gibran, 1883-1931 [The New Frontier]
Are you a politician asking what your country can do for you or a Zealous one asking what you can do for your country. -Kahlil Gibran, 1883-1931 [from The New Frontier, an article by Gibran]
Arithmetic is being able to count up to twenty without taking off your shoes. -Mickey Mouse
Art is a house that tries to be haunted. -Emily Dickinson, poet (1830-1886)
As I would not be a slave, so I would not be a master. This expresses my idea of democracy. -Abraham Lincoln, 16th U.S. President (1809-1865)
As a well spent day brings happy sleep, so life well used brings happy death. -Leonardo da Vinci (1452-1519)
As against having beautiful workshops, studios, etc., one writes best in a cellar on a rainy day. -Van Wyck Brooks, writer, critic (1886-1963)
As an adolescent I aspired to lasting fame, I craved factual certainty, and I thirsted for a meaningful vision of human life - so I became a scientist.  This is like becoming an archbishop so you can meet girls. -Matt Cartmill, anthropology professor and author (1943- )
As freely as the firmament embraces the world, / or the sun pours forth impartially his beams, / so mercy must encircle both friend and foe. -Johann Christoph Friedrich von Schiller, poet and dramatist (1759-1805)
As great scientists have said and as all children know, it is above all by the imagination that we achieve perception, and compassion, and hope. -Ursula LeGuin
As long as a man stands in his own way, everything seems to be in his way. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
As nightfall does not come at once, neither does oppression. In both instances there is a twilight when everything remains seemingly unchanged. And it is in such twilight that we all must be most aware of change in the air - however slight - lest we become unwitting victims of the darkness. -William O. Douglas, judge (1898-1980)
As no roads are so rough as those that have just been mended, so no sinners are so intolerant as those that have just turned saints. -Charles Caleb Colton, author and clergyman (1780-1832)
As often as Herman had witnessed the slaughter of animals and fish, he always had the same thought: in their behaviour toward creatures, all men were Nazis. -Isaac Bashevis Singer, writer, Nobel laureate, (1904-1991)
As regards intellectual work, it remains a fact, indeed, that great decisions in the realms of thought and momentous discoveries and solutions of problems are only possible to an individual working in solitude. -Sigmund Freud, neurologist, founder of psychoanalysis (1856-1939)
As scarce as truth is, the supply has always been in excess of the demand. -Josh Billings
As soon as man does not take his existence for granted, but beholds it as something unfathomably mysterious, thought begins. -Albert Schweitzer, philosopher, physician, musician, Nobelist (1875-1965)
As the eagle was killed by the arrow winged with his own feather, so the hand of the world is wounded by its own skill. -Helen Adams Keller (1880-1968)
As the traveler who has once been from home is wiser than he who has never left his own doorstep, so a knowledge of one other culture should sharpen our ability to scrutinize more steadily, to appreciate more lovingly, our own. -Margaret Mead, anthropologist (1901-1978)
As you grow older, you'll find the only things you regret are the things you didn't do. -Zachary Scott
Assassination: The extreme form of censorship. -George Bernard Shaw, writer, Nobel laureate (1856-1950)
Associate yourself with men of good quality if you esteem your own reputation; for 'tis better to be alone than in bad company. -George Washington (1732-1799)
Assumptions are the termites of relationships. -Henry Winkler, actor (1945- )
At a dinner party one should eat wisely but not too well, and talk well but not too wisely. -W. Somerset Maugham, novelist, dramatist, and short-story writer (1874-1965)
At bottom, every man knows perfectly well that he is a unique being, only once on this earth; and by no extraordinary chance will such a marvelously picturesque piece of diversity in unity as he is, ever be put together a second time. -Friedrich Nietzsche, philosopher (1844-1900)
At least half the mystery novels published violate the law that the solution, once revealed, must seem to be inevitable. -Raymond Chandler, writer (1888-1959)
Attitudes are contagious. Is yours worth catching?
Authority without wisdom is like a heavy axe without an edge, fitter to bruise than polish. -Anne Bradstreet, poet (1612-1672)
Authority without wisdom is like a heavy axe without an edge: fitter to bruise than polish. -Anne Bradstreet, poet (1612-1672)
Autumn is a second spring when every leaf is a flower. -Albert Camus, writer and philosopher (1913-1960)
Avarice, envy, pride, / Three fatal sparks, have set the hearts of all / On Fire. -Dante Alighieri (1265-1321) [The Divine Comedy]
Bachelors should be heavily taxed. It is not fair that some men should be happier than others. -Oscar Wilde
Be advised that all flatterers live at the expense of those who listen to them. -Jean de La Fontaine
Be aware that a halo has to fall only a few inches to be a noose. -Dan McKinnon
Be humble, for the worst thing in the world is of the same stuff as you; be confident, for the stars are of the same stuff as you. -Nicholai Velimirovic
Be humble, if thou would'st attain to wisdom. Be humbler still, when wisdom thou hast mastered. -Helena Petrovna Hahn Blavatsky, Russian-born theosophist (1831-1891)
Be master of your petty annoyances and conserve your energies for the big, worthwhile things. It isn't the mountain ahead that wears you out - it's the grain of sand in your shoe. -Robert Service, writer (1874-1958)
Be nice to people on your way up because you'll need them on your way down. -W. Migner
Be slow in choosing a friend, slower in changing. -Benjamin Franklin
Be the change you want to see in the world. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
Be the master of your will and the slave of your conscience. -Hasidic saying
Be thou the first true merit to befriend, his praise is lost who stays till all commend. -Alexander Pope, poet (1688-1744)
Be very circumspect in the choice of thy company. In the society of thine equals thou shalt enjoy more pleasure; in the society of thine superiors thou shalt find more profit. To be the best in the company is the way to grow worse; the best means to grow better is to be the worst there. -Francis Quarles (1592-1644)
Be yourself and do not feign affection. Neither be cynical about love; in the face of all aridity and disenchantment it is as perennial as the grass. -Max Ehrmann, writer and lawyer (1872-1945)
Beautiful young people are accidents of nature, but beautiful old people are works of art. -Eleanor Roosevelt, diplomat and writer (1884-1962)
Beauty is the purgation of superfluities. -Michelangelo Buonarroti, sculptor, painter, architect, and poet (1475-1564)
Because I have loved life, I shall have no sorrow to die. -Amelia Burr
Because no battle is ever won he said. They are not even fought. The field only reveals to man his own folly and despair, and victory is an illusion of philosophers and fools. -William Faulkner, novelist (1897-1962) [The Sound and the Fury, 1929]
Because the heart beats under a covering of hair, of fur, feathers, or wings, is it, for that reason, to be of no account? -Jean Paul Richter, German Writer (1763-1825)
Because the heart beats under a covering of hair, of fur, feathers, or wings, it is, for that reason, to be of no account? -Jean Paul Richter, German Writer (1763-1825)
Bed is the poor man's opera. -Italian proverb
Before we set our hearts too much on anything, let us examine how happy are those who already possess it. -La Rochefoucauld
Behaviorism is the art of pulling habits out of rats. -O'Neill
Being defeated is often a temporary condition. Giving up is what makes it permanent. -Marilyn vos Savant
Being rich is having money; being wealthy is having time. -Stephen Swid, executive
Belief like any other moving body follows the path of least resistance. -Samuel Butler, writer (1835-1902)
Best they honor thee Who honor in thee only what is best. -William Watson, poet (1858-1935)
Better is the enemy of good. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
Better keep yourself clean and bright; you are the window through which you must see the world. -George Bernard Shaw, writer, Nobel laureate (1856-1950)
Better than a thousand days of diligent study is one day with a great teacher. -Japanese proverb
Better to remain silent and be thought a fool, than to speak and remove all doubt. -Abraham Lincoln
Better to write for yourself and have no public, than to write for the public and have no self. -Cyril Connolly, critic and editor (1903-1974)
Beware of all enterprises that require new clothes. -Henry David Thoreau
Beware of bugs in the above code; I have only proved it correct, not tried it. -Donald Knuth, computer scientist (1938- )
Beware of small expenses; a small leak will sink a great ship. -Benjamin Franklin
Beware the fury of the patient man. -John Dryden, poet and dramatist (1631-1700)
Big jobs usually go to the men who prove their ability to outgrow small ones. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
Black holes are where God divided by zero. -Steven Wright, comedian (1955- )
Blessed is he who has found his work; let him ask no other blessedness. -Thomas Carlyle, essayist and historian (1795-1881)
Blessed is he who has learned to laugh at himself, for he shall never cease to be entertained. -John Powell
Blessed is the man who, having nothing to say, abstains from giving in words evidence of the fact. -George Eliot
Books are good enough in their own way, but they are a mighty bloodless substitute for life. -Robert Louis Stevenson, novelist, essayist, and poet (1850-1894)
Books are like imprisoned souls till someone takes them down from a shelf and frees them. -Samuel Butler, writer (1835-1902)
Books are the bees which carry the quickening pollen from one to another mind. -James Russell Lowell (1819-1891) [Nationality in Literature]
Books are the compasses and telescopes and sextants and charts which other men have prepared to help us navigate the dangerous seas of human life. -Jesse Lee Bennett
Books are the quietest and most constant of friends; they are the most accessible and wisest of counsellors, and the most patient of teachers. -Charles W. Eliot, educator (1834-1926)
Books had instant replay long before televised sports. -Bern Williams
Boredom is a vital problem for the moralist, since at least half of the sins of mankind are caused by the fear of it. -Bertrand Russell
Boredom is the feeling that everything is a waste of time; serenity, that nothing is. -Thomas Szasz
Brain: an apparatus with which we think we think. -Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914) [The Devil's Dictionary]
Brasington's Ninth Law: A carelessly planned project takes three times longer to complete than expected; a carefully planned one will take only twice as long.
Budget: A method for going broke methodically.
Businesses may come and go, but religion will last forever, for in no other endeavor does the consumer blame himself for product failure.
But man, proud man, / Dressed in a little brief authority,  ... Plays such fantastic tricks before high heaven / As make the angels weep. -William Shakespeare, poet and dramatist (1564-1616)
But man, proud man, / Drest in a little brief authority, / Most ignorant of what he's most assured, / His glassy essence, like an angry ape, / Plays such fantastic tricks before high heaven / As make the angels weep. -William Shakespeare, playwright and poet (1564-1616)
But the fruit that can fall without shaking, / Indeed is too mellow for me. -Lady Mary Wortley Montagu
But they are useless. They can only give you answers. -Picasso, on computers.
Buying books would be a good thing if one could also buy the time to read them in: but as a rule the purchase of books is mistaken for the appropriation of their contents. -Arthur Schopenhauer, philosopher (1788-1860)
By all means marry. If you get a good wife, you'll be happy. If you get a bad one, you'll become a philosopher. -Socrates
By plucking her petals, you do not gather the beauty of the flower. -Rabindranath Tagore
By the time a man realizes that maybe his father was right, he usually has a son who thinks he's wrong. -Charles Wadsworth
By three methods we may learn wisdom: First, by reflection, which is noblest; second, by imitation, which is easiest; and third, by experience, which is the bitterest. -Confucius, philosopher and teacher (c. 551-478 BCE)
By trying to make things easier for their children parents can make things much harder for them. -Mardy Grothe, psychologist and author (1942- )
Calamity, n. A more than commonly plain and unmistakable reminder that the affairs of this life are not of our own ordering. Calamities are of two kinds: misfortune to ourselves, and good fortune to others. -Ambrose Bierce, writer (1842-1914), [The Devil's Dictionary, 1906]
Certainly virtue is like precious odours, most fragrant when they are incensed, or crushed: for prosperity doth best discover vice, but adversity doth best discover virtue. -Francis Bacon, essayist, philosopher, and statesman (1561-1626)
Chance is perhaps the pseudonym of God when he does not wish to sign his work. -Anatole France, novelist, essayist, Nobel laureate (1844-1924)
Change your thoughts and you change your world. -Norman Vincent Peale
Character cannot be developed in ease and quiet. Only through experience of trial and suffering can the soul be strengthened, ambition inspired, and success achieved. -Helen Adams Keller (1880-1968)
Charity is injurious unless it helps the recipient to become independent of it. -John D. Rockefeller
Charity sees the need not the cause. -German proverb
Charm is a way of getting a "yes" without having asked any clear question.
Children aren't happy without something to ignore, And that's what parents were created for. -Ogden Nash (1902-1971)
Children enter school as question marks and leave as periods. -Neil Postman, professor and author (1931- )
Children have never been very good at listening to their elders, but they have never failed to imitate them. -James Baldwin
Children need love, especially when they do not deserve it. -Harold S. Hulbert
Choose the life that is most useful, and habit will make it the most agreeable. -Francis Bacon, essayist, philosopher, and statesman (1561-1626)
Clay is moulded to make a vessel, but the utility of the vessel lies in the space where there is nothing. Thus, taking advantage of what is, we recognize the utility of what is not. -Lao Tzu, philosopher (circa 600 BCE)
Cleanliness is next to clean-limbed, in the dictionary.
Climb mountains to see lowlands. -Chinese Proverb
Coincidences are spiritual puns. -G.K. Chesterton, essayist and novelist (1874-1936)
Committee: The unwilling, selected from the unfit, to do the unnecessary.
Compassion is the basis of morality. -Arthur Schopenhauer, philosopher (1788-1860) 
Compassion will cure more sins than condemnation. -Henry Ward Beecher, preacher and writer (1813-1887) 
Compassion, in which all ethics must take root, can only attain its full breadth and depth if it embraces all living creatures and does not limit itself to mankind. -Albert Schweitzer, philosopher, physician, musician, Nobel laureate (1875-1965)
Complete possession is proved only by giving. All you are unable to give possesses you. -Andre Gide
Computer Science is no more about computers than astronomy is about telescopes. -Edsger W. Dijkstra, computer science professor
Computers are not intelligent. They just think they are.
Computers in the future may weigh no more than 1.5 tons. -Popular Mechanics, forecasting the relentless march of science, 1949
Conceal a flaw, and the world will imagine the worst. -Martial (Marcus Valerius Martialis)
Confidence is the feeling you have before you understand the situation.
Confucius say too much. -Recent Chinese proverb
Confusion is a word we have invented for an order which is not understood. -Henry Miller
Congratulation: The civility of envy. -Ambrose Bierce [Devil's Dictionary]
Conscience is the inner voice warning us that someone may be looking. -H.L. Mencken
Conscience is thoroughly well-bred and soon leaves off talking to those who do not wish to hear it. -Samuel Butler, writer (1835-1902)
Conscience is what hurts when everything else feels good.
Consider the postage stamp: its usefulness consists in the ability to stick to one thing till it gets there. -Josh Billings
Consistency requires you to be as ignorant today as you were a year ago. -Bernard Berenson
Constant kindness can accomplish much. As the sun makes ice melt, kindness causes misunderstanding, mistrust, and hostility to evaporate. -Albert Schweitzer, philosopher, physician, and musician (1875-1965)
Consultant: n. One who borrows your watch to tell you what time it is and then keeps the watch.
Contempt is the weapon of the weak and a defense against one's own despised and unwanted feelings. -Alice Miller
Content thyself to be obscurely good. When vice prevails, and impious men bear sway, the post of honor is a private station. -Joseph Addison, essayist and poet (1672-1719)
Contentment consisteth not in adding more fuel, but in taking away some fire. -Thomas Fuller (1608-1661)
Contentment is a pearl of great price, and whoever procures it at the expense of ten thousand desires makes a wise and a happy purchase. -John Balguy
Contentment is, after all, simply refined indolence. -Richard Haliburton
Continue to be yourself because in the end that's what people will remember about you.
Conversation enriches the understanding, but solitude is the school of genius.
Conversation would be vastly improved by the constant use of four simple words: I do not know. -Andr Maurois
Conversation, n. A fair to the display of the minor mental commodities, each exhibitor being too intent upon the arrangement of his own wares to observe those of his neighbor. -Ambrose Bierce, writer (1842-1914) [The Devil's Dictionary]
Corporation: An ingenious device for obtaining individual profit without individual responsibility. -Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914) [The Devil's Dictionary]
Courage is not the absence of fear, but rather the judgment that something else is more important than fear. -Ambrose Redmoon
Courage is not the towering oak that sees storms come and go; it is the fragile blossom that opens in the snow. -Alice M. Swaim
Courage is resistance to fear, mastery of fear - not absence of fear. -Mark Twain, U.S. Author (1835-1910)
Courage is the price that life exacts for granting peace. The soul that knows it not, knows no release from little things. -Amelia Earhart, aviator (1897-1937)
Courage without conscience is a wild beast. -Robert Green Ingersoll, lawyer and orator (1833-1899)
Courtship to marriage, as a very witty prologue to a very dull play. -William Congreve, dramatist (1670-1729)
Creativity is allowing yourself to make mistakes. Art is knowing which ones to keep. -Scott Adams, cartoonist (1957- )
Curiosity is a lust of the mind. -Thomas Hobbes
Custom will reconcile people to any atrocity. -George Bernard Shaw
D'you call life a bad job? Never! We've had our ups and downs, we've had our struggles, we've always been poor, but it's been worth it, ay, worth it a hundred times I say when I look round at my children. -W. Somerset Maugham, novelist, dramatist, short-story writer (1874-1965) [Of Human Bondage]
Dalton's records, carefully preserved for a century, were destroyed during the World War II bombing of Manchester. It is not only the living who are killed in war. -Isaac Asimov, scientist and writer (1920-1992)
Danger and delight grow on one stalk. -English Proverb
Daring ideas are like chessmen moved forward. They may be beaten, but they may start a winning game. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, poet, dramatist, novelist, and philosopher (1749-1832)
Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that. -Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.
Dear God, Did you mean for the giraffe to look like that or was it an accident? -Norma [Children's Letters to God, 1991]
Death has been proven to be 99 per cent fatal in laboratory rats.
Death is a friend of ours; and he that is not ready to entertain him is not at home. -Francis Bacon, essayist, philosopher, and statesman (1561-1626)
Death is not extinguishing the light; it is putting out the lamp because the dawn has come. -Rabindranath Tagore, poet, philosopher, author, songwriter, painter, educator, composer, Nobel laureate (1861-1941)
Democracy is where you can say what you think even if you don't think.
Depend on the rabbit's foot if you will, but remember it didn't work for the rabbit. -R.E. Shay
Despise not a small wound, a poor kinsman, or a humble enemy. -English Proverb
Despite the high cost of living, it remains popular.
Destiny: A tyrant's authority for crime and a fool's excuse for failure. -Ambrose Bierce
Devils can be driven out of the heart by the touch of hand on hand, or mouth on mouth. -Tennessee Williams
Dictionary: A malevolent literary device for cramping the growth of a language and making it hard and inelastic. This dictionary, however, is a most useful work. -Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914), [The Devil's Dictionary, 1906]
Did you know that the worldwide food shortage that threatens up to five hundred million children could be alleviated at the cost of only one day, only ONE day, of modern warfare. -Peter Ustinov, actor, writer and director (1921-2004)
Difficulties increase the nearer we approach our goal. -Goethe (1749-1832)
Difficulties strengthen the mind, as labor does the body. -Seneca
Dignity consists not in possessing honors, but in the consciousness that we deserve them. -Aristotle, philosopher (384-322 BCE)
Dilbert Principle: The most ineffective workers are systematically moved to the place where they can do the least damage: management. -Scott Adams
Diplomacy is the art of letting someone else get your way.
Distrust all in whom the impulse to punish is powerful. -Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche, philosopher (1844-1900)
Do not be too moral. You may cheat yourself out of much of life. So aim above morality. Be not simply good; be good for something. -Henry David Thoreau
Do not be too moral. You may cheat yourself out of much of life. So aim above morality. Be not simply good; be good for something. -Thoreau
Do not be too timid and squeamish about your actions. All life is an experience. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Do not believe that it is very much of an advance to do the unnecessary three times as fast. -Peter Drucker (1909-)
Do not condemn the judgment of another because it differs from your own. You may both be wrong. -Dandemis
Do not confine your children to your own learning, for they were born in another time. -Hebrew proverb
Do not go where the path may lead, go instead where there is no path and leave a trail. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Do not keep the slanderer away, / treat him with affection and honour: / Body and soul, he scours all clean, / babbling about this and that. -Kabir
Do not praise yourself / not slander others: / There are still many days to go / and any thing could happen. -Kabir
Do not praise yourself / not slander others: / There are still many days to go / and anything could happen. -Kabir
Do not pray for tasks equal to your powers; pray for powers equal to your tasks. -Phillips Brooks, bishop and orator (1835-1893)
Do you always want to be right, or do you want to be happy? -H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
Do you know what a pessimist is? A person who thinks everybody as nasty as himself, and hates them for it. -George Bernard Shaw
Do you know what a pessimist is? A person who thinks everybody is as nasty as himself, and hates them for it. -George Bernard Shaw
Do you love me because I'm beautiful, or am I beautiful because you love me? -Oscar Hammerstein II, lyricist (1895-1960)
Don't anthropomorphize computers. They don't like it.
Don't ask me who's influenced me. A lion is made up of the lambs he's digested, and I've been reading all my life. -Giorgos Seferis, writer, diplomat, Nobel laureate (1900-1971)
Don't be afraid to go out on a limb. That's where the fruit is. -H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
Don't be afraid to take a big step. You can't cross a chasm in two small jumps. -David Lloyd George
Don't confuse fame with success. Madonna is one; Helen Keller is the other. -Erma Bombeck, author (1927-1996)
Don't count the days, make the days count.
Don't discuss yourself, for you are bound to lose; if you belittle yourself, you are believed; if you praise yourself, you are disbelieved. -Michel de Montaigne, essayist (1533-1592)
Don't ever take a fence down until you know why it was put up. -Robert Frost
Don't forget until too late that the business of life is not business, but living. -Bertie Charles Forbes, magazine publisher (1880-1954)
Don't go through life, grow through life. -Eric Butterworth
Don't judge each day by the harvest you reap, but by the seeds you plant. -Robert Louis Stevenson (1850-1894)
Don't knock the weather; nine-tenths of the people couldn't start a conversation if it didn't change once in a while. -Kin Hubbard
Don't look forward to the day you stop suffering, because when it comes you'll know you're dead. -Tennessee Williams
Don't make an ideology out of your limitations. -Tom Bourbon
Don't mistake pleasure for happiness. They're a different breed of dog. -Josh Billings
Don't vote--it only encourages them!
Don't wait for the last judgment. It takes place every day. -Albert Camus
Don't walk in front of me, I may not follow. Don't walk behind me, I may not lead. Walk beside me and be my friend. -Albert Camus, writer and philosopher (1913-1960)
Don't you hate it when life doesn't follow the manuals?
Doubt comes in at the window when inquiry is denied at the door. -Benjamin Jowett (1817-1893) 
Doust thou love life? Then do not squander time, for that is the stuff life is made of. -Benjamin Franklin
Drama is life with the dull bits cut out. -Alfred Hitchcock, film-maker (1899-1980)
Dream as if you'll live forever. Live as if you'll die today. -James Dean
Dream lofty dreams, and as you dream, so shall you become. 
Dreams are renewable. No matter what our age or condition, there are still untapped possibilities within us and new beauty waiting to be born. -Dale E. Turner
Dreams have only one owner at a time. That's why dreamers are lonely. -Erma Bombeck, author (1927-1996)
Dreams pass into the reality of action. From the actions stems the dream again; and this interdependence produces the highest form of living. -Anais Nin, writer (1903-1977)
Dreams that do come true can be as unsettling as those that don't. -Brett Butler [Keep Deep in Paradise]
Drive-thru banking was invented so cars could meet their true owners. -Ron Picavet
Drop the question what tomorrow may bring, and count as profit every day that fate allows you. -Horace
During the first period of a man's life the greatest danger is not to take the risk. When once the risk has really been taken, then the greatest danger is to risk too much. -Soren Aaby Kierkegaard, Danish philosopher (1813-1855)
During times of universal deceit, telling the truth becomes a revolutionary act. -George Orwell, writer (1903-1950)
ELBONICS: Two people maneuvering for one armrest in a theater.
ELECELERATION: Pressing an elevator button a lot to speed it up.
ELECELLERATION: Pressing an elevator button a lot to speed it up.
Each friend represents a world in us, a world possibly not born until they arrive, and it is only by this meeting that a new world is born. -Anais Nin, writer (1903-1977)
Each has his past shut in him like the leaves of a book known to him by heart and his friends can only read the title. -Virginia Woolf, writer (1882-1941)
Each man carries within him the soul of a poet who died young. -Charles Augustin Sainte-Beuve, literary critic (1804-1869)
Each man takes care that his neighbor shall not cheat him. But a day comes when he begins to care that he does not cheat his neighbor. Then all goes well -- he has changed his market-cart into a chariot of the sun. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
Each of us has a spark of life inside us, and our highest endeavor ought to be to set off that spark in one another. -Kenny Ausubel
Each of us must make his own true way, and when we do, that way will express the universal way. -Suzuki Roshi
Each snowflake in an avalanche pleads not guilty. -Stanislaw J. Lec
Earth laughs in flowers. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
Earth was interesting, and worth the money I paid for it.
Easy reading is damned hard writing. -Nathaniel Hawthorne, writer (1804-1864)
Edible, adj.: Good to eat, and wholesome to digest, as a worm to a toad, a toad to a snake, a snake to a pig, a pig to a man, and a man to a worm. -Ambrose Bierce, writer (1842-1914)
Education ... has produced a vast population able to read but unable to distinguish what is worth reading. -G.M. Trevelyan
Education is a progressive discovery of our own ignorance. -Will Durant, historian (1885-1981)
Education is an admirable thing, but it is well to remember from time to time that nothing that is worth knowing can be taught.
Education is not filling a bucket but lighting a fire. -William Butler Yeats
Education is not the filling of a pail, but the lighting of a fire. -William Butler Yeats
Education is the ability to listen to almost anything without losing your temper or your self-confidence. -Robert Frost
Education is what survives when what has been learned has been forgotten. -B.F. Skinner
Education makes people easy to lead, but difficult to drive; easy to govern, but impossible to enslave. -Henry Peter Brougham
Education's purpose is to replace an empty mind with an open one. -Malcolm S. Forbes
Education: That which discloses to the wise and disguises from the foolish their lack of understanding. -Ambrose Bierce, writer (1842-1914)
Efficiency is intelligent laziness. -David Dunham
Egotism is the anesthetic that dulls the pain of stupidity. -Frank William Leahy, football coach (1908-1973)
Eighty percent of all people consider themselves to be above average drivers.
Either I'm dead or my watch has stopped. -last words of Groucho Marx
Either that wallpaper goes, or I do. -Last words of Oscar Wilde
Elbonics: Two people maneuvering for one armrest in a movie theater.
Eloquence is a painting of the thoughts. -Blaise Pascal, philosopher and mathematician (1623-1662)
Eloquence is a painting of the thoughts. -Pascal (1623-1662)
Errors like straws upon the surface flow: / Who would search for pearls must dive below. -John Dryden
Even God lends a hand to honest boldness.
Even a lie is a psychic fact. -Carl Jung, psychiatrist (1875-1961)
Even for our enemies in misery--there should be tears in our eyes. -Charan Singh, mystic (1916-1990)
Even in the worm that crawls in the earth there glows a divine spark. When you slaughter a creature, you slaughter God. -Isaac Bashevis Singer, Writer, Nobel laureate (1904-1991)
Even the boldest zebra fears the hungry lion.
Even the smallest candle burns brighter in the dark.
Every age is fed on illusions, lest men should renounce life early and the human race come to an end. -Joseph Conrad
Every child comes with the message that God is not yet tired of the man. -Rabindranath Tagore [1861-1941]
Every child comes with the message that God is not yet tired of the man. -Rabindranath Tagore, Indian Poet (1861-1941)
Every child is an artist. The problem is how to remain an artist once he grows up. -Pablo Picasso, painter and sculptor (1881-1973)
Every civilizing step in history has been ridiculed as 'sentimental', 'impractical', or 'womanish', etc., by those whose fun, profit or convenience was at stake. -Joan Gilbert (1931- )
Every creator painfully experiences the chasm between his inner vision and its ultimate expression. -Isaac Bashevis Singer, writer, Nobel laureate, (1904-1991)
Every creature is better alive than dead, men and moose and pine trees, and he who understands it aright will rather preserve its life than destroy it. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
Every dewdrop and raindrop had a whole heaven within it. -Henry Wadsworth Longfellow, poet (1807-1882)
Every great advance in natural knowledge has involved the absolute rejection of authority. -Thomas Huxley (1825-1895)
Every great movement must experience three stages: ridicule, discussion, adoption. -John Stuart Mill
Every gun that is made, every warship launched, every rocket fired signifies, in the final sense, a theft from those who hunger and are not fed, those who are cold and are not clothed. -Dwight D. Eisenhower, U.S. general and 34th president (1890-1969)
Every increased possession loads us with new weariness. -John Ruskin, author, art critic, and social reformer (1819-1900)
Every man has his follies - and often they are the most interesting thing he had got. -Josh Billings
Every man has his secret sorrows, which the world knows not; and oftentimes we call a man cold when he is only sad. -Henry Wadsworth Longfellow (1807-1882)
Every man has one thing he can do better than anyone else - and usually it's reading his own handwriting. -G. Norman Collie
Every man in the world is better than someone else. And not as good as someone else. -William Saroyan, writer (1908-1981)
Every man is a damned fool for at least five minutes every day. Wisdom consists in not exceeding the limit. -Elbert Hubbard, author, editor, printer (1856-1915)
Every man is a volume if you know how to read him. -William Ellery Channing, clergyman, reformer (1810-1884)
Every man is guilty of all the good he didn't do. -Voltaire
Every man is the son of his own works. -Miguel de Cervantes, novelist (1547-1616)
Every man supposes himself not to be fully understood or appreciated. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
Every new opinion, at its starting, is precisely in a minority of one. -Thomas Carlyle
Every now and then go away, have a little relaxation, for when you come back to your work your judgment will be surer.  Go some distance away because then the work appears smaller and more of it can be taken in at a glance and a lack of harmony and proportion is more readily seen. -Leonardo Da Vinci
Every person takes the limits for their own field of vision for the limits of the world. -Arthur Schopenhauer
Every reader finds himself. The writer's work is merely a kind of optical instrument that makes it possible for the reader to discern what, without this book, he would perhaps never have seen in himself. -Marcel Proust, novelist (1871-1922)
Every saint has a past and every sinner a future. -Oscar Wilde, writer (1854-1900)
Every society honors its live conformists and its dead troublemakers. -Mignon McLaughlin, author
Every time I see an adult on a bicycle, I no longer despair for the future of the human race. -H.G. Wells, writer (1866-1946)
Everybody knows if you are too careful you are so occupied in being careful that you are sure to stumble over something. -Gertrude Stein (1874-1946)
Everybody's talking about people breaking into houses but there are more people in the world who want to break out of houses. -Thornton Wilder, writer (1897-1975)
Everyday language is a part of the human organism and is no less complicated than it. -Ludwig Wittgenstein (1889-1951) [Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus, 1921]
Everyone is a genius at least once a year. -Georg Christoph Lichtenberg, scientist and philosopher (1742-1799)
Everyone is born with genius, but most people only keep it a few minutes. -Edgard Varese, composer (1885-1965)
Everyone is kneaded out of the same dough but not baked in the same oven. -Yiddish proverb
Everyone is necessarily the hero of his own life story. -John Barth
Everyone should carefully observe which way his heart draws him, and then choose that way with all his strength. -Hasidic saying
Everyone thinks of changing the world, but no one thinks of changing himself. -Leo Tolstoy
Everyone wishes to have truth on his side, but not everyone wishes to be on the side of truth. -Richard Whately, philosopher, reformer, theologian, economist (1787-1863)
Everything considered, work is less boring than amusing oneself. -Charles Baudelaire
Everything has been figured out except how to live. -Jean-Paul Sartre
Everything is for the eye these days - TV, Life, Look, the movies. Nothing is just for the mind. The next generation will have eyeballs as big as cantaloupes and no brain at all. -Fred Allen
Everything secret degenerates, even the administration of justice; nothing is safe that does not show how it can bear discussion and publicity. -Lord Acton, historian (1834-1902)
Everything that irritates us about others can lead us to an understanding of ourselves. -Carl Jung, psychiatrist (1875-1961)
Everything you've learned in school as `obvious' becomes less and less obvious as you begin to study the universe. For example, there are no solids in the universe. There's not even a suggestion of a solid. There are no absolute continuums. There are no surfaces. There are no straight lines. -R. Buckminster Fuller, engineer, designer, and architect (1895-1983)
Everywhere I go I find that a poet has been there before me. -Sigmund Freud
Everywhere is walking distance if you have the time. -Steven Wright, comedian (1955- )
Examinations are formidable even to the best prepared, for the greatest fool may ask more than the wisest man can answer. -Charles Caleb Colton, author and clergyman (1780-1832)
Excellence in any department can be attained only by the labor of a lifetime; it is not to be purchased at a lesser price. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
Excess on occasion is exhilarating. It prevents moderation from acquiring the deadening effect of a habit. -W. Somerset Maugham
Excess on occasion is exhilarating. It prevents moderation from acquiring the deadening effect of a habit. -William Somerset Maugham
Expecting the world to treat you fairly because you are a good person is a little like expecting the bull not to attack you because you are a vegetarian. -Dennis Wholey
Experience is a hard teacher because she gives the test first, the lesson afterward.
Experience is not what happens to a man; it is what a man does with what happens to him. -Aldous Huxley
Experience is that marvelous thing that enables you to recognize a mistake when you make it again. -Franklin P. Jones
Experience is the comb life gives you after you lose your hair. -Judith Stearn
Experience is what you get when you were expecting something else.
Experience teaches us to be most on our guard to protect liberty when the government's purpose is beneficent. Men born to freedom are naturally alert to repel invasion of their liberty by evil-minded rulers. The greatest dangers to liberty lurk in insidious encroachment by men of zeal, well-meaning but without understanding. -Louis Dembitz Brandeis, lawyer, judge, and writer (1856-1941)
Experience without theory is blind, but theory without experience is mere intellectual play. -Immanuel Kant
Expert: Avoids the small errors while sweeping on to the grand fallacy.
Extraordinary claims require extraordinary evidence. -Carl Sagan, astronomer and author (1934-1996)
Eyes are vocal, tears have tongues, / And there are words not made with lungs. -Crashaw
Faced with the choice between changing one's mind and proving that there is no need to do so, almost everyone gets busy on the proof. -Galbraith's Law
Facts do not cease to exist because they are ignored. -Aldous Huxley, novelist (1894-1963)
Failure is often that early morning hour of darkness that precedes the dawning of the day of success.
Failures are divided into two classes--those who thought and never did, and those who did and never thought. -John Charles Salak
Fame is a vapor; popularity an accident; the only earthly certainty is oblivion. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
Fame is a vapor; popularity an accident; the only earthly certainty is oblivion. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910) 
Familiarity is a magician that is cruel to beauty but kind to ugliness. -Ouida, pen name of Marie Louise de la Ramee (1839-1908)
Fanaticism consists of redoubling your efforts when you have forgotten your aim. -George Santayana
Fast, Cheap, Good: Choose any two.
Fear is a darkroom for developing negatives.
Fear is the tax that conscience pays to guilt. -George Sewell
Feeling gratitude and not expressing it is like wrapping a present and not giving it. -William Arthur Ward, college administrator, writer (1921-1994)
Fenderberg: Deposit on the inside of a car fender after a snowstorm.
Few human beings are proof against the implied flattery of rapt attention. -Jack Woodford
Few men speak humbly of humility, chastely of chastity, skeptically of skepticism. -Blaise Pascal (1623-1662)
Few people are capable of expressing with equanimity opinions which differ from that of their social environment. -Albert Einstein (1879-1955) 
Few people think more than two or three times a year. I've made an international reputation for myself by thinking once or twice a week. -George Bernard Shaw, writer, Nobel laureate (1856-1950)
Few things are harder to put up with than the annoyance of a good example. -Mark Twain, U.S. Author (1835-1910)
Few things can help an individual more than to place responsibility on him, and to let him know that you trust him. -Booker T. Washington, reformer, educator, and author (1856-1915)
Fill the seats of justice with good men, not so absolute in goodness as to forget what human frailty is. -Thomas Noon Talfourd (1795-1854)
Finish every day and be done with it. You have done what you could; Some blunders and absurdities crept in; Forget them as soon as you can. Tomorrow is a new day; You shall begin it serenely and with too high a spirit to be encumbered with your old nonsense. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
First say to yourself what you would be, then do what you have to do. -Epictetus
First the man takes a drink. Then the drink takes a drink. Then the drink takes the man. -Japanese proverb
Flatter me, and I may not believe you. Criticize me, and I may not like you. Ignore me, and I may not forgive you. Encourage me, and I will not forget you. -William Arthur Ward, newspaper editor, writer
Flattery won't hurt you if you don't swallow it. -Kin Hubbard, humorist (1868-1930)
For a man to achieve all that is demanded of him he must regard himself as greater than he is. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, poet, dramatist, novelist, and philosopher (1749-1832)
For all sad words of tongue and pen, the saddest are these, "It might have been." -John Greenleaf Whittier, poet (1807-1892)
For as long as men massacre animals, they will kill each other. Indeed, he who sows the seed of murder and pain cannot reap joy and love. -Pythagoras
For every action there is an equal and opposite malfunction.
For every ten people who are clipping at the branches of evil, you're lucky to find one who's hacking at the roots. -Henry David Thoreau
For sleep, riches and health to be truly enjoyed, they must be interrupted. -Jean Paul Richter
For what is a poem but a hazardous attempt at self-understanding: it is the deepest part of autobiography. -Robert Penn Warren, novelist and poet (1905-1989)
Formula for success: Underpromise and overdeliver. -Tom Peters
Fortune is ever seen accompanying industry. -Oliver Goldsmith
Fossil flowers come from the Petrified Florist.
Freedom is not worth having if it does not include the freedom to make mistakes. -Mahatma Gandhi
Freedom is the right to be wrong, not the right to do wrong. -John G. Diefenbaker
Friend - One who knows all about you and likes you just the same.
Friends: People who know you well, but like you anyway.
Friendship is always a sweet responsibility, never an opportunity. -Kahlil Gibran
Friendship is born at that moment when one person says to another: What! You, too? Thought I was the only one. -Clive Staples Lewis, novelist and essayist (1898-1963)
Friendship is like money, easier made than kept. -Samuel Butler
Frisbeetarianism, n.: The belief that when you die, your soul goes up on the roof and gets stuck.
From what we get, we can make a living; what we give, however, makes a life. -Arthur Ashe
Genderplex: Trying to determine from the cutesy pictures which restroom to use.
Generosity is giving more than you can, and pride is taking less than you need. -Kahlil Gibran
Generosity is giving more than you can, and pride is taking less than you need. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Genius is eternal patience. -Michelangelo
Genius is the gold in the mine, talent is the miner who works and brings it out. -Lady Marguerite Blessington (1789-1849)
Give me ambiguity or give me something else.
Give us the fortitude to endure the things which cannot be changed, and the courage to change the things which should be changed, and the wisdom to know one from the other. -Oliver J. Hart
Given enough eyeballs, all bugs are shallow -Eric S. Raymond, programmer and writer (1957- )
Gleemites: Petrified deposits of toothpaste found in sinks.
Go often to the house of thy friend, for weeds choke the unused path. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
God comes to the hungry in the form of food. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (1869-1948)
God could not be everywhere, and therefore he created mothers. -Jewish proverb
God gave us memories so that we might have roses in December. -James M. Barrie
God gave us two ends. One to sit on and one to think with. Success depends on which one you use; heads you win-tails yo lose.
God gives every bird his worm, but he does not throw it into the nest. -Swedish proverb 
God has no religion. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (1869-1948)
God is a comedian playing to an audience too afraid to laugh. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
God is a comic playing to an audience that's afraid to laugh. -Voltaire (1694-1778)
God is subtle, but he is not malicious. -Albert Einstein.
God never occurs to you in person but always in action. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (1869-1948)
God respects us when we work and loves us when we sing.
God's retirement plan is out of this world.
God, to me, it seems, is a verb, not a noun, proper or improper. -R. Buckminster Fuller, engineer, designer, and architect (1895-1983)
Good advice is always certain to be ignored, but that's no reason not to give it. -Agatha Christie
Good communication is as stimulating as black coffee, and just as hard to sleep after. -Anne Morrow Lindbergh
Good ideas are not adopted automatically. They must be driven into practice with courageous patience. -Admiral Hyman Rickover
Good music is very close to primitive language. -Denis Diderot, philosopher (1713-1784)
Good news. Ten weeks from Friday will be a good day.
Good people do not need laws to tell them to act responsibly, while bad people will find a way around the laws. -Plato
Good teaching is one-fourth preparation and three-fourths theater. -Gail Godwin
Goodness is the only investment which never fails. -Henry David Thoreau (1817-1862)
Grad school is the snooze button on the clock-radio of life. -Comedian John Rogers (who holds a graduate degree in physics)
Grandchildren don't make a man feel old; it's the knowledge that he's married to a grandmother. -Agatha Christie
Gratitude is not only the greatest of virtues, but the parent of all others. -Cicero
Gratitude is not only the greatest of virtues, but the parent of all the others. -Cicero
Gravity is the soul of wt. -John Langdon (1946-) [Wordplay]
Great literature is simply language charged with meaning to the utmost possible degree. -Ezra Pound [ABC of Reading]
Great spirits have always encountered violent opposition from mediocre minds. -Albert Einstein
Great works are performed not by strength, but perseverance. -Samuel Johnson
Grown-ups never understand anything for themselves, and it is tiresome for children to be always and forever explaining things to them. -Antoine de Saint-Exupery (1900-1944)
Growth for the sake of growth is the ideology of the cancer cell. -Edward Abbey, naturalist and author (1927-1989) [A Voice Crying in the Wilderness, 1989]
Growth in wisdom can be measured precisely by decline in bile. -Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche, philosopher (1844-1900)
HELP! MY TYPEWRITER IS BROKEN! -E. E. CUMMINGS
Habit is habit and not to be flung out of the window by any man, but coaxed downstairs a step at a time. -Mark Twain
Half of the harm that is done in this world Is due to people who want to feel important. They don't mean to do harm But the harm does not interest them. -T.S. Eliot
Half of what I say is meaningless; but I say it so that the other half may reach you. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Happiness is as a butterfly which, when pursued, is always beyond our grasp, but which if you will sit down quietly, may alight upon you. -Nathaniel Hawthorne (1804-1864)
Happiness is not a station you arrive at, but a manner of traveling. -Margaret Lee Runbeck
Happiness is something that comes into our lives through doors we don't even remember leaving open. -Rose Lane
Happiness is the absence of the striving for happiness. -Chuang-tzu (BCE 350)
Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony. -Mohandas K. Gandhi (1869-1948)
Happy the people whose annals are blank in the history books! -Charles de Montesquieu, philosopher and writer (1689-1755)
Hard things are put in our way, not to stop us, but to call out our courage and strength.
Hard work never killed anybody, but why take a chance?
Hate is a dead thing. Who of you would be a tomb? -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Hating people is like burning down your own house to get rid of a rat. -Henry Emerson Fosdick
Hatred - the anger of the weak. -Alphonse Daudet, writer (1840-1897)
Have a heart that never hardens, and a temper that never tires, and a touch that never hurts. -Charles Dickens, novelist (1812-1870)
Have children while your parents are still young enough to take care of them. -Rita Rudner
Have more than thou showest, / Speak less than thou knowest. -William Shakespeare
Have no friends not equal to yourself. -Confucius (551-497 BCE)
Have patience! In time, even grass becomes milk. -Charan Singh, mystic (1916-1990)
Having children makes you no more a parent than having a piano makes you a pianist. -Michael Levine [Lessons at the Halfway Point]
Having children will turn you into your parents.
He acts before he speaks, and afterwards speaks according to his actions. -Confucius, philosopher and teacher (c. 551-478 BCE)
He alone may chastise who loves. -Rabindranath Tagore, poet, philosopher, author, songwriter, painter, educator, composer, Nobel laureate (1861-1941)
He has no hope who never had a fear. -William Cowper (1731-1800)
He has not acquired a fortune; the fortune has acquired him.
He is a hard man who is only just, and a sad one who is only wise. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
He is happiest, be he king or peasant who finds peace in his home. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (1749-1832)
He is the best physician who is the most ingenious inspirer of hope. -Samuel Taylor Coleridge, poet, critic, and philosopher (1772-1834)
He that is of the opinion money will do everything may well be suspected of doing everything for money. -Ben Franklin
He that would be a leader must be a bridge. -Welsh proverb
He that wrestles with us strengthens our nerves, and sharpens our skill. Our antagonist is our helper. -Edmund Burke, statesman and writer (1729-1797)
He then learns that in going down into the secrets of his own mind he has descended into the secrets of all minds. -Emerson
He then learns that in going down into the secrets of his own mind he has descended into the secrets of all minds. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
He who allows oppression, shares the crime. -Erasmus Darwin, physician, scientist, reformer, and poet; grandfather of Charles Darwin [The Botanic Garden] (1731-1802)
He who asks is a fool for five minutes, but he who does not ask remains a fool forever. -Chinese proverb
He who asks of life nothing but the improvement of his own nature...is less liable than anyone else to miss and waste life. -Henri Frederic Amiel (1821-1881)
He who chooses the beginning of a road chooses the place it leads to. It is the means that determines the end. -Harry Emerson Fosdick
He who does not attempt to make peace / When small discords arise, / Is like the bee's hive which leaks drops of honey / Soon, the whole hive collapses. -Nagarjuna (c. 100-200 A.D.)
He who does not attempt to make peace / When small discords arise, / Is like the bee's hive which leaks drops of honey / Soon, the whole hive collapses. -Nagarjuna (c. A.D 100-200.)
He who establishes his argument by noise and command, shows that his reason is weak. -Michel De Montaigne, essayist (1533-1592)
He who fights with monsters might take care lest he thereby become a monster. And if you gaze for long into an abyss, the abyss gazes also into you. -Friedrich Nietzsche
He who foresees calamities suffers them twice over.
He who has a why can endure any how. -Friedrich Nietzsche
He who has imagination without learning has wings and no feet. -Joseph Joubert, essayist (1754-1824)
He who is cruel to animals becomes hard also in his dealings with men. We can judge the heart of a man by his treatment of animals. -Immanuel Kant, philosopher (1724-1804)
He who is only just is cruel. Who on earth could live were all judged justly? -Lord Byron, poet (1788-1824)
He who knows others is wise. He who knows himself is enlightened.
He who knows that enough is enough will always have enough.
He who listens to truth is not less than he who utters truth. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
He who opens a school door, closes a prison. -Victor Hugo, poet, novelist, and dramatist (1802-1885)
He who receives a benefit with gratitude repays the first installment on his debt. -Seneca
He who sacrifices his conscience to ambition burns a picture to obtain the ashes. -Chinese Proverb
He who sees the truth, let him proclaim it, without asking who is for it or who is against it. -Henry George
He who seizes the right moment is the right man. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (1749-1832)
He who sings scares away his woes. -Miguel de Cervantes, novelist (1547-1616)
He who throws mud loses ground.
He who wishes to secure the good of others has already secured his own. -Confucius (c. 551-479? BC)
He who would leap high must take a long run. -Danish Proverb
He who would make his own liberty secure must guard even his enemy from oppression; for if he violates this duty he establishes a precedent that will reach to himself. -Thomas Paine, philosopher and writer (1737-1809)
He who would travel happily must travel light. -Antoine de Saint-Exupery, author and aviator (1900-1945)
He whom the gods love, dies young. -Titus Maccius Plautus, dramatist (circa 254-184 BCE)
He will always be a slave who does not know how to live upon a little. -Horace, poet and satirist (65-8 BCE)
He's the best physician who knows the worthlessness of the most medicines. -Benjamin Franklin, statesman, author, and inventor (1706-1790)
Heard melodies are sweet, but those unheard / Are sweeter. -John Keats, poet (1795-1821)
Heaven gives its glimpses only to those / Not in position to look too close. -Robert Frost, poet (1874-1963)
Heaven is under our feet as well as over our heads. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
Help stamp out, remove and abolish redundancy.
Heredity is a splendid phenomenon that relieves us of responsibility for our shortcomings. -Doug Larson
Heredity is what sets the parents of a teen-ager wondering about each other. -Laurence J. Peter
Him that I love, I wish to be free -- even from me. -Anne Morrow Lindbergh, writer (1906-2001)
His mother had often said, When you choose an action, you choose the consequences of that action. She had emphasized the corollary of this axiom even more vehemently: when you desired a consequence you had damned well better take the action that would create it. -Lois McMaster Bujold, writer (1949- )
History does not repeat itself; historians merely repeat each other.
History is fables agreed upon. -Voltaire (1694-1778)
Hitch your wagon to a star. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Hofstadter's Law: It always takes longer than you expect, even when you take into account Hofstadter's Law.
Holding on to anger is like grasping a hot coal with the intent of throwing it at someone else; you are the one getting burned. -Buddha (c. 566-480 BCE)
Home is not where you live but where they understand you. -Christion Morgenstern, writer (1871-1914)
Honest criticism is hard to take, particularly from a relative, a friend, an acquaintance, or a stranger. -Franklin P. Jones, businessman (1887-1929)
Honest differences are often a healthy sign of progress. -Mahatma Gandhi
Honesty is the best policy, but insanity is a better defense.
Hope: Desire and expectation rolled into one. -Ambrose Bierce, writer (1842-1914) [The Devil's Dictionary, 1906]
Hot lead can be almost as effective coming from a linotype as from a firearm. -John O'Hara, journalist (1905-1970)
How can you sing if your mouth be filled with food? How shall your hand be raised in blessing if it is filled with gold? -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
How come wrong numbers are never busy?
How come you are so fond of all those probability people? Because they are never negative. -Andrejs Dunkels
How did a fool and his money get together in the first place?
How do I love thee? Let me count the ways. I love thee to the depth and breadth and height my soul can reach. -Elizabeth Barrett Browning, poet (1806-1861)
How far you go in life depends on your being tender with the young, compassionate with the aged, sympathetic with the striving and tolerant of the weak and strong. Because someday in life you will have been all of these. -George Washington Carver (1864?-1943)
How glorious it is - and also how painful - to be an exception. -Louis Charles Alfred de Musset, writer (1810-1857) 
How long is a minute depends on which side of the bathroom door you are on.
How much easier it is to be generous than just! Men are sometimes bountiful who are not honest. -Junius, pseudonym of the unknown author of a series of letters published in a London newspaper during (1769-1772)
How much more grievous are the consequences of anger than the causes of it. -Marcus Aurelius
How we spend our days is, of course, how we spend our lives.
How we spend our days is, of course, how we spend our lives. -Annie Dillard
How wonderful it is that nobody need wait a single moment before starting to improve the world. -Anne Frank, Holocaust diarist (1929-1945)
Human beings are perhaps never more frightening than when they are convinced beyond doubt that they are right. -Laurens van der Post
Human beings can alter their lives by altering their attitudes of mind. -William James
Human beings, who are almost unique in having the ability to learn from the experience of others, are also remarkable for their apparent disinclination to do so. -Douglas Adams [Last Chance to See]
Human subtlety will never devise an invention more beautiful, more simple or more direct than does Nature, because in her inventions, nothing is lacking and nothing is superfluous. -Leonardo da Vinci, painter, engineer, musician, and scientist (1452-1519)
Humility like darkness reveals the heavenly lights. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
Humor is just another defense against the universe. -Mel Brooks
Humour is the only test of gravity, and gravity of humour, for a subject which will not bear raillery is suspicious, and a jest which will not bear serious examination is false wit. -Aristotle
I am I plus my surroundings and if I do not preserve the latter, I do not preserve myself. -Jose Ortega Y Gasset [Meditations on Quixote] (1883-1955)
I am I plus my surroundings and if I do not preserve the latter, I do not preserve myself. -Jose Ortega Y Gasset [Meditations on Quixote] (1883-1955) 
I am a Conservative to preserve all that is good in our constitution, a Radical to remove all that is bad. I seek to preserve property and to respect order, and I equally decry the appeal to the passions of the many or the prejudices of the few. -Benjamin Disraeli, British prime minister (1804-1881)
I am a carnivorous fish swimming in two waters, the cold water of art and the hot water of science. -Salvador Dali
I am a creationist; I refuse to believe that I could have evolved from humans.
I am a kind of paranoiac in reverse. I suspect people of plotting to make me happy. -J.D. Salinger
I am about to - or I am going to - die; either expression is used. -Dominique Bouhours, grammarian (1632-1702)
'I am ashamed of my emptiness,'/ said the Word to the Work. / 'I know how poor I am when I see you,' / said the Work to the Word. -Rabindranath Tagore, poet, philosopher, author, songwriter, painter, educator, composer, Nobel laureate (1861-1941)
I am in the habit of looking not so much to the nature of a gift as to the spirit in which it is offered. -Robert Louis Stevenson, novelist, essayist, and poet (1850-1894)
I am no more humble than my talents require. -Oscar Levant, composer (1906-1972)
I am not one of those who believe that a great army is the means of maintaining peace, because if you build up a great profession those who form parts of it want to exercise their profession. -Woodrow Wilson, 28th US president, Nobel laureate (1856-1924)
I am not sincere, even when I say I am not. -Jules Renard, writer (1864-1910)
I and the public know. / What all schoolchildren learn. / Those to whom evil is done. / Do evil in return -W.H. Auden, poet (1907-1973)
I ask you to judge me by the enemies I have made. -Franklin D. Roosevelt, 32nd US President (1882-1945)
I believe I have no prejudices whatsoever. All I need to know is that a man is a member of the human race. That's bad enough for me. -Mark Twain
I believe a leaf of grass is no less than the journey-work of the stars. -Walt Whitman, poet (1819-1892)
I believe in God, only I spell it Nature. -Frank Lloyd Wright, architect (1867-1959)
I believe that the first test of a truly great man is his humility. I do not mean by humility, doubt of his own powers. But really great men have a curious feeling that the greatness is not in them, but through them. And they see something divine in every other man and are endlessly, foolishly, incredibly merciful. -John Ruskin, author, art critic, and social reformer (1819-1900)
I believe there are more instances of the abridgment of the rights of the people by the gradual and silent encroachments of those in power than by violent and sudden usurpations. -James Madison, fourth US president (1751-1836)
I call architecture frozen music. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, poet, dramatist, novelist, and philosopher (1749-1832)
I can't go back to yesterday, because I was a different person then. -Lewis Carroll [Through the Looking Glass] (1832-1898)
I cannot judge my work while I am doing it. I have to do as painters do, stand back and view it from a distance, but not too great a distance. -Blaise Pascal (1623-1662)
I care not for a man's religion whose dog or cat are not the better for it. -Abraham Lincoln
I care not for a man's religion whose dog or cat are not the better for it. -Abraham Lincoln (1809-1865)
I count him braver who overcomes his desires than him who conquers his enemies, for the hardest victory is over self. -Aristotle, philosopher (384-322 BCE)
I disclaim my disclaimer!
I distrust those people who know so well what God wants them to do because I notice it always coincides with their own desires. -Susan B Anthony, reformer and suffragist (1820-1906)
I do not feel obliged to believe that the same God who has endowed us with sense, reason, and intellect has intended us to forgo their use. -Galileo Galilei, physicist and astronomer (1564-1642)
I do not hesitate to read ... all good books in translations. What is really best in any book is translatable--any real insight or broad human sentiment. -Ralph Waldo Emerson [Society and Solitude]
I do not know what I may appear to the world; but to myself I seem to have been only like a boy playing on the seashore, and diverting myself now and then finding a smoother pebble or a prettier shell than ordinary, whilst the great ocean of truth lay all undiscovered before me. -Isaac Newton, philosopher and mathematician (1642-1727)
I do not know whether I was then a man dreaming I was a butterfly, or whether I am now a butterfly dreaming I am a man. -Chuang Tzu, mystic and philosopher (c. 4th century BCE)
I do not think there is any thrill that can go through the human heart like that felt by the inventor as he sees some creation of the brain unfolding to success... Such emotions make a man forget food, sleep, friends, love, everything. -Nikola Tesla, electrical engineer and inventor (1856-1943)
I do not want the peace that passeth understanding. I want the understanding which bringeth peace. -Helen Keller
I don't divide the world into the weak and the strong, or the successes and the failures, those who make it or those who don't. I divide the world into learners and non-learners. -Benjamin Barber
I don't know who my grandfather was; I'm much more concerned to know what his grandson will be. -Abraham Lincoln (1809-1865)
I don't know why we are here, but I'm pretty sure that it is not in order to enjoy ourselves. -Ludwig Wittgenstein, Cambridge philosopher
I don't necessarily agree with everything I say. -Marshall McLuhan, cultural historian and communications theorist (1911-1980)
I don't need time. What I need is a deadline. -Duke Ellington, jazz pianist, composer, and conductor (1899-1974)
I don't want to get to the end of my life and find that I lived just the length of it. I want to have lived the width of it as well. -Diane Ackerman
I don't want yes men around me. I want everyone to tell the truth, even if it costs them their jobs. -Samuel Goldwyn
I dream my painting, and then I paint my dream. -Vincent van Gogh, artist (1853-1890)
I envy people who drink - at least they know what to blame everything on. -Oscar Levant, composer (1906-1972)
I feel we are all islands -- in a common sea. -Anne Morrow Lindbergh, writer (1906-2001)
I find that principles have no real force except when one is well fed. -Mark Twain (1835-1910)
I frequently tramped eight or ten miles through the deepest snow to keep an appointment with a beech-tree, or a yellow birch, or an old acquaintance among the pines. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
I generally avoid temptation unless I can't resist it.
I hate quotations. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
I have abandoned the follies of youth for those of old age. -Depew
I have always found that mercy bears richer fruits than strict justice. -Abraham Lincoln, 16th U.S. President (1809-1865)
I have always imagined that paradise will be a kind of library. -Jorge Luis Borges, writer (1899-1986)
I have always wished that my computer would be as easy to use as my telephone. My wish has come true. I no longer know how to use my telephone. -Bjarne Stroustrup, computer science professor, designer of C++ programming language (1950- )
I have discovered that all human evil comes from this, man's being unable to sit still in a room. -Blaise Pascal, philosopher and mathematician (1623-1662)
I have enough money to last me the rest of my life, unless I buy something. -Jackie Mason (1931-)
I have every sympathy with the American who was so horrified by what he had read about the effects of smoking that he gave up reading. -Henry G. Strauss
I have learned through bitter experience the one supreme lesson to conserve my anger, and as heat conserved is transmitted into energy, even so our anger controlled can be transmitted into a power that can move the world. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
I have learnt silence from the talkative, toleration from the intolerant, and kindness from the unkind; yet strange, I am ungrateful to these teachers. -Kahlil Gibran, mystic, poet and artist (1883-1931)
I have lived in the world just long enough to look carefully the second time into those things that I am most certain of the first time. -Josh Billings
I have lived in this world just long enough to look carefully the second time into things that I am most certain of the first time. -Josh Billings
I have never been contained except I made the prison. -Mary Evans, actress (1888-1976)
I have never been hurt by anything I didn't say. -Calvin Coolidge
I have never met a man so ignorant that I couldn't learn something from him. -Galileo Galilei, physicist and astronomer (1564-1642)
I have no enemies, O God, but if I am to have an enemy / Let his strength be equal to mine, / That truth alone may be the victor. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
I have often regretted my speech, never my silence.
I have one request: may I never use my reason against truth. -Elie Wiesel
I have one share in corporate Earth, and I am nervous about the management. -E.B. White
I have only made this letter longer because I have not had the time to make it shorter. -Blaise Pascal (1623-1662)
I have suffered from being misunderstood, but I would have suffered a hell of a lot more if I had been understood. -Clarence Darrow, lawyer and author (1857-1938)
I have traveled the length and breadth of this country and talked with the best people, and I can assure you that data processing is a fad that won't last out the year. -The editor in charge of business books for Prentice Hall, 1957
I have yet to find the man, however exalted his station, who did not do better work and put forth greater effort under a spirit of approval than under a spirit of criticism. -Charles Schwab
I have yet to hear a man ask for advice on how to combine marriage and a career. -Gloria Steinem, women's rights activist, editor (1934- )
I haven't been wrong since 1961, when I thought I made a mistake. -Bob Hudson
I hope, there will be no Reason to doubt; Particularly, that where I am not understood, it shall be concluded, that something very useful and profound is coucht underneath. -Jonathan Swift, satirist (1667-1745)
I keep my ideals, because in spite of everything I still believe that people are really good at heart. -Anne Frank
I knew I'd hate COBOL the moment I saw they'd used 'perform' instead of 'do'. -Larry Wall, programmer, creator of Perl programming language (1954- )
I know I am among civilized men because they are fighting so savagely. -Voltaire, Philosopher, historian, satirist, dramatist, and essayist (1694-1778) 
I know what I have given you. I do not know what you have received. -Antonio Porchia, writer (1886-1968)
I learned long ago that being Lewis Carroll was infinitely more exciting than being Alice. -Joyce Carol Oates, writer (1938- )
I like not only to be loved, but to be told that I am loved; the realm of silence is large enough beyond the grave. -George Eliot (Mary Ann Evans), novelist (1819-1880)
I like simple, if it's complex then I don't understand it. -Seymour Cray, inventor of the Cray supercomputer
I like to believe that people in the long run are going to do more to promote peace than our governments. Indeed, I think that people want peace so much that one of these days governments had better get out of the way and let them have it. -Dwight D. Eisenhower, U.S. general and 34th president (1890-1969)
I like work; it fascinates me. I can sit and look at it for hours.
I live in that solitude which is painful in youth, but delicious in the years of maturity. -Albert Einstein
I live in the crowd of jollity, not so much to enjoy company as to shun myself. -Samuel Johnson
I long for eternity because there I shall meet my unwritten poems and my unpainted pictures. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
I look for what needs to be done.... After all, that's how the universe designs itself. -R. Buckminster Fuller, engineer, designer, and architect (1895-1983)
I love my country too much to be a nationalist. -Albert Camus, writer, philosopher, Nobel laureate (1913-1960)
I may disagree with what you have to say, but I shall defend, to the death, your right to say it. -Voltaire (1694-1778)
I may not always be right, but I'm never wrong.
I never did a day's work in my life; it was all fun. -Thomas Edison (1847-1931)
I never found the companion that was so companionable as solitude. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
I never made a mistake in my life. I thought I did once, but I was wrong.
I never said it was possible. I only said it was true. -Charles Richet, Nobel Laureate in Physiology
I never think of the future. It comes soon enough. -Albert Einstein
I never vote for anyone; I always vote against. -W.C. Fields, comedian (1880-1946)
I never would believe that Providence had sent a few men into the world, ready booted and spurred to ride, and millions ready saddled and bridled to be ridden. -Walt Whitman, poet (1819-1892)
I often quote myself; it adds spice to my conversation. -George Bernard Shaw
I once wanted to become an atheist, but I gave up - they have no holidays. -Henny Youngman, comedian, actor (1906-1998)
I saw the angel in the marble and carved until I set him free. -Michelangelo Buonarroti, sculptor, painter, architect, and poet (1475-1564)
I shall allow no man to belittle my soul by making me hate him. -Booker T. Washington (1856-1915)
I shall be telling this with a sigh / Somewhere ages and ages hence: / Two roads diverged in a wood, and I -- / I took the one less traveled by, / And that has made all the difference. -Robert Frost, poet (1874-1963)
I shall live badly if I do not write, and I shall write badly if I do not live. -Francoise Sagan
I shut my eyes and all the world drops dead; I lift my eyes and all is born again. -Sylvia Plath, poet (1932-1963)
I shut my eyes in order to see. -Paul Gauguin (1848-1903)
I thank Thee first because I was never robbed before; second, because although they took my purse they did not take my life; third, because although they took my all, it was not much; and fourth because it was I who was robbed, and not I who robbed. -Matthew Henry, minister (1662-1714)
I think men who have a pierced ear are better prepared for marriage. They've experienced pain and bought jewelry. -Rita Rudner
I think there is a world market for maybe five computers. -Thomas Watson, chairman of IBM, 1943
I think there is a world market for maybe five computers. -Thomas Watson, chairman of IBM, 1958
I think, therefore I am paid.
I think, therefore I am. I think.
I think...I think it's in my basement. Let me go upstairs and check. -M.C. Escher (1898-1972)
I took a speed reading course and read 'War and Peace' in twenty minutes. It involves Russia. -Woody Allen, author, actor (1935- )
I used to work in a fire hydrant factory. You couldn't park anywhere near the place. -Steven Wright
I value my garden more for being full of blackbirds than of cherries, and very frankly give them fruit for their songs. -Joseph Addison, essayist and poet (1672-1719)
I value the friend who for me finds time on his calendar, but I cherish the friend who for me does not consult the calendar. -Robert Brault
I want to be thoroughly used up when I die, for the harder I work the more I live. I rejoice in life for its own sake. -George Bernard Shaw
I want to die peacefully in my sleep like my grandfather. Not screaming in terror like his passengers. -Jim Harkins
I want to die peacefully in my sleep like my grandfather. Not screaming in terror like passengers in his car. -Jim Harkins
I wanted to change the world. But I have found that the only thing one can be sure of changing is oneself. -Aldous Leonard Huxley, writer (1894-1963)
I was court-martialled in my absence, and sentenced to death in my absence, so I said they could shoot me in my absence. -Brendan Francis Behan, playwright (1923-1964)
I was irrevocably betrothed to laughter, the sound of which has always seemed to me the most civilised music in the world. -Peter Ustinov
I was never less alone than when by myself. -Edward Gibbon, historian (1737-1794)
I was recently on a tour of Latin America, and the only regret I have was that I didn't study Latin harder in school so I could converse with those people. -US Vice President J. Danforth Quayle
I went to the woods because I wished to live deliberately, to front only the essential facts of life, and see if I could not learn what it had to teach, and not, when I came to die, discover that I had not lived. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
I will love the light for it shows me the way, Yet I will endure the darkness for it shows me the stars. -Og Mandino
I will not let anyone walk through my mind with their dirty feet. -Mohandas K. Gandhi (1869-1948)
I will not play at tug o' war. / I'd rather play at hug o' war, / Where everyone hugs instead of tugs. -Shel Silverstein, writer (1930-1999)
I wish I were either rich enough or poor enough to do a lot of things that are impossible in my present comfortable circumstances. -Don Herold
I wish no living thing to suffer pain. -Shelley (1792-1822)
I wish our clever young poets would remember my homely definitions of prose and poetry; that is, prose, - words in their best order; poetry, - the best words in their best order. -Samuel Taylor Coleridge, poet, critic (1772-1834)
I wish you all the joy that you can wish. -William Shakespeare, playwright and poet (1564-1616) 
I worked myself up from nothing to a state of extreme poverty. -Groucho Marx
I would not attack the faith of a heathen without being sure I had a better one to put in its place. -Harriet Beecher Stowe
I would rather be able to appreciate things I can not have than to have things I am not able to appreciate. -Elbert Hubbard
I would rather be exposed to the inconveniences attending too much liberty than to those attending too small a degree of it. -Thomas Jefferson, 3rd US president, architect and author (1743-1826)
I would rather be the man who bought the Brooklyn Bridge than the one who sold it. -Will Rogers
I would rather lose in a cause that will someday win, than win in a cause that will someday lose. -Woodrow Wilson
I'll take a "5" with a "10" attitude over a "10" with a "5" attitude any day.
I'm a great believer in luck and I find the harder I work, the more I have of it. -Thomas Jefferson, third US president, architect and author (1743-1826)
I'm defeated and I know it, if I meet any human being from whom I find myself unable to learn anything. -George Herbert Palmer
I'm not at all contemptuous of comforts, but they have their place and it is not first. -E.F. Schumacher
I'm not indecisive. Am I indecisive? -Jim Scheibel, St. Paul MN mayor
I'm proud to pay taxes in the United States; the only thing is, I could be just as proud for half the money. -Arthur Godfrey, radio and television entertainer (1903-1983)
I'm proud to pay taxes in the United States; the only thing is, I could be just as proud for half the money. -Arthur Godfrey, television host, entertainer (1903-1983)
I'm sometimes asked "Why do you spend so much of your time and money talking about kindness to animals when there is so much cruelty to men?" I answer: "I am working at the roots." -George T. Angell, reformer (1823-1909)
I'm somewhat shy about the brutal facts of being a carnivore. I don't like meat to look like animals. I prefer it in the form of sausages, hamburger and meat loaf, far removed from the living thing. -John Updike, New York Times, 1982
I've never liked you, and I always will!
If God created us in his own image, we have more than reciprocated. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
If God intended one space between sentences, why do we have two thumbs?
If I am walking with two other men, each of them will serve as my teacher. I will pick out the good points of the one and imitate them, and the bad points of the other and correct them in myself. -Confucius, philosopher and teacher (c. 551-478 BCE)
If I can stop one Heart from breaking / I shall not live in vain / If I can ease one Life the Aching / Or cool one Pain / Or help one fainting Robin / Unto his Nest again / I shall not live in Vain. -Emily Dickinson (1830-1886)
If I could I would always work in silence and obscurity, and let my efforts be known by their results. -Emily Bronte (1818-1848)
If I could drop dead right now, I'd be the happiest man alive. -Samuel Goldwyn
If I had eight hours to chop down a tree, I'd spend six sharpening my axe. -Abraham Lincoln (1809-1865)
If I had thought about it, I wouldn't have done the experiment. The literature was full of examples that said you can't do this. -Spencer Silver, the originator of Post-it Notepads
If I have any beliefs about immortality, it is that certain dogs I have known will go to heaven, and very, very few persons. -James Thurber, writer and cartoonist (1894-1961)
If I have ever made any valuable discoveries, it has been owing more to patient observation than to any other reason. -Isaac Newton
If I have not seen so far it is because I stood in giant's footsteps.
If I have seen farther than others, it is because I have stood on the shoulders of giants. -Isaac Newton, philosopher and mathematician (1642-1727)
If I keep a green bough in my heart, the singing bird will come. -Chinese Proverb
If I listen, I have the advantage. If I speak, the others have it.
If I look confused it's because I'm thinking. -Samuel Goldwyn
If I love you, what business is it of yours? -Goethe
If I seem to take part in politics, it is only because politics encircles us today like the coil of a snake from which one cannot get out, no matter how much one tries. I wish therefore to wrestle with the snake. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
If I try to be like him, who will be like me? -Yiddish proverb
If I were punished for every pun I shed, there would not be left a puny shed of my punnish head. -Samuel Johnson
If I were to choose between the power of writing a poem and the ecstasy of a poem unwritten, I would choose the ecstasy. It is better poetry. But you and all my neighbors agree that I always choose badly. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
If a little knowledge is dangerous, where is the man who has so much as to be out of danger? -Thomas Henry Huxley
If a man does not make new acquaintance as he advances through life, he will soon find himself left alone. A man, Sir, should keep his friendship in constant repair. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
If a man empties his purse into his head, no one can take it away from him. An investment of knowledge always pays the best interest. -Benjamin Franklin
If a man have a genius for painting, poetry, music, architecture, or philosophy, he makes a bad husband, and an ill provider. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
If a man loves the labour of his trade, apart from any question of success or fame, the gods have called him. -Robert Louis Stevenson
If a man points at the moon, an idiot will look at the finger. -Sufi wisdom
If a man walks in the woods for love of them half of each day, he is in danger of being regarded as a loafer. But if he spends his days as a speculator, shearing off those woods and making the earth bald before her time, he is deemed an industrious and enterprising citizen. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
If a man will begin with certainties, he shall end in doubts; but if he will be content to begin with doubts, he shall end in certainties. -Francis Bacon, essayist, philosopher, and statesman (1561-1626)
If a person is obviously mentally disabled, such as having Down's syndrome or Alzheimer's, decent people exercise sympathy and understanding in their interactions. So why, if someone merely has a low IQ, is he treated with ridicule and contempt? -Geoff Kuenning, computer science professor (1951- )
If a person never contradicts himself, it must be that he says nothing. -Miguel de Unamuno
If a triangle could speak, it would say, that God is eminently triangular, while a circle would say that the divine nature is eminently circular. -Baruch Spinoza, philosopher (1632-1677)
If all men knew what others say of them, there would not be four friends in the world. -Blaise Pascal, philosopher and mathematician (1623-1662)
If all our misfortunes were laid in one common heap whence everyone must take an equal portion, most people would be contented to take their own and depart. -Socrates (469?-399 BCE)
If all the world's managers were laid end to end, it would be an improvement.
If any man wishes to write in a clear style, let him be first clear in his thoughts; and if any would write in a noble style, let him first possess a noble soul. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, poet, dramatist, novelist, and philosopher (1749-1832)
If at first you don't succeed, redefine success.
If everything is coming your way, you're in the wrong lane.
If evolution really works, how come mothers only have two hands? -Ed Dussault
If fifty million people say a foolish thing, it is still a foolish thing. -Anatole France
If fortune turns against you even jelly will break your tooth. -Persian Proverb
If growing up is the process of creating ideas and dreams about what life should be, then maturity is letting go again. -Mary Beth Danielson
If it doesn't matter, it doesn't matter.
If it weren't for the last minute, nothing would ever get done.
If liberty means anything at all, it means the right to tell people what they do not want to hear. -George Orwell
If life gives you lemons, make lemonade.
If mankind minus one were of one opinion, then mankind is no more justified in silencing the one than the one - if he had the power - would be justified in silencing mankind. -John Stuart Mill, philosopher and economist (1806-1873)
If men could regard the events of their own lives with more open minds, they would frequently discover that they did not really desire the things they failed to obtain. -Emile Herzog, writer (1885-1967)
If money be not thy servant, it will be thy master. The covetous man cannot so properly be said to possess wealth, as that may be said to possess him. -Francis Bacon, essayist, philosopher, and statesman (1561-1626)
If only I may grow: firmer, simpler, -- quieter, warmer. -Dag Hammarskjold, Secretary General of the United Nations, Nobel laureate (1905-1961)
If only there were evil people somewhere insidiously committing evil deeds and it were necessary only to separate them from the rest of us and destroy them. But the line dividing good and evil cuts through the heart of every human being. And who is willing to destroy a piece of his own heart? -Alexander Solzhenitsyn, novelist, Nobel laureate (1918- )
If people knew how hard I worked to get my mastery, it wouldn't seem so wonderful after all. -Michelangelo Buonarroti, sculptor, painter, architect, and poet (1475-1564)
If people listened to themselves more often, they would talk less.
If pleasures are greatest in anticipation, just remember that this is also true of trouble. -Elbert Hubbard, author, editor, printer (1856-1915)
If privacy is outlawed, only outlaws will have privacy. -Phil Zimmermann, cryptographer (1954- )
If something is confidential, it will be left in the copy machine.
If the aborigine drafted an IQ test, all of Western civilization would presumably flunk it. -Stanley Marion Garn, anthropologist (1922- )
If the camel once gets his nose in a tent, his body will soon follow. -Arabian proverb
If the gods listened to the prayers of men, all humankind would quickly perish since they constantly pray for many evils to befall one another. -Epicurus, philosopher (c. 341-270 BCE)
If the rich could hire someone else to die for them, the poor would make a wonderful living. -Jewish Proverb
If the secret sorrows of everyone could be read on their forehead, how many who now cause envy would suddenly become the objects of pity. -Italian proverb
If the wind will not serve, take to the oars. -Latin proverb
If there be time to expose through discussion the falsehood and the fallacies, to avert the evil by the processes of education, the remedy to be applied is more speech, not enforced silence. -Louis Dembitz Brandeis, lawyer, judge, and writer (1856-1941)
If there is anything we wish to change in the child, we should first examine it and see whether it is not something that could better be changed in ourselves. -Carl Gustav Jung, psychiatrist (1875-1961)
If they can make those 'black box' flight recorders indestructible, why can't they do the same with the rest of the plane? -Dave Broadfoot
If today is the first day of the rest of your life, what was
If today is the first day of the rest of your life, what was yesterday?
If triangles had a God, he would have 3 sides. -Montesquieu
If we could read the secret history of our enemies, we should find in each man's life sorrow and suffering enough to disarm all hostility. -Henry Wadsworth Longfellow, poet (1807-1882)
If we encounter a man of rare intellect, we should ask him what books he reads. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
If we escape punishment for our vices, why should we complain if we are not rewarded for our virtues? -John Churton Collins, literary critic (1848-1908)
If we had no winter, the spring would not be so pleasant: if we did not sometimes taste of adversity, prosperity would not be so welcome. -Anne Bradstreet
If we had paid no more attention to our plants than we have to our children, we would now be living in a jungle of weed. -Luther Burbank, horticulturist (1849-1926)
If we have not quiet in our minds, outward comfort will do no more for us than a golden slipper on a gouty foot. -John Bunyan, preacher and author (1628-1688)
If we knew what it was we were doing, it would not be called research, would it? -Albert Einstein
If we make peaceful revolution impossible, we make violent revolution inevitable. -John F. Kennedy, 35th US president (1917-1963)
If we were to wake up some morning and find that everyone was the same race, creed and color, we would find some other cause for prejudice by noon. -George D. Aiken, US senator (1892-1984)
If words are to enter men's minds and bear fruit, they must be the right words shaped cunningly to pass men's defenses and explode silently and effectually within their minds. -J.B. Phillips
If you always give You will always have. -Chinese Proverb
If you are afraid of being lonely, don't try to be right. -Jules Renard, writer (1864-1910)
If you are having trouble keeping your head above water, you probably aren't on your toes. -Liguorian
If you are out to describe the truth, leave elegance to the tailor. -Albert Einstein (1879-1955)
If you are planning for one year, grow rice. If you are planning for 20 years, grow trees. If you are planning for centuries, grow men. -Chinese proverb
If you aspire to the highest place it is no disgrace to stop at the second, or even the third. -Marcus Tullius Cicero (106-43 BCE)
If you believe the doctors, nothing is wholesome; if you believe the theologians, nothing is innocent; if you believe the military, nothing is safe. -Lord Salisbury, British prime minister(1830-1903)
If you board the wrong train, it's no use running along the corridor in the other direction. -Dietrich Bonhoeffer
If you break your neck, if you have nothing to eat, if your house is on fire - then you got a problem. Everything else is inconvenience. -Robert Fulghum
If you bungle raising your children, I don't think whatever else you do well matters very much. -Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis
If you came and you found a strange man... teaching your kids to punch each other, or trying to sell them all kinds of products, you'd kick him right out of the house, but here you are; you come in and the TV is on, and you don't think twice about it. -Jerome Singer, psychology professor
If you can persuade your customer to tattoo your name on their chest, they probably will not switch brands. -an Indiana University professor (Re: Harley-Davidson owners)
If you can spend a perfectly useless afternoon in a perfectly useless manner, you have learned how to live. -Lin Yutang
If you can't be replaced, you can't be promoted.
If you chase two rabbits, you will lose them both.
If you consult enough experts, you can confirm any opinion.
If you continually give you will continually have.
If you do not tell the truth about yourself you cannot tell it about other people. -Virginia Woolf (1882-1941)
If you don't care where you are, then you ain't lost.
If you don't execute your ideas, they die. -Roger von Oech, author and consultant
If you don't find God in the next person you meet, it is a waste of time looking for him further. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
If you don't learn to laugh at troubles, you won't have anything to laugh at when you grow old. -Ed Howe
If you feel that you have both feet planted on level ground, then the university has failed you. -Robert Goheen, President, Princeton University
If you give me six lines written by the most honest man, I will find something in them to hang him. -Cardinal Richelieu (1585-1642)
If you go into a situation with nothing planned, sometimes wonderful stuff happens. -Jerry Garcia
If you hate a person, you hate something in him that is part of yourself. What isn't part of ourselves doesn't disturb us. -Herman Hesse
If you have built castles in the air, your work need not be lost; that is where they should be. Now put foundations under them. -Thoreau
If you have knowledge, let others light their candles in it. -Margaret Fuller, author (1810-1850)
If you judge, investigate. -Seneca
If you must cry over spilled milk then please try to condense it.
If you must play, decide on three things at the start: the rules of the game, the stakes, and the quitting time. -Chinese Proverb
If you pick up a starving dog and make him prosperous, he will not bite you. This is the principal difference between a dog and a man. -Mark Twain [Puddin'head Wilson]
If you put a chain around the neck of a slave, the other end fastens itself around your own. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
If you refuse to accept anything but the best you very often get it.
If you think education is expensive, try ignorance. -Derek Bok
If you think education is expensive, try ignorance. -Derek Bok, President, Harvard University
If you think you can do a thing or think you can't do a thing, you're right. -Henry Ford
If you torture data sufficiently, it will confess to almost anything. -Fred Menger, chemistry professor (1937- )
If you want anything done well, do it yourself. This is why most people laugh at their own jokes. -Bob Edwards
If you want creative workers, give them enough time to play. -John Cleese, comic actor (1939- )
If you want good service, then serve yourself. -Spanish Proverb
If you want others to be happy, practice compassion. If you want to be happy, practice compassion. -Dalai Lama
If you want something really important to be done you must not merely satisfy the reason, you must move the heart also. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
If you want to build a ship, don't drum up people together to collect wood and don't assign them tasks and work, but rather teach them to long for the endless immensity of the sea. -Antoine de Saint-Exupery
If you want to get rid of somebody, just tell them something for their own good. -Kin Hubbard
If you want to know what God thinks of money, just look at the people he gave it to. -Dorothy Parker 
If you want total security, go to prison. There you're fed, clothed, given medical care and so on. The only thing lacking... is freedom. -Dwight D. Eisenhower, U.S. general and 34th president (1890-1969)
If you want truly to understand something, try to change it. -Kurt Lewin
If you want your children to turn out well, spend twice as much time with them, and half as much money. -Abigail Van Buren, advice columnist (1918- )
If you want your eggs hatched, sit on them yourself. -Haitian proverb
If you wish to make an apple pie truly from scratch, you must first invent the universe. -Carl Sagan, astronomer and writer (1934-1996)
If you would be a real seeker after truth, it is necessary that at least once in your life you doubt, as far as possible, all things. -Rene Descartes
If you would lift me up you must be on higher ground. -Ralph Waldo Emerson 
If you would not be forgotten as soon as you are gone, either write things worth reading or do things worth writing. -Benjamin Franklin (1706-1790)
If you would stand well with a great mind, leave him with a favorable impression of yourself; if with a little mind, leave him with a favorable impression of himself. -Samuel Taylor Coleridge, poet and philosopher (1772-1834)
If you're not afraid to face the music you may some day lead the band.
If you're not part of the solution, you're part of the precipitate.
If you're sending someone some Styrofoam, what do you pack it in? -Steven Wright
If...the machine of government...is of such a nature that it requires you to be the agent of injustice to another, then, I say, break the law. -Henry David Thoreau
Ignorance more frequently begets confidence than does knowledge. -Charles Darwin, naturalist and author (1809-1882)
Imagination is the eye of the soul. -Joubert (1754-1824)
Imagination is the highest kite that one can fly. -Lauren Bacall [By Myself]
Imagine a school with children that can read or write, but with teachers who can not, and you have a metaphor of the Information Age in which we live. -Peter Cochrane
Imagine a school with children that can read or write, but with teachers who cannot, and you have a metaphor of the Information Age in which we live. -Peter Cochrane
Impiety, n. Your irreverence toward my deity. -Ambrose Bierce, writer (1842-1914) [The Devil's Dictionary, 1906]
In America, anybody can be president. That's one of the risks you take. -Adlai Stevenson, statesman (1900-1965)
In a consumer society there are inevitably two kinds of slaves: the prisoners of addiction and the prisoners of envy. -Ivan Illich, priest (1926-2002)
In a democracy dissent is an act of faith. Like medicine, the test of its value is not in its taste, but in its effects. -J. William Fulbright, US Senator (1905-1995)
In a perfect union the man and woman are like a strung bow. Who is to say whether the string bends the bow, or the bow tightens the string? -Cyril Connolly, critic and editor (1903-1974)
In a time of drastic change it is the learners who inherit the future. The learned usually find themselves equipped to live in a world that no longer exists. -Eric Hoffer, philosopher and author (1902-1983)
In all affairs it's a healthy thing now and then to hang a question mark on the things you have long taken for granted. -Bertrand Russell (1872-1970)
In all of us, even in good men, there is a lawless wild-beast nature, which peers out in sleep. -Socrates, philosopher (469?-399 BCE)
In death the many become one; in life the one become many. -Rabindranath Tagore (1861-1941)
In every man's heart there is a secret nerve that answers to the vibrations of beauty. -Christopher Morley
In every work of genius we recognize our own rejected thoughts: they come back to us with a certain alienated majesty. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
In everyone's life, at some time, our inner fire goes out. It is then burst into flame by an encounter with another human being. We should all be thankful for those people who rekindle the inner spirit. -Albert Schweitzer, philosopher, physician, and musician (1875-1965)
In giving advice, seek to help, not please, a friend. -Solon
In great matters men show themselves as they wish to be seen; in small matters, as they are. -Gamaliel Bradford
In matters of conscience, the law of majority has no place. -Mohandas K. Gandhi
In matters of conscience, the law of majority has no place. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi
In matters of conscience, the law of majority has no place. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (1869-1948)
In nature there are neither rewards nor punishments; there are consequences. -Robert Green Ingersoll, lawyer and orator (1833-1899)
In nothing do men approach so nearly to the gods as in doing good to men. -Marcus Cicero
In order for something to become clean, something else must become dirty. -Imbesi's Law of Conservation of Filth
In order that people may be happy in their work, these three things are needed: they must be fit for it; they must not do too much of it; and they must have a sense of success in it. -John Ruskin, author, art critic, and social reformer (1819-1900)
In order to form an immaculate member of a flock of sheep one must, above all, be a sheep. -Albert Einstein (1879-1955)
In order to see birds its is necessary to become a part of the silence. -Robert Lynd
In questions of science, the authority of a thousand is not worth the humble reasoning of a single individual. -Galileo Galilei, physicist and astronomer (1564-1642)
In rivers, the water that you touch is the last of what has passed and the first of that which comes; so with present time. -Leonardo da Vinci, painter, engineer, musician, and scientist (1452-1519)
In science it often happens that scientists say, "You know that's a really good argument; my position is mistaken," and then they would actually change their minds and you never hear that old view from them again. They really do it. It doesn't happen as often as it should, because scientists are human and change is sometimes painful. But it happens every day. I cannot recall the last time something like that happened in politics or religion. -Carl Sagan, astronomer and writer (1934-1996)
In seeking wisdom, the first step is silence, the second listening, the third remembering, the fourth practicing, the fifth -- teaching others. -Ibn Gabirol, poet and philosopher (c. 1022-1058)
In skating over thin ice, our safety is in our speed. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
In solitude, when we are least alone. -Lord Byron, poet (1788-1824)
In the faces of men and women I see God. -Walt Whitman, poet (1819-1892)
In the first place, God created idiots. That was for practice. Then he made school boards. -Mark Twain
In the midst of great joy, do not promise anyone anything. In the midst of great anger, do not answer anyone's letter. -Chinese proverb
In the mountains of truth you never climb in vain. -Friedrich Nietzsche, philosopher (1844-1900)
In the ordinary business of life, industry can do anything which genius can do, and very many things which it cannot. -Henry Beecher (1813-1887)
In the presence of eternity, the mountains are as transient as the clouds. -Robert Green Ingersoll, lawyer and orator (1833-1899)
In the province of the mind, what one believes to be true either is true or becomes true. -John Lilly
In the world there is nothing more submissive and weak than water. Yet for attacking that which is hard and strong nothing can surpass it. -Lao Tzu 
In theory, there is no difference between theory and practice; In practice, there is. -Chuck Reid
In this world, you must be a bit too kind to be kind enough. -Pierre Carlet de Chamblain de Marivaux, dramatist and novelist (1688-1763)
In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on. -Robert Frost, poet (1874-1963)
In times when the government imprisons any unjustly, the true place for a just man is also the prison. -Henry David Thoreau (1817-1862)
In truth everything and everyone / Is a shadow of the Beloved, / And our seeking is His seeking / And our words are His words... / We search for Him here and there, / while looking right at Him. / Sitting by His side, we ask: / "O Beloved, where is the Beloved?" -Rumi, poet and mystic (1207-1273)
In truth you owe naught to any man. You owe all to all men. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
In war, there are no unwounded soldiers. -Jose Narosky, writer
In words as fashions the same rule will hold, / Alike fantastic if too new or old; / Be not the first by whom the new are tried, / Nor yet the last to lay the old aside. -Alexander Pope, poet (1688-1744)
Industry is the soul of business and the keystone of prosperity. -Charles Dickens
Infidel, n. In New York, one who does not believe in the Christian religion; in Constantinople, one who does. -Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914), [The Devil's Dictionary, 1906]
Innovation is hard to schedule. -Dan Fylstra
Inside my empty bottle I was constructing a lighthouse while all the others were making ships. -Charles Simic
Instead of loving your enemies, treat your friends a little better. -Edgar W. Howe
Integrity has no need of rules. -Albert Camus (1913-1960)
Intellectuals solve problems: geniuses prevent them. -Albert Einstein, physicist, Nobel laureate (1879-1955)
Internet is a good way to get on the Net. -Bob Dole
Iron rusts from disuse, stagnant water loses its purity, and in cold weather becomes frozen, even so does inaction sap the vigor of the mind. -Leonardo Da Vinci, painter, engineer, musician, and scientist (1452-1519)
Irreverence is the champion of liberty and its only sure defense. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
Is a mirage real? Well, it's a real mirage. -Edward Abbey
Is it not better to aim your spear at the moon and strike only an eagle, than to aim your spear at the eagle, and strike only a rock?
Is not every man a student, and do not all things exist for the student's behoof? -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Is not the core of nature in the heart of man? -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
Is not the core of nature in the heart of man? -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (1749-1832)
Is sloppiness in speech caused by ignorance or apathy? I don't know and I don't care. -William Safire
Is this true or only -Augustine Birrell
Is this true or only clever? -Augustine Birrell
Isn't Disney World a People Trap Operated by a Mouse? -Steven Wright
It (death) comes equally to us all, and makes us all equal when it comes. -John Donne, poet (1573-1631)
It (marriage) may be compared to a cage, the birds without try desperately to get in, and those within try desperately to get out. -Michel de Montaigne, essayist (1533-1592)
It does not do to leave a live dragon out of your calculations.
It has been said that a bride's attitude towards her betrothed can be summed up in three words: Aisle, Altar, Hymn. -Frank Muir & Dennis Norden
It ill becomes us to invoke in our daily prayers the blessings of God, the Compassionate, if we in turn will not practice elementary compassion towards our fellow creatures. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
It is a bit embarrassing to have been concerned with the human problem all one's life and find at the end that one has no more to offer by way of advice than "try to be a little kinder." -Aldous Huxley, novelist (1894-1963)
It is a capital mistake to theorize before one has data. Insensibly one begins to twist facts to suit theories, instead of theories to suit facts. -Arthur Conan Doyle, physician and writer (1859-1930)
It is a difficult matter to argue with the belly since it has no ears. -Cato The Elder, statesman and writer (234-149 BCE)
It is a funny thing about life: if you refuse to accept anything but the best you very often get it. -William Somerset Maugham
It is a miracle that curiosity survives formal education. -Albert Einstein
It is absurd to divide people into good and bad. People are either charming or tedious. -Oscar Wilde, writer (1854-1900)
It is always the secure who are humble. -G.K. Chesterton, essayist and novelist (1874-1936)
It is as hard for the good to suspect evil, as it is for the bad to suspect good. -Marcus Tullius Cicero, statesman, orator, writer (106-43 BCE)
It is as impossible to translate poetry as it is to translate music. -Voltaire, writer (1694-1778)
It is bad luck to be superstitious. -Andrew Mathis
It is better to be roughly right than to be precisely wrong. -John Maynard Keynes
It is better to have men ask why you have no statue, than why you have one.
It is better to suffer wrong than to do it, and happier to be sometimes cheated than not to trust. -Samuel Johnson
It is chiefly through books that we enjoy intercourse with superior minds. -William Ellery Channing, clergyman and writer (1780-1842)
It is criminal to steal a purse, daring to steal a fortune, a mark of greatness to steal a crown. The blame diminishes as the guilt increases. -Johan Christoph Friedrich von Schiller, poet and dramatist (1759-1805)
It is curious that physical courage should be so common in the world and moral courage so rare. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
It is dangerous to be right when the government is wrong. -Voltaire (1694-1778)
It is dangerous to be right when the government is wrong. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
It is difficult to begin without borrowing, but perhaps it is the most generous course thus to permit your fellow-men to have an interest in your enterprise. -Henry David Thoreau [Walden]
It is difficult to believe that someone can differ from us and be right.
It is difficult to get a man to understand something when his salary depends upon his not understanding it. -Upton Sinclair, novelist and reformer (1878-1968)
It is difficult to get the news from poems yet men die miserably every day for lack of what is found there. -William Carlos Williams (1883-1963)
It is difficult to say what is impossible, for the dream of yesterday is the hope of today and the reality of tomorrow. -Robert H. Goddard
It is easier to buy books than to read them, and easier to read them than to absorb them. -William Osler, physician (1849-1919)
It is easier to exclude harmful passions than to rule them, and to deny them admittance than to control them after they have been admitted. -Lucius Annaeus Seneca, philosopher and writer (c. 3 BCE - CE 65)
It is easier to fight for one's principles than to live up to them. -Alfred Adler (1870-1937)
It is easier to get forgiveness than permission. -Cecile Stewart
It is easy enough to be friendly to one's friends. But to befriend the one who regards himself as your enemy is the quintessence of true religion. The other is mere business. -Mohandas K. Gandhi (1869-1948)
It is easy in the world to live after the world's opinion, it is easy in solitude to live after your own; but the great man is he who, in the midst of the world, keeps with perfect sweetness the independence of solitude. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
It is far more impressive when others discover your good qualities without your help. -Judith S. Martin
It is forbidden to kill; therefore all murderers are punished unless they kill in large numbers and to the sound of trumpets. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
It is good to rub and polish our brain against that of others. -Michel De Montaigne
It is horrifying that we have to fight our own government to save the environment. -Ansel Adams, photographer (1902-1984)
It is important that students bring a certain ragamuffin, barefoot, irreverence to their studies; they are not here to worship what is known, but to question it. -J. Bronowski [The Ascent of Man]
It is impossible to enjoy idling thoroughly unless one has plenty of work to do. -Jerome K. Jerome
It is impossible to live pleasurably without living prudently, honorably, and justly; or to live prudently, honorably, and justly, without living pleasurably. -Epicurus (BCE 341-270)
It is in deep solitude that I find the gentleness with which I can truly love my brothers. The more solitary I am the more affection I have for them. Solitude and silence teach me to love my brothers for what they are, not for what they say. -Thomas Merton, writer (1915-1968)
It is in vain to hope to please all alike. Let a man stand with his face in what direction he will, he must necessarily turn his back on one half of the world. -George Dennison Prentice
It is inaccurate to say I hate everything. I am strongly in favor of common sense, common honesty, and common decency. This makes me forever ineligible for public office. -H.L. Mencken, writer, editor, and critic (1880-1956)
It is man's sympathy with all creatures that first makes him truly a man. -Albert Schweitzer
It is more shameful to distrust one's friends than to be deceived by them. -De la Rochefoucauld, writer (1613-1680)
It is my ambition to say in ten sentences what others say in a whole book. -Friedrich Nietzsche (1844-1900)
It is never the shallower for the calmnesse. The Sea is a deepe, there is as much water in the Sea, in a calme, as in a storme. -John Donne, poet (1573-1631)
It is not always the same thing to be a good man and a good citizen. -Aristotle, philosopher (384-322 BCE)
It is not because things are difficult that we do not dare, it is because we do not dare that they are difficult. -Seneca
It is not because things are difficult that we do not dare; it is because we do not dare that they are difficult. -Seneca
It is not enough to be busy, so are the ants. The question is: what are we busy about? -Henry David Thoreau
It is not enough to have a good mind. The main thing is to use it well. -Rene Descartes (1596-1650)
It is not important what you believe, only that you believe.
It is not necessarily true that averaging the averages of different populations gives the average of the combined population. -Simpson's Paradox
It is not only for what we do that we are held responsible, but also for what we do not do. -Moliere
It is not so much our friends' help that helps us as the confident knowledge that they will help us. -Epicurus, Greek philosopher (341-270 BCE)
It is not the mountain we conquer but ourselves. -Edmund Hillary, mountaineer and explorer (1919- )
It is not the strongest of the species that survive, nor the most intelligent, but the one most responsive to change. -Charles Darwin, naturalist and author (1809-1882)
It is not what we do, but also what we do not do, for which we are accountable. -Moliere, actor and playwright (1622-1673)
It is not worth an intelligent man's time to be in the majority. By definition, there are already enough people to do that. -G. H. Hardy
It is of interest to note that while some dolphins are reported to have learned English -- up to fifty words used in correct context -- no human being has been reported to have learned dolphinese. -Carl Sagan, astronomer and writer (1934-1996)
It is often better not to see an insult than to avenge it.
It is often forgotten that (dictionaries) are artificial repositories, put together well after the languages they define. The roots of language are irrational and of a magical nature. -Jorge Luis Borges, writer (1899-1986)
It is one of the blessings of old friends that you can afford to be stupid with them. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
It is one of the commonest of mistakes to consider that the limit of our power of perception is also the limit of all there is to perceive. -C.W. Leadbeater
It is one of the most beautiful compensations of this life that no man can sincerely try to help another without helping himself. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
It is only possible to live happily ever after on a day to day basis. -Margaret Bonnano
It is only the wisest and the stupidest that cannot change. -Confucius Analects
It is only those who have neither fired a shot nor heard the shrieks and groans of the wounded who cry aloud for blood, more vengeance, more desolation. War is hell. -William Tecumseh Sherman, Union General in the American Civil War (1820-1891)
It is only when the rich are sick that they fully feel the impotence of wealth. -Charles Caleb Colton, author and clergyman (1780-1832)
It is only when we forget all our learning that we begin to know. -Henry David Thoreau (1817-1862)
It is our duty as men and women to proceed as though the limits of our abilities do not exist. -Pierre Teilhard de Chardin
It is our relation to circumstances that determines their influence over us. The same wind that carries one vessel into port may blow another off shore. -Christian Bovee
It is paradoxical that many educators and parents still differentiate between a time for learning and a time for play without seeing the vital connection between them. -Leo Buscaglia, author (1924-1998)
It is preoccupation with possessions, more than anything else, that prevents us from living freely and nobly. -Bertrand Russell
It is proof of a base and low mind for one to wish to think with the masses or majority, merely because the majority is the majority. Truth does not change because it is, or is not, believed by a majority of the people. -Giordano Bruno
It is said an Eastern monarch once charged his wise men to invent him a sentence to be ever in view, and which should be true and appropriate in all times and situations. They presented him the words: "And this, too, shall pass away." How much it expresses! How chastening in the hour of pride! How consoling in the depths of affliction! -Abraham Lincoln, 16th U.S. President (1809-1865)
It is surprising what a man can do when he has to, and how little most men will do when they don't have to. -Walter Linn, businessman (1878-1961)
It is the characteristic of the most stringent censorships that they give credibility to the opinions they attack. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
It is the chiefest point of happiness that a man is willing to be what he is. -Desiderius Erasmus
It is the customary fate of new truths to begin as heresies and to end as superstitions. -T.H. Huxley
It is the final proof of God's omnipotence that he need not exist in order to save us. -Peter De Vries, novelist (1910-1993)
It is the first of all problems for a man to find out what kind of work he is to do in this universe. -Thomas Carlyle
It is the greatest of all advantages to enjoy no advantage at all. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it. -Aristotle
It is unwise to be too sure of one's own wisdom. It is healthy to be reminded that the strongest might weaken and the wisest might err. -Mohandas K. Gandhi (1869-1948)
It is well to remember that the entire universe, with one trifling exception, is composed of others. -John Andrew Holmes
It is what we learn after we know it all that really counts.
It isn't pollution that's harming the environment. It's the impurities in our air and water that are doing it. -Dan Quayle
It isn't that they can't see the solution. It's that they can't see the problem. -G.K. Chesterton
It often happens that those of whom we speak least on earth are best known in heaven. -Nicolas Caussin, preacher and moralist (1583-1651)
It often shows an excellent command of language to say nothing. -Karol Newlin
It seems to me that those songs that have been any good, I have nothing much to do with the writing of them. The words have just crawled down my sleeve and come out on the page. -Joan Baez
It sometimes seems that intense desire creates not only its own opportunities, but its own talents. -Eric Hoffer
It takes a lot of time to be a genius, you have to sit around so much doing nothing, really doing nothing. -Gertrude Stein
It takes only one person to change your life - you. -Ruth Casey
It takes two to speak the truth: one to speak, and another to hear. -Henry David Thoreau (1817-1862)
It would indeed be ironic if, in the name of national defense, we would sanction the subversion of one of those liberties which make the defense of our nation worthwhile. -Earl Warren, jurist (1891-1974)
It's a poor sort of memory that only works backward. -Lewis Carroll, mathematician and writer (1832-1898)
It's a poor sort of memory that only works backwards. -Lewis Carroll, mathematician and writer (1832-1898)
It's a shallow life that doesn't give a person a few scars. -Garrison Keillor, radio host and author (1942- )
It's all right to have butterflies in your stomach. Just get them to fly in formation. -Dr. Rob Gilbert
It's all right to tell a man to lift himself by his own bootstraps, but it is a cruel jest to say to a bootless man that he ought to lift himself by his own bootstraps. -Martin Luther King, Jr. (1929-1968)
It's better to be an optimist and a fool than a pessimist and right.
It's difficult to be depressed while you're doing something.
It's difficult to wake one who is only pretending to be asleep. -Tagalog saying
It's easy to tell when a politician is lying. Watch his lips. If they move, he's lying. -Charles Lyall
It's not a matter of where you stand but in what direction you're headed.
It's not that I'm afraid to die; I just don't want to be there when it happens. -Woody Allen
It's not the load that breaks you down - it's the way you carry it.
It's not the load that breaks you down - its the way you carry it.
It's splendid to be a great writer, to put men into the frying pan of your imagination and make them pop like chestnuts. -Gustave Flaubert, novelist (1821-1880)
It's time for the human race to enter the solar system. -Dan Quayle, Former U.S. Vice President (1947-) [on the concept of a manned mission to Mars]
It's wonderful to be here in the great state of Chicago. -Dan Quayle
Jack the Ripper excused himself on the grounds that what he did was human nature -A.A. Milne
Journalism is merely history's first draft. -Geoffrey C. Ward
Journalism will kill you, but it will keep you alive while you are at it.
Judge not the horse by his saddle. -Chinese Proverb 
Jumping to conclusions can be a bad exercise.
Just as a cautious businessman avoids tying up all his capital in one concern, so, perhaps, worldly wisdom will advise us not to look for the whole of our satisfaction from a single aspiration. -Sigmund Freud (1856-1939)
Just as appetite comes by eating so work brings inspiration. -Igor Stravinsky, composer (1882-1971)
Just as appetite comes by eating, so work brings inspiration, if inspiration is not discernible at the beginning. -Igor Stravinsky, composer (1882-1971)
Just because you do not take an interest in politics doesn't mean politics won't take an interest in you. -Pericles, statesman (430 BCE)
Just remember--when you think all is lost, the future remains. -Bob Goddard
Just think of what Einstein could have accomplished if he had not dropped out of school.
Just trust yourself, then you will know how to live. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (1749-1832)
Keep away from people who try to belittle your ambitions. Small people always do that, but the really great make you feel that you, too, can become great. -Mark Twain
Keep away from people who try to belittle your ambitions. Small people always do that, but the really great make you feel that you, too, can become great. -Mark Twain, U.S. Author (1835-1910)
Keep me away from the wisdom which does not cry, the philosophy which does not laugh and the greatness which does not bow before children. -Kahlil Gibran, mystic, poet and artist (1883-1931)
Keep your faith in all beautiful things; in the sun when it is hidden, in the Spring when it is gone. -Roy R. Gilson
Kindness in ourselves is the honey that blunts the sting of unkindness in another. -Walter Savage Landor (1775-1864)
Kindness in words creates confidence. Kindness in thinking creates profoundness. Kindness in giving creates love. -Lao Tzu, philosopher (6th century BCE)
Kindness is in our power, even when fondness is not. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
Kindness is loving people more than they deserve. -Joseph Joubert, essayist (1754-1824)
Kindness is the golden chain by which society is bound together. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, poet, dramatist, novelist, and philosopher (1749-1832)
Kindness makes a fellow feel good whether it's being done to him or by him. -Frank A. Clark
Kings have long arms, but misfortune longer; let none think themselves out of reach. -Ben Fanklin
Kings stand more in need of the company of the intelligent than the intelligent do of the society of kings. -Saadi, poet (1184-1291) [Gulistan]
Klein bottle for rent; enquire within.
Knowing all truth is less than doing a little bit of good. -Albert Schweitzer [The Thoughts of Albert Schweitzer]
Knowing ignorance is strength; ignoring knowledge is sickness. -Lao-Tzu, philosopher (6th century BCE)
Knowing is not enough; we must apply. Willing is not enough; we must do. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (1749-1832)
Knowing others is intelligence; knowing yourself is true wisdom. Mastering others is strength, mastering yourself is true power. -Lao-Tzu, philosopher (6th century BCE)
Knowing trees, I understand the meaning of patience. Knowing grass, I can appreciate persistence. -Hal Borland, journalist (1900-1978)
Knowledge is a process of piling up facts; wisdom lies in their simplification. -Martin H. Fischer
Labor to keep alive in your breast that little spark of celestial fire called conscience. -George Washington, 1st US president (1732-1799)
Language exerts hidden power, like a moon on the tides. -Rita Mae Brown, writer (1944- )
Language is a city to the building of which every human being brought a stone. -Emerson [Letters and Social Aims]
Language is an archeological vehicle... the language we speak is a whole palimpsest of human effort and history. -Russell Hoban [Novelists in Interview]
Language is not neutral. It is not merely a vehicle which carries ideas. It is itself a shaper of ideas. -Dale Spender, writer (1943- )
Laugh when you can; cry when you must.
Laughter is inner jogging. -Norman Cousins, editor and author (1915-1990)
Laughter is the closest thing to the grace of God. -Karl Barth
Law...begins when someone takes to doing something someone else does not like. -Karl Llewellyn
Laws are the spider's webs which, if anything small falls into them they ensnare it, but large things break through and escape. -Solon, statesman (c. 638-c558 BCE)
Laziness is no more than the habit of resting before you get tired. -Jules Renard
Lazlo's Chinese Relativity Axiom: No matter how great your triumphs or how tragic your defeats, approximately one billion Chinese couldn't care less.
Lead me not into temptation. I can find it myself.
Leadership is getting someone to do what they don't want to do in order to achieve what they want to achieve. -Tom Landry
Leadership is getting someone to do what they don't want to do, to achieve what they want to achieve. -Tom Landry
Learn to pause--or nothing worthwhile can catch up to you.
Learning is acquired by reading books; but the much more necessary learning, the knowledge of the world, is only to be acquired by reading man, and studying all the various editions of them. -Lord Chesterfield, statesman and writer (1694-1773)
Learning is like rowing upstream: not to advance is to drop back. -Chinese proverb
Let advertisers spend the same amount of money improving their product that they do on advertising and they wouldn't have to advertise it. -Will Rogers
Let early education be a sort of amusement, you will then better be able to find out the natural bent of the child. -Plato, philosopher (427-347 BCE)
Let him that would move the world, first move himself. -Socrates
Let me tell you the secret that has led me to my goal. My strength lies solely in my tenacity. -Louis Pasteur, chemist and bacteriologist (1822-1895)
Let proportion be found not only in numbers and measures, but also in sounds, weights, times, and positions, and what ever force there is. -Leonardo Da Vinci, painter, engineer, musician, and scientist (1452-1519)
Let this be an example for the acquisition of all knowledge, virtue, and riches. By the fall of drops of water, by degrees, a pot is filled. -The Hitopadesa
Let us be of good cheer, remembering that the misfortunes hardest to bear are those which never happen. -James Russell Lowell (1819-1891)
Let us read and let us dance - two amusements that will never do any harm to the world. -Voltaire
Let us so live that when we come to die even the undertaker will be sorry. -Mark Twain
Let us so live that when we come to die even the undertaker will be sorry. -Mark Twain, U.S. Author (1835-1910)
Let your life lightly dance on the edges of Time like dew on the tip of a leaf. -Rabindranath Tagore, Indian Poet (1861-1941)
Letter writing is the only device for combining solitude with good company. -George Gordon Byron, poet (1788-1824)
Liberty is given by nature even to mute animals. -Publius Cornelius Tacitus, historian (55-117)
Liberty is the possibility of doubting, the possibility of making a mistake, the possibility of searching and experimenting, the possibility of saying No to any authority - literary, artistic, philosophic, religious, social, and even political. -Ignazio Silone, author (1900-1978)
Library: A place where the dead lie. -Elbert Hubbard, author, editor, printer (1856-1915) [The Roycroft Dictionary]
Life begets life. Energy creates energy. It is by spending oneself that one becomes rich. -Sarah Bernhardt
Life consists not in holding good cards but in playing those you hold well. -Josh Billings, columnist and humorist (1818-1885)
Life is a comedy for those who think and a tragedy for those who feel.
Life is a great big canvas, and you should throw all the paint on it you can. -Danny Kaye
Life is a long lesson in humility. -James M. Barrie, novelist, short-story writer, and playwright (1860-1937)
Life is a long lesson in humility. -James M. Barrie, writer (1860-1937)
Life is a series of collisions with the future; it is not the sum of what we have been, but what we yearn to be. -Jose Ortega y Gasset
Life is all memory, except for the one present moment that goes by so quick you hardly catch it going. -Tennessee Williams
Life is an adventure in forgiveness. -Norman Cousins, author and editor (1915-1990)
Life is an exciting business, and most exciting when it is lived for others. -Helen Adams Keller (1880-1968)
Life is either a daring adventure or it is nothing. -Helen Adams Keller (1880-1968)
Life is life--whether in a cat, or dog or man. There is no difference there between a cat or a man. The idea of difference is a human conception for man's own advantage. -Sri Aurobindo
Life is like a dog-sled team. If you ain't the lead dog, the scenery never changes. -Lewis Grizzard
Life is like a landscape. You live in the midst of it, but can describe it only from the vantage point of distance. -Charles A. Lindbergh (1902-1974)
Life is like a library owned by an author. In it are a few books which he wrote himself, but most of them were written for him. -Harry Emerson Fosdick, preacher and author (1878-1969)
Life is like a ten-speed bike. Most of us have gears we never use. -Charles Schulz, cartoonist (1922-2000)
Life is like music, it must be composed by ear, feeling and instinct, not by rule. Nevertheless one had better know the rules, for they sometimes guide in doubtful cases, though not often. -Samuel Butler (1612-1680)
Life is mostly froth and bubble, / Two things stand like stone, / Kindness in another's trouble, / Courage in your own. -Adam Lindsay Gordon, poet (1833-1870)
Life is not a static thing. The only people who do not change their minds are incompetents in asylums, who can't are those in cemeteries. -Everett Dirksen
Life is not so much a matter of position as of disposition.
Life is painting a picture, not doing a sum. -Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr.
Life is pleasant. Death is peaceful. It's the transition that's troublesome. -Isaac Asimov, science-fiction writer (1920-1992)
Life is the childhood of our immortality. -Goethe (1749-1832)
Life is too confusing for novices. We should let the experts take care of it.
Life is too important to be taken seriously. -Oscar Wilde
Life shrinks or expands in proportion to one's courage. -Anais Nin
Life without industry is guilt, industry without art is brutality. -John Ruskin, author, art critic, and social reformer (1819-1900)
Life's greatest happiness is to be convinced we are loved. -Victor Hugo, poet, novelist, and dramatist (1802-1885)
Life's most urgent question is: what are you doing for others? -Martin Luther King, Jr.
Life's most urgent question is: what are you doing for others? -Martin Luther King, Jr. (1929-1968)
Life: a spiritual pickle preserving the body from decay. -Ambrose Bierce
Like a force of nature/Love can fade with the stars at dawn. -N. Peart
Listen or thy tongue will keep thee deaf. -American Indian Proverb
Literature is my Utopia. Here I am not disenfranchised. No barrier of the sense shuts me out from the sweet, gracious discourse of my book friends. They talk to me without embarrassment or awkwardness. -Helen Adams Keller, lecturer and author (1880-1968)
Litigant: a person about to give up his skin for the hope of retaining his bones. -Ambrose Bierce
Little Strokes, Fell great Oaks. -Benjamin Franklin, statesman, author, and inventor (1706-1790)
Live a balanced life - Learn some and think some, and draw and paint and sing and dance and play and work every day some. -Robert Fulghum, author (1937- )
Live as you will have wished to have lived when you are dying. -Christian Furchtegott Gellert
Live in such a way that you would not be ashamed to sell your parrot to the town gossip. -Will Rogers
Live your life as an exclamation, not an explanation.
Living on Earth includes an annual free trip around the Sun.
Look after the molehills and the mountains will take care of themselves.
Look at everthing as though you were seeing it either for the first or last time. Then your time on earth will be filled with glory. -Betty Smith
Lots of folks confuse bad management with destiny. -Kin Hubbard
Lots of people know a good thing the minute the other fellow sees it first. -Job E. Hedges
Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none. -Shakespeare
Love does not consist in gazing at each other, but in looking outward together in the same direction. -Antoine de Saint-Exupery
Love is an act of endless forgiveness, a tender look which becomes a habit. -Peter Ustinov, actor, writer and director (1921- )
Love is like an hourglass, with the heart filling up as the brain empties. -Jules Renard, writer (1864-1910)
Love is like quicksilver in the hand. Leave the fingers open and it stays. Clutch it, and it darts away. -Dorothy Parker, author (1893-1967)
Love is like war; easy to begin but very hard to stop. -H.L. Mencken, writer, editor, and critic (1880-1956)
Love is never lost. If not reciprocated, it will flow back and soften and purify the heart. -Washington Irving, writer (1783-1859)
Love is sunshine, hate is shadow, Life is checkered shade and sunshine. -Longfellow (1807-1882)
Love is the triumph of imagination over intelligence.
Love is the triumph of imagination over intelligence. -Oscar Wilde
Love me or hate me, but spare me your indifference. -Libbie Fudim
Love your enemies because they bring out the best in you. -Friedrich Nietzsche
Love your enemies. It will make them crazy.
Love: a temporary insanity, curable by marriage. -Ambrose Bierce
Loyalty to a petrified opinion never yet broke a chain or freed a human soul. -Mark Twain, U.S. Author (1835-1910)
Luck never gives; it only lends. -Swedish proverb
Make a firm decision now... you can always change it later.
Make me, oh God, the prey of the lion, ere You make the rabbit my prey. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Make things as simple as possible, but not simpler. -Albert Einstein
Making the decision to have a child is momentous -- it is to decide forever to have your heart go walking around outside your body. -Elizabeth Stone
Man and his deed are two distinct things. Whereas a good deed should call forth approbation, and a wicked deed disapprobation, the doer of the deed, whether good or wicked always deserves respect or pity as the case may be. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
Man discovers his own wealth when God comes to ask gifts of him. -Rabindranath Tagore (1861-1941)
Man is an intelligence in servitude to his organs. -Aldous Huxley
Man is born to live, not to prepare to live. -Boris Pasternak
Man is by nature an artist. -Tagore
Man is certainly stark mad: he cannot make a flea, yet he makes gods by the dozens. -Montaigne
Man is condemned to be free; because once thrown into the world, he is responsible for everything he does. -Jean-Paul Sartre, writer and philosopher (1905-1980)
Man is harder than iron, stronger than stone and more fragile than a rose. -Turkish proverb
Man is most nearly himself when he achieves the seriousness of a child at play. -Heraclitus, Greek philosopher (500 BCE)
Man is not the creature of circumstances. Circumstances are the creatures of men. -Benjamin Disraeli
Man is so made that he can only find relaxation from one kind of labor by taking up another. -Anatole France, novelist, essayist, Nobel laureate (1844-1924)
Man is the only animal that can remain on friendly terms with the victims he intends to eat until he eats them. -Samuel Butler, novelist, essayist, and satirist (1835-1902)
Man is unhappy because he doesn't know he's happy. If anyone finds out he'll become happy at once. -Dostoyevsky
Man was born free, and everywhere he is in chains. -Jean Jacques Rousseau (1712-1778)
Man who falls in vat of molten optical glass makes spectacle of self.
Man's life does not commence in the womb and never ends in the grave. -Charan Singh, mystic (1916-1990)
Man's mind stretched to a new idea never goes back to its original dimensions.  -Oliver Wendell Holmes
Man's mind stretched to a new idea never goes back to its original dimensions. -Oliver Wendell Holmes
Man: a reasoning rather than a reasonable animal. -Alexander Hamilton
Many a doctrine is like a window pane. We see truth through it but it divides us from truth. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931)
Many a man fails to become a thinker for the sole reason that his memory is too good. -Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche, German philosopher (1844-1900)
Many a man thinks he is buying pleasure, when he is really selling himself to it. -Benjamin Franklin (1706-1790)
Many a man's reputation would not know his character if they met on the street. -Elbert Hubbard
Many a man's tongue broke his nose. -Seumas MacManus
Many candles can be kindled from one candle without diminishing it. -The Midrash
Many highly intelligent people are poor thinkers. Many people of average intelligence are skilled thinkers. The power of the car is separate from the way the car is driven. -Edward De Bono, consultant, writer, and speaker (1933- )
Many ideas grow better when transplanted into another mind than in the one where they sprang up. -Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr., US Supreme Court Justice (1841-1935)
Many individuals have, like uncut diamonds, shining qualities beneath a rough exterior. - Juvenal, poet (c. 60-140)
Many live in the ivory tower called reality; they never venture on the open sea of thought. -Francois Gautier, journalist (1950- )
Many men go fishing all of their lives without knowing that it is not fish they are after. -Henry David Thoreau
Many people hear voices when no-one is there. Some of them are called mad and are shut up in rooms where they stare at the walls all day. Others are called writers and they do pretty much the same thing. -Margaret Chittenden, writer (1935- )
Many people take no care of their money till they come nearly to the end of it, and others do just the same with their time. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, poet, dramatist, novelist, and philosopher (1749-1832)
Many wealthy people are little more than janitors of their possessions. -Frank Lloyd Wright, architect (1867-1959)
Marriage is the only adventure open to the cowardly. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
Marriage: a book of which the first chapter is written in poetry and the remaining chapters written in prose. -Beverly Nichols, author
Math anxiety: an intense lifelong fear of two trains approaching each other at speeds of 60 and 80 MPH. -Rick Bayan
Mathematics is the language with which God has written the universe. -Galileo Galilei, physicist and astronomer (1564-1642)
May none but honest and wise men ever rule under this roof (White House). -John Adams, 2nd US President, and the first one to live in the White House (1735-1826)
May you live all the days of your life. -Jonathan Swift
May you live in interesting times. -Ancient Chinese Curse
May you live your life as if the maxim of your actions were to become universal law. -Kant
May your trails be crooked, winding, lonesome, dangerous, leading to the most amazing view. May your mountains rise into and above the clouds. -Edward Abbey, naturalist and author (1927-1989)
Maybe this world is another planet's Hell. -Aldous Huxley, novelist (1894-1963)
Memory moderates prosperity, decreases adversity, controls youth and delights old age. -Lactantius Firmianus
Men are equal; it is not birth but virtue that makes the difference. -Voltaire
Men are men before they are lawyers, or physicians, or merchants, or manufacturers; and if you make them capable and sensible men, they will make themselves capable and sensible lawyers or physicians. -John Stuart Mill, philosopher and economist (1806-1873)
Men are not against you; they are merely for themselves. -Gene Fowler
Men are often capable of greater things than they perform. They are sent into the world with bills of credit, and seldom draw to their full extent. -Horace Walpole, novelist and essayist (1717-1797)
Men are wise in proportion, not to their experience, but to their capacity for experience. -George Bernard Shaw
Men are wise in proportion, not to their experience, but to their capacity for experience. -George Bernard Shaw, writer, Nobel laureate (1856-1950)
Men cannot see their reflection in running water, but only in still water. -Chuang Tzu, philosopher (c. 4th century BCE)
Men govern nothing with more difficulty than their tongues, and can moderate their desires more than their words. -Spinoza
Men have become the tools of their tools. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
Men in great place are thrice servants: servants of the sovereign or state; servants of fame; and servants of business. -Francis Bacon [Essays Or Counsels - Civil And Moral] (1561-1626)
Men make counterfeit money; in many more cases, money makes counterfeit men. -Sydney J. Harris, journalist and author (1917-1986)
Men never do evil so completely and cheerfully as when they do it from religious conviction. -Blaise Pascal, philosopher and mathematician (1623-1662)
Men of genius are often dull and inert in society, as a blazing meteor when it descends to earth, is only a stone. -Henry Wadsworth Longfellow, poet (1807-1882)
Men of lofty genius when they are doing the least work are most active. -Leonardo da Vinci
Men seek out retreats for themselves in the country, by the seaside, on the moutains... But all this is unphilosophical to the last degree... when thou canst at a moment's notice retire into thyself. -Marcus Aelius Aurelius
Men will wrangle for religion, write for it, fight for it, die for it, anything but live for it. -Charles Caleb Cotton
Millihelen: The amount of beauty required to launch one ship.
Millions long for immortality who do not know what to do with themselves on a rainy Sunday afternoon. -Susan Ertz, author (1894-1985)
Minds are like parachutes - they function only when open.
Minds, like bodies, will often fall into a pimpled, ill-conditioned state from mere excess of comfort. -Charles Dickens, novelist (1812-1870)
Miracles are great, but they are so damned unpredictable.
Mistakes are the portals of discovery. -James Joyce
Mistakes live in the neighbourhood of truth and therefore delude us. -Rabindranath Tagore
Mistakes live in the neighbourhood of truth and therefore delude us. -Rabindranath Tagore, Indian Poet (1861-1941)
Modern man thinks he loses something - time - when he does not do things quickly. Yet he does not know what to do with the time he gains -- except kill it. -Erich Fromm
Modern man thinks he loses something - time - when he does not do things quickly. Yet he does not know what to do with the time he gains --- except kill it. -Erich Fromm
Modesty is the only sure bait when you angle for praise. -Lord Chesterfield
Money is better than poverty, if only for financial reasons.
Money may be the husk of many things but not the kernel. It brings you food, but not appetite; medicine, but not health; acquaintance, but not friends; servants, but not loyalty; days of joy, but not peace or happiness. -Henrik Ibsen, playwright (1828-1906)
Money often costs too much. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Money was invented so we could know exactly how much we owe. -Cullen Hightower
Money, n. A blessing that is of no advantage to us excepting when we part with it. An evidence of culture and a passport to polite society. -Ambrose Bierce, writer (1842-1914)
Moral certainty is always a sign of cultural inferiority. The more uncivilized the man, the surer he is that he knows precisely what is right and what is wrong. All human progress, even in morals, has been the work of men who have doubted the current moral values, not of men who have whooped them up and tried to enforce them. The truly civilized man is always skeptical and tolerant, in this field as in all others. His culture is based on "I am not too sure." - H.L. Mencken, writer, editor, and critic (1880-1956)
Morality is not properly the doctrine of how we make ourselves happy, but how we make ourselves worthy of happiness. -Immanuel Kant
Morality is not properly the doctrine of how we make ourselves happy, but how we make ourselves worthy of happiness. -Kant
More die in the United States of too much food than of too little. -John Kenneth Galbraith, economist (1908- )
More people would learn from their mistakes if they weren't so busy denying they made them.
Most men pursue pleasure with such breathless haste they hurry past it. -Soren Kierkegaard, philosopher (1813-1855)
Most of us are just about as happy as we make up our minds to be. -Abraham Lincoln (1809-1865)
Most of us ask for advice when we know the answer but we want a different one. -Ivern Ball
Most people are mirrors, reflecting the moods and emotions of the times; few are windows, bringing light to bear on the dark corners where troubles fester. The whole purpose of education is to turn mirrors into windows. -Sydney J. Harris
Most people reach the top of the ladder of success only to find it is leaning against the wrong wall.
Mothers all want their sons to grow up to be president but they don't want them to become politicians in the process. -John F. Kennedy
Mr. Bullfrog sez: Time is fun when you're having flies.
Much Madness is divinest Sense / To a discerning Eye / Much Sense--the starkest Madness. -Emily Dickinson, poet (1830-1886)
Music hath charms to soothe a savage breast, To soften rocks, or bend a knotted oak. -William Congreve, dramatist (1670-1729)
Music is a higher revelation than philosophy. -Beethoven
Music is a higher revelation than philosophy. -Ludwig van Beethoven (1770-1827)
Music is the only language in which you cannot say a mean or sarcastic thing. -John Erskine
Music was invented to confirm human loneliness. -Lawrence Durrell, novelist and poet (1912-1990)
Music was my refuge. I could crawl into the spaces between the notes and curl my back to loneliness. -Maya Angelou, poet (1928- )
Music washes away from the soul the dust of everyday life. -Berthold Auerbach, German Writer (1812-1882)
My aim is to agitate and disturb people. I'm not selling bread, I'm selling yeast. -Miguel de Unamuno, writer and philosopher (1864-1936)
My country is the world, and my religion is to do good. -Thomas Paine (The rights of Man)
My faith is that the only soul a man must save is his own. -William Orville Douglas, US Supreme Court Justice (1898-1980)
My feeling is that there is nothing in life but refraining from hurting others, and comforting those who are sad. -Olive Schreiner, author (1855-1920)
My friends are my estate. -Emily Dickinson, poet (1830-1886) 
My friends, no matter how rough the road may be, we can and we will never, never surrender to what is right. -Dan Quayle
My grandfather once told me that there were two kinds of people: those who do the work and those who take the credit. He told me to try to be in the first group; there was much less competition. -Indira Gandhi
My idea of education is to unsettle the minds of the young and inflame their intellects. -Robert Maynard Hutchins
My interest is in the future because I am going to spend the rest of my life there. -Charles F. Kettering
My library / Was dukedom large enough. -William Shakespeare, poet and dramatist (1564-1616)
My loneliness was born when men praised my talkative faults and blamed my silent virtues. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
My opinions might have changed, but not the fact that I am right.
My play was a complete success. The audience was a failure. -Oscar Wilde, writer (1854-1900)
My precept to all who build, is, that the owner should be an ornament to the house, and not the house to the owner. -Cicero, statesman, orator, writer (106-43 BCE)
My soul is a broken field, plowed by pain. -Sara Teasdale, poet (1884-1933)
My theology, briefly, is that the universe was dictated but not signed. -Christopher Morley, writer (1890-1957)
My wife and I were happy for 20 years - then we met. -Rodney Dangerfield
Natural abilities are like natural plants; they need pruning by study. -Francis Bacon, essayist, philosopher, and statesman (1561-1626)
Natural ability without education has more often attained to glory and virtue than education without natural ability. -Cicero, statesman, orator, writer (106-43 B.C)
Nature does nothing uselessly. -Aristotle (384-322 BCE)
Nature is full of Genius, full of Divinity; so that not a snowflake escapes its fashioning hand. - Henry David Thoreau
Nature is trying very hard to make us succeed,  but nature does not depend on us. We are not the only experiment. -R. Buckminster Fuller, engineer, designer, and architect (1895-1983) 
Nature magically suits a man to his fortunes, by making them the fruit of his character. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
Nature never did betray the heart that loved her. -William Wordsworth (1770-1850)
Nature teaches more than she preaches. There are no sermons in stones. It is easier to get a spark out of a stone than a moral. -John Burroughs [Time and Change]
Nature teaches more than she preaches. There are no sermons in stones. It is easier to get a spark out of a stone than a moral. -John Burroughs, naturalist and writer (1837-1921)
Nature uses as little as possible of anything. -Johannes Kepler, astronomer (1571-1630)
Nature will bear the closest inspection. She invites us to lay our eye level with her smallest leaf, and take an insect view of its plain. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
Nature, Time and Patience are the three great physicians. -Bulgarian Proverb
Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power. -Abraham Lincoln
Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power. -Abraham Lincoln, U.S. president (1809-1865)
Necessity is the plea for every infringement of human freedom. It is the argument of tyrants; it is the creed of slaves. -William Pitt, British prime minister (1759-1806)
Necessity never made a good bargain. -Benjamin Franklin
Neither a lofty degree of intelligence nor imagination nor both together go to the making of genius. Love, love, love, that is the soul of genius. -Mozart
Neither genius, fame, nor love show the greatness of the soul. Only kindness can do that. -Jean Baptiste Henri Lacordaire
Never advise anyone to go to war or to marry. -Spanish Proverb
Never attribute to malice that which can be adequately explained by stupidity. -Hanlon's Razor
Never be haughty to the humble; never be humble to the haughty. -Jefferson Davis, confederate president (1808-1889)
Never bear more than one trouble at a time. Some people bear three kinds - all they have had, all they have now, and all they expect to have. -Edward Everett Hale, author (1822-1909)
Never bear more than one trouble at a time. Some people bear three kinds - all they have had, all they have now, and all they expect to have. -Edward Everett Hale, clergyman and author (1822-1909)
Never confuse motion with action. -Benjamin Franklin, statesman, author, and inventor (1706-1790)
Never cut a tree down in the wintertime. Never make a negative decision in the low time. -Robert H. Schuller
Never cut what you can untie. -Joseph Joubert
Never cut what you can untie. -Joubert (1754-1824)
Never doubt that a small group of thoughtful citizens can change the world. Indeed, it is the only thing that ever has. -Margaret Mead
Never enough time, unless you're serving it.
Never explain - your friends don't need it, and your enemies won't believe you anyhow. -Elbert Hubbard
Never forget: 2 + 2 = 5 for extremely large values of 2.
Never get so busy making a living that you forget to make a life.
Never go to a doctor whose office plants have died. -Erma Bombeck
Never idealize others. They will never live up to your expectations. -Leo Buscaglia, author, speaker and professor (1924-1998)
Never lend books -- nobody ever returns them; the only books I have in my library are those which people have lent me. -Anatole France, novelist, essayist, Nobel laureate (1844-1924)
Never let your sense of morals get in the way of doing what's right. -Isaac Asimov, scientist and writer (1920-1992)
Never look down on anybody unless you're helping him up. -Jesse Louis Jackson
Never mistake knowledge for wisdom. One helps you make a living; the other helps you make a life. -Sandra Carey
Never rise to speak till you have something to say; and when you have said it, cease. -John Witherspoon (1723-1794)
Never spend your money before you have it. -Thomas Jefferson, third US president, architect and author (1743-1826)
Never tell people how to do things. Tell them what to do and they will surprise you with their ingenuity. -General George S. Patton, Jr.
Never vote for the best candidate, vote for the one who will do the least harm. -Frank Dane
Never worry about the size of your Christmas tree. In the eyes of children, they are all 30 feet tall. -Larry Wilde
Next week there can't be any crisis. My schedule is already full. -Henry Kissinger
Night fell again. There was war to the south, but our sector was quiet. The battle was over. Our casualties were some thirteen thousand killed--thirteen thousand minds, memories, loves, sensations, worlds, universes--because the human mind is more a universe than the universe itself--and all for a few hundred yards of useless mud. -John Fowles [The Magus, 1965]
No army can withstand the strength of an idea whose time has come. -Victor Hugo, poet, novelist and dramatist (1802-1885)
...no battle is ever won...they are not even fought. The field only reveals to man his own folly and despair, and Victory is an illusion of philosophers and fools. -William Faulkner [The Sound and the Fury]
No bird soars too high if he soars with his own wings. -William Blake
No grand idea was ever born in a conference, but a lot of foolish ideas have died there. -F. Scott Fitzgerald
No great man ever complains of want of opportunity. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
No horse gets anywhere until he is harnessed. No stream or gas drives anything until it is confined. No Niagara is ever turned into light and power until it is tunneled. No life ever grows great until it is focused, dedicated, disciplined. -Harry Emerson Fosdick
No humorist laughs at his own wheeze: A snuff-box has no right to sneeze. -Keith Preston, journalist and author (1884-1927)
No man but feels more of a man in the world if he have a bit of ground that he can call his own. However small it is on the surface, it is four thousand miles deep; and that is a very handsome property. -Charles Dudley Warner, editor, and publisher (1829-1900)
No man can be called friendless when he has God and the companionship of good books. -Elizabeth Barrett Browning, poet (1806-1861)
No man ever steps in the same river twice, for it's not the same river and he's not the same man. -Heraclitus, philosopher (c. 540-470 BCE)
No man is a hero to his valet. -Anne Bigot Cornuel
No man is an Island, entire of itself; every man is a piece of the Continent, a part of the main; if a clod be washed away by the sea, Europe is the less, as well as if a promontory were, as well as if a manor of thy friends or of thine own were; any man's death diminishes me, because I am involved in Mankind; And therefore never send to know for whom the bell tolls; It tolls for thee. -John Donne, poet (1573-1631)
No man is clever enough to know all the evil he does. -La Rochefoucauld (1613-1680)
No man is more unhappy than the one who is never in adversity; the greatest affliction of life is never to be afflicted.
No man is useless who has a friend, and if we are loved we are indispensable. -Robert Louis Stevenson, novelist, essayist, and poet (1850-1894)
No man should judge unless he asks himself in absolute honesty whether in a similar situation he might not have done the same. -Viktor Frankl, author, neurologist and psychiatrist, Holocaust survivor (1905-1997)
No man, for any considerable period, can wear one face to himself, and another to the multitude, without finally getting bewildered as to which may be true. -Nathaniel Hawthorne, writer (1804-1864)
No matter how far you have gone on the wrong road, turn back. -Turkish proverb
No matter how far you've gone down the wrong road, turn back. -Turkish proverb
No matter how old a mother is she watches her middle-aged children for signs of improvement. -Florida Scott-Maxwell
No metaphysician ever felt the deficiency of language so much as the grateful. -Charles Caleb Colton, author and clergyman (1780-1832)
No mistake is more common and more fatuous than appealing to logic in cases which are beyond her jurisdiction. -Samuel Butler, writer (1835-1902)
No one can make you feel inferior without your consent. -Eleanor Roosevelt, diplomat, author, and lecturer (1884-1962)
No one ever ever won a chess game by betting on each move. Sometimes you have to move backward to get a step forward. -Amar Gopal Bose, electrical engineer, inventor, founder Bose Corp. (1929- )
No one has ever become poor by giving. -Anne Frank, Holocaust diarist (1929-1945)
No one is much pleased with a companion who does not increase, in some respect, their fondness for themselves. -Samuel Johnson
No one is useless in this world who lightens the burden on it to anyone else. -Charles Dickens
No one should drive a hard bargain with an artist. -Ludwig Van Beethoven, composer (1770-1827)
No one worth possessing / Can be quite possessed. -Sara Teasdale
No one would talk much in society if he knew how often he misunderstands others. -Goethe
No problem is so formidable that you can't just walk away from it.
No race can prosper till it learns there is as much dignity in tilling a field as in writing a poem. -Booker T. Washington
No really great man ever thought himself so. -William Hazlitt, essayist (1778-1830)
No snowflake ever falls in the wrong place. -Zen saying
No soul is desolate as long as there is a human being for whom it can feel trust and reverence. -George Eliot (Mary Ann Evans), novelist (1819-1880)
No two persons ever read the same book. -Edmund Wilson, critic (1895-1972)
No wonder nobody comes here--it's too crowded. -Yogi Berra
No, no, you're not thinking, you're just being logical. -Niels Bohr, physicist (1885-1962)
Nobody can be exactly like me. Sometimes even I have trouble doing it. -Tallulah Bankhead, actress (1903-1968)
Nobody in the game of football should be called a genius. A genius is somebody like Norman Einstein. -Joe Theismann, Former quarterback
Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely to be normal. -Albert Camus
Noise proves nothing--often a hen who has merely laid an egg cackles as if she had laid an asteroid. -Mark Twain, U.S. Author (1835-1910)
Non-violence leads to the highest ethics, which is the goal of all evolution. Until we stop harming all other living beings, we are still savages. -Thomas Edison, inventor (1847-1931)
Nostalgia is like a grammar lesson: You find the present tense and the past perfect.
Not all those who know their minds know their hearts as well. -La Rochefoucauld
Not all those who wander are lost. -J.R.R. Tolkien, novelist and philologist (1892-1973)
Not that I want to be a god or a hero. Just to change into a tree, grow for ages, not hurt anyone. -Czeslaw Milosz
Not the cry, but the flight of the wild duck, leads the flock to fly and follow.
Nothing can bring you peace but yourself. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Nothing contributes more to peace of soul than having no opinion at all. -Georg Christoph Lichtenberg
Nothing contributes more to peace of soul than having no opinion at all. -George Christopher Lichtenberg
Nothing contributes so much to tranquilizing the mind as a steady purpose - a point on which the soul may fix its intellectual eye. -Mary Wollstonecraft Shelley, author (1797-1851)
Nothing fixes a thing so intensely in the memory as the wish to forget it. -Michel de Montaigne, essayist (1533-1592)
Nothing great was ever achieved without enthusiasm. -Ralph Waldo Emerson (Circles)
Nothing has a stronger influence psychologically on their environment, and especially on their children, than the unlived lives of the parents. -Carl Jung
Nothing in life is to be feared, it is only to be understood. -Marie Curie
Nothing in the world can take the place of persistence. Talent will not; nothing is more common than unsuccessful men with talent. Genius will not; unrewarded genius is almost a proverb. Education will not; the world is full of educated derelicts. Persistence and determination alone are omnipotent. -Calvin Coolidge
Nothing is at last sacred but the integrity of your own mind. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Nothing is more terrible than ignorance in action. -Goethe
Nothing is so firmly believed as that which we least know. -Michel de Montaigne
Nothing is so strong as gentleness, and nothing is so gentle as true strength. -Ralph Sockman
Nothing makes us so lonely as our secrets. -Paul Tournier
Nothing produces such odd results as trying to get even. -Franklin P. Jones
Nothing ruins the truth like stretching it.
Nothing so soon the drooping spirits can raise / As praises from the men, whom all men praise. -Abraham Cowley, poet (1618-1667)
Nothing that grieves us can be called little: by the eternal laws of proportion a child's loss of a doll and a king's loss of a crown are events of the same size. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
Nothing worse could happen to one than to be completely understood. -Carl Gustav Jung, psychiatrist (1875-1961)
Nothing worthwhile was ever accomplished by a reasonable man.
Now I can look at you in peace; I don't eat you any more. -Franz Kafka, while admiring fish in an aquarium
Now I see the garden that I've grown is just the same as those outside. / The fences that, erected to protect, simply divide. -Peter Hammill
Now I see the secret of the making of the best persons. It is to grow in the open air and to eat and sleep with the earth. -Walt Whitman, poet (1819-1892)
Nowadays, people can be divided into three classes - the Haves, the Have-Nots, and the Have-Not-Paid-for-What-They-Haves. -Earl Wilson, newspaper columnist (1907-1987)
Nurture your minds with great thoughts. To believe in the heroic makes heroes. -Benjamin Disraeli
O senseless man, who cannot possibly make a worm and yet will make Gods by the dozen! -Michel de Montaigne (1533-1592)
Observe your enemies, for they first find out your faults. -Antisthenes
Of all nature's gifts to the human race, what is sweeter to a man than his children? -Marcus Tullius Cicero, statesman, orator, writer (106-43 BCE)
Of all the music that reached farthest into heaven, it
Of all the things you wear, your expression is the most important.
Of any stopping place in life, it is good to ask whether it will be a good place from which to go on as well as a good place to remain. -Mary Catherine Bateson
Of course, it's possible to love a human being -- if you don't know them too well. -Charles Bukowski, writer (1920-1994)
Of life's two chief prizes, beauty and truth, I found the first in a loving heart and the second in a laborer's hand. -Kahlil Gibran, mystic, poet, dramatist, and artist (1883-1931)
Often war is waged only in order to show valor; thus an inner dignity is ascribed to war itself, and even some philosophers have praised it as an ennoblement of humanity, forgetting the pronouncement of the Greek who said, "War is an evil in as much as it produces more wicked men than it takes away." -Immanuel Kant, philosopher (1724-1804)
Often you must turn your stylus to erase, if you hope to write anything worth a second reading. -Horace, poet and satirist (65-8 BCE)
Oftentimes excusing of a fault / Doth make the fault the worse by th' excuse. -William Shakespeare, playwright and poet (1564-1616)
Oh, we have a home. We just need a house to put it in. -An anonymous child
Old books that have ceased to be of service should no more be abandoned than should old friends who have ceased to give pleasure. -Peregrine Worsthorne
Omit needless words. Vigorous writing is concise. A sentence should contain no unnecessary words, a paragraph no unnecessary sentences, for the same reason that a drawing should have no unnecessary lines and a machine no unnecessary parts. -William Strunk, Jr., professor and author (1869-1946)
On each race is laid the duty to keep alight its own lamp of mind as its part in the illumination of the world. To break the lamp of any people is to deprive it of its rightful place in the world festival. -Rabindranath Tagore, Indian Poet (1861-1941) [Rabindra Rachonabali]
On the Internet, nobody knows you're a dog. -Cartoon in The New Yorker
Once you have decided to keep a certain pile, it is no longer yours; for you can't spend it. -Michel De Montaigne, essayist (1533-1592)
Once you have flown, you will walk the earth with your eyes turned skyward; for there you have been, there you long to return. -Da Vinci
Once you hear the details of victory, it is hard to distinguish it from a defeat. -Jean-Paul Sartre, writer and philosopher (1905-1980)
Once you make a decision, the universe conspires to make it happen. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
One can be instructed in society, one is inspired only in solitude. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, poet, dramatist, novelist, and philosopher (1749-1832)
One can never consent to creep when one feels an impulse to soar. -Helen Keller
One can never pay in gratitude; one can only pay "in kind" somewhere else in life. -Anne Morrow Lindbergh, writer (1906-2001)
One can pay back the loan of gold, but one dies forever in debt to those who are kind. -Malayan Proverb
One cannot always be a hero, but one can always be a human. -Goethe
One glance at a book and you hear the voice of another person, perhaps someone dead for 1,000 years. To read is to voyage through time. -Carl Sagan, astronomer and writer (1934-1996)
One has to be a lowbrow, a bit of a murderer, to be a politician, ready and willing to see people sacrificed, slaughtered, for the sake of an idea, whether a good one or a bad one. -Henry Miller, writer (1891-1980)
One hundred percent of the shots you don't take don't go in. -Wayne Gretzky
One is always a long way from solving a problem until one actually has the answer. -Stephen Hawking
One kind word can warm three winter months. -Japanese proverb
One machine can do the work of fifty ordinary men. No machine can do the work of one extraordinary man. -Elbert Hubbard, author, editor, printer (1856-1915)
One may have a blazing hearth in one's soul, and yet no one ever comes to sit by it. -Vincent van Gogh, painter (1853-1890)
One must not be mean with the affections; what is spent of the fund is renewed in the spending itself. -Sigmund Freud
One of the greatest gifts you can get as a writer is to be born into an unhappy family. -Pat Conroy
One of the hardest things in life is having words in your heart that you can't utter. -James Earl Jones, actor (1931- )
One of the keys to happiness is a bad memory. -Rita Mae Brown, author (1944- )
One of the strongest characteristics of genius is the power of lighting its own fire. -John W. Foster, clergyman (1770-1843)
One of the symptoms of an approaching nervous breakdown is the belief that one's work is terribly important. -Bertrand Russell, philosopher, mathematician, author, Nobel laureate (1872-1970)
One ought, every day at least, to hear a little song, read a good poem, see a fine picture and, if it were possible, speak a few reasonable words. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, poet, dramatist, novelist, and philosopher (1749-1832)
One problem with gazing too frequently into the past is that we may turn around to find the future has run out on us. -Michael Cibenko
One says a lot in vain, refusing; / The other mainly hears the "No." -Goethe
One should count each day a separate life. -Marcus Aurelius (1887-1940)
One who condones evils is just as guilty as the one who perpetrates it. - Dr. Martin Luther King Jr., civil-rights leader (1929-1968)
One who walks in another's tracks leaves no footprints. -Proverb
One will rarely err if extreme actions be ascribed to vanity, ordinary actions to habit, and mean actions to fear. -Friedrich Nietzsche
One's age should be tranquil, as childhood should be playful. Hard work at either extremity of life seems out of place. At midday the sun may burn, and men labor under it; but the morning and evening should be alike calm and cheerful. -Thomas Arnold, educator (1795-1842)
One's first step in wisdom is to question everything - and one's last is to come to terms with everything. -Georg Christoph Lichtenberg
Only a mediocre writer is always at his best. -William Somerset Maugham, writer (1874-1965)
Only cynics know the price of everything and the value of nothing. -Oscar Wilde
Only in quiet waters do things mirror themselves undistorted. Only in a quiet mind is adequate perception of the world. -Hans Margolius
Only put off until tomorrow what you are willing to die having left undone. -Pablo Picasso (1881-1973)
Only the hand that erases can write the true thing. -Meister Eckhart, theologian (c. 1260-1327)
Only when you can be extremely pliable and soft can
Only when you can be extremely pliable and soft can you be extremely hard and strong. -Zen proverb
Ordering a man to write a poem is like commanding a pregnant woman to give birth to a red-headed child. -Carl Sandburg, poet and biographer (1878-1967)
Other men are lenses through which we read our own minds. -Ralph Waldo Emerson , writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
Our chief want is someone who will inspire us to be what we know we could be. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
Our deeds determine us, as much as we determine our deeds. -George Eliot (Mary Ann Evans), novelist (1819-1880)
Our elections are free, it's in the results where eventually we pay. -Bill Stern, sports announcer (1907-1971)
Our enemies come nearer the truth in the opinions they form of us than we do in our opinion of ourselves. -La Rochefoucauld (1613-1680)
Our greatest glory is not in never failing, but in rising up every time we fail. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Our houses are such unwieldy property that we are often imprisoned rather than housed in them. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
Our lives begin to end the day we become silent about things that matter. -Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.
Our plans miscarry because they have no aim. When a man does not know what harbor he is making for, no wind is the right wind. -Seneca
Our sincerest laughter / With some pain is fraught; / Our sweetest songs are those that tell of saddest thought. -Shelley
Our society must make it right and possible for old people not to fear the young or be deserted by them, for the test of a civilization is the way that it cares for its helpless members. -Pearl S. Buck, Nobelist novelist (1892-1973)
Our sun is one of 100 billion stars in our galaxy. Our galaxy is one of the billions of galaxies populating the universe. It would be the height of presumption to think that we are the only living things within that enormous immensity. -Wernher von Braun, rocket engineer (1912-1977)
Our task must be to free ourselves...by widening our circle of compassion to embrace all living creatures and the whole of nature and its beauty. -Albert Einstein
Patience has its limits. Take it too far, and it's cowardice -George Jackson
Patience is also a form of action. -Auguste Rodin, sculptor (1840-1917)
Patience is counting down without blasting off.
Patience serves as a protection against wrongs as clothes do against cold. For if you put on more clothes as the cold increases, it will have no power to hurt you. So in like manner you must grow in patience when you meet with great wrongs, and they will then be powerless to vex your mind. -Leonardo da Vinci,  painter, engineer, musician, and scientist (1452-1519)
Patriotism is often an arbitrary veneration of real estate above principles. -George Jean Nathan, author and editor (1882-1958)
Patriotism is supporting your country all the time and the government when it deserves it. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
Patriotism is the willingness to kill and be killed for trivial reasons. -Bertrand Russell
Patriotism is your conviction that this country is superior to all others because you were born in it. -G.B. Shaw
Patriotism is your conviction that this country is superior to all others because you were born in it. -George Bernard Shaw
Pay no attention to what the critics say; no statue has ever been erected to a critic. -Jean Sibelius
Peace proposals unaccompanied by a sworn covenant indicate a plot. -Sun Tzu [The Art of War]
People are like stained glass windows: they sparkle and shine when the sun is out, but when the darkness sets in their true beauty is revealed only if there is a light within. -Elizabeth Kubler-Ross, psychiatrist and author (1926- )
People are like teagbags, you never know how strong they'll be until they're in hot water.
People change and forget to tell each other. -Lillian Hellman, playwright (1905-1984)
People demand freedom of speech as a compensation for the freedom of thought which they seldom use. -Kierkegaard
People hate as they love, unreasonably. -William Makepeace Thackeray, novelist (1811-1863)
People only see what they are prepared to see. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
People rarely win wars; governments rarely lose them. -Arundhati Roy, writer and activist (1961- )
People seldom become famous for what they say until after they are famous for what they've done. -Cullen Hightower
People take different roads seeking fulfillment and happiness. Just because they're not on your road doesn't mean they've gotten lost. -H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
People travel to wonder at the height of mountains, at the huge waves of the sea , at the long courses of rivers, at the vast compass of the ocean, at the circular motion of the stars; and they pass by themselves without wondering. -Saint Augustine (354-430)
People usually get what's coming to them... unless it was mailed.
People who live in windowed environments shouldn't cast pointers.
People who think they know everything greatly annoy those of us who do.
Perfect love is rare indeed - for to be a lover will require that you continually have the subtlety of the very wise, the flexibility of the child, the sensitivity of the artist, the understanding of the philosopher, the acceptance of the saint, the tolerance of the scholar and the fortitude of the certain. -Leo Buscaglia, author, speaker and professor (1924-1998)
Perfection is attained by slow degrees; it requires the hand of time. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
Perhaps the greatest social service that can be rendered by anybody to the country and to mankind is to bring up a family. -George Bernard Shaw, dramatist, critic, novelist, and Nobel laureate (1856-1950)
Perhaps the most valuable result of all education is the ability to make yourself do the thing you have to do, when it ought to be done, whether you like it or not. -Thomas Henry Huxley
Permit me to issue and control the money of a nation, and I care not who makes its laws. -Amschel Mayer Rothschild, banker (1743-1812)
Persistent people begin their success where others end in failures. -Edward Eggleston
Personally I'm always ready to learn, although I do not always like being taught. -Winston Churchill
Pessimist: One who, when he has the choice of two evils, chooses both. -Oscar Wilde
Peter Principle: In a hierarchy, every employee tends to rise to his level of incompetence. -Laurence J Peter, educator and author (1919-1990)
Philanthropy is commendable, but it must not cause the philanthropist to overlook the circumstances of economic injustice which make philanthropy necessary. -Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. (1929-1968)
Philosophy is a battle against the bewitchment of our intelligence by means of language. -Ludwig Wittgenstein
Pick battles big enough to matter, small enough to win. -Jonathan Kozol
Please subdue the anguish of your soul. Nobody is destined only to happiness or to pain. The wheel of life takes one up and down by turn. -Kalidasa, dramatist (c. 4th century)
Pleasure is very seldom found where it is sought; our brightest blazes of gladness are commonly kindled by unexpected sparks. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
Poetry is a deal of joy and pain and wonder, with a dash of the dictionary. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931)
Poetry is a deal of joy and pain and wonder, with a dash of the dictionary. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Poetry is a subject as precise as geometry. -Gustave Flaubert, novelist (1821-80)
Poetry is made out of our quarrel with ourselves. -William Butler Yeats
Poetry is the art of uniting pleasure with truth. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
Poetry is to prose as dancing is to walking. -John Barrington Wain, writer (1925-1994)
Poetry is what gets lost in translation. -Robert Frost, poet (1874-1963)
Poetry should please by a fine excess and not by singularity. It should strike the reader as a wording of his own highest thoughts, and appear almost as a remembrance. -John Keats, poet (1795-1821)
Poets are the unacknowledged legislators of the world. -Percy Bysshe Shelley, poet (1792-1822)
Politics is the art of preventing people from taking part in affairs which properly concern them. -Paul Valery
Politics, n. Strife of interests masquerading as a contest of principles. -Ambrose Bierce, writer (1842-1914)
Poor animals! How zealously they guard their pathetic bodies.. that which to us is merely an evening's meal, but to them is life itself. -T. Casey Brennan
Power is not revealed by striking hard or often, but by striking true. -Honore de Balzac, novelist (1799-1850)
Power is of two kinds. One is obtained by the fear of punishment and the other by acts of love. Power based on love is a thousand times more effective and permanent than the one derived from fear of punishment. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
Power tends to corrupt, and absolute power corrupts absolutely. -Lord Acton (John Emerich Edward Dalberg-Acton), historian (1834-1902)
Practice no vice because it's trivial. Neglect no virtue because it's so. -Chinese proverb
Praise, like gold and diamonds, owes its value to its scarcity. -Samuel Butler, poet (1612-1680)
Pray, v. To ask the laws of the universe to be annulled on behalf of a single petitioner confessedly unworthy. -Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914), [The Devil's Dictionary, 1906]
Presents, I often say, endear absents. -Charles Lamb, essayist and critic (1775-1834)
Problems are only opportunities in work clothes. -Henry J. Kaiser
Problems worthy of attack prove their worth by hitting back. -Piet Hein, poet and scientist (1905-1996)
Promises are like the full moon: if they are not kept at once they diminish day by day. -German proverb
Punctuality is the politeness of kings. -Louis XVIII
Q: What do you call a clairvoyant midget who just broke out of prison? A: A small medium at large.
Quarrels would not last long if the fault were only on one side. -Francois de La Rochefoucauld
Rain! whose soft architectural hands have power to cut stones, and chisel to shapes of grandeur the very mountains. -Henry Ward Beecher, preacher and writer (1813-1887)
Reading is seeing by proxy. -Herbert Spencer, philosopher (1820-1903)
Reading is to the mind what exercise is to the body.
Reading makes a full man, meditation a profound man, discourse a clear man. -Benjamin Franklin
Real generosity toward the future lies in giving all to the present. -Albert Camus
Real knowledge is to know the extent of one's ignorance. -Confucius,  philosopher and teacher (c. 551-478 BCE)
Reason can answer questions, but imagination has to ask them. -Ralph Gerard
Reason often makes mistakes, but conscience never does. -Josh Billings, columnist and humorist (1818-1885)
Recently, I was asked if I was going to fire an employee who made a mistake that cost the company $600,000. No, I replied, I just spent $600,000 training him. Why would I want somebody to hire his experience? -Thomas J. Watson, industrialist (1874-1956)
Referendum, n. A law for submission of proposed legislation to a popular vote to learn the nonsensus of public opinion. -Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914) [The Devil's Dictionary, 1906]
Reject your sense of injury and the injury itself disappears. -Marcus Aurelius, philosopher and writer (121-180)
Remarriage: A triumph of hope over experience. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
Remember that there is nothing stable in human affairs; therefore avoid undue elation in prosperity, or undue depression in adversity. -Socrates, philosopher (469?-399 BCE)
Remember when life's path is steep to keep your mind even. -Horace, poet and satirist (65-8 BCE)
Remember, life is not what happens to you but what you make of what happens to you. Everyone dies, but not everyone fully lives. Too many people are having "near-life experiences.
Reputation: what others are not thinking about you.
Resentment is one burden that is incompatible with your success. Always be the first to forgive; and forgive yourself first always. -Dan Zadra
Restlessness and discontent are the first necessities of progress. -Thomas A. Edison
Revenge has no more quenching effect on emotions than salt water has on thirst. -Walter Weckler
Rewards and punishments are the lowest form of education. -Chuang-Tzu, philosopher (4th c. BCE)
Road to success is always under construction.
Sad is his lot, who, once at least in his life, has not been a poet. -Alphonse Marie Louis de Prat de Lamartine, poet, statesman (1790-1869)
Said a hunted fox followed by twenty horsemen and a pack of twenty hounds, "Of course they will kill me. But how poor and how stupid they must be. Surely it would not be worth while for twenty foxes riding on twenty asses and accompanied by twenty wolves to chase and kill one man." -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Say not, 'I have found the truth,' but rather, 'I have found a truth. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931)
Say oh wise man how you have come to such knowledge? Because I was never ashamed to confess my ignorance and ask others. -Johann Gottfried Von Herder, critic and poet (1744-1803)
Science is built with facts as a house is with stones--but a collection of facts is no more a science than a heap of stones is a house. -Jules Henry Poincare (1854-1912)
Science is the tool of the Western mind and with it more doors can be opened than with bare hands. It is part and parcel of our knowledge and obscures our insight only when it holds that the understanding given by it is the only kind there is. -C.G. Jung (1875-1961)
Security is when everything is settled. When nothing can happen to you. Security is the denial of life. -Germaine Greer
Seek the wisdom of the ages, but look at the world through the eyes of a child.  -Ron Wild
Seek the wisdom of the ages, but look at the world through the eyes of a child. -Ron Wild
Self-education is, I firmly believe, the only kind of education there is. -Isaac Asimov
Self-esteem is the reputation we acquire with ourselves. -Nathaniel Branden, psychotherapist (1930- )
Self-esteem is the reputation we acquire within ourselves. -Nathaniel Branden
Selfish, adj. Devoid of consideration for the selfishness of others. -Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914), [The Devil's Dictionary, 1906]
Seven blunders of the world that lead to violence: wealth without work, pleasure without conscience, knowledge without character, commerce without morality, science without humanity, worship without sacrifice, politics without principle. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
Shall I tell you the secret of the true scholar? It is this: every man I meet is my master in some point, and in that I learn of him. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
Ships that pass in the night and speak each other in passing; / Only a signal shown and a distant voice in the darkness; / So on the ocean of life we pass and speak one another, / Only a look and a voice; then darkness again and a silence. -Henry Wadsworth Longfellow, poet (1807-1882)
Show me a hero and I will write you a tragedy. -F. Scott Fitzgerald, [The Crackup]
Show me a man with both feet on the ground, and I'll show you a man who can't put his pants on. -Arthur K. Watson
Sight is a faculty; seeing is an art.
Sign in obstetrician's office: Pay As You Grow. -The American Flint
Sign on bank: We can loan you enough money to get you completely out of debt.
Sign seen on door:  C  I  T  Y   P  L  A  N  N  ING
Silence is the voice of complicity.
Silence will save me from being wrong (and foolish), but it will also deprive me of the possibility of being right. -Igor Stravinsky, composer (1882-1971)
Silent gratitude isn't very much use to anyone. -Gertrude B. Stein
Simplicity doesn't mean to live in misery and poverty. You have what you need, and you don't want to have what you don't need. -Charan Singh, mystic (1916-1990)
Simplicity is making the journey of this life with just baggage enough. -Charles Dudley Warner, editor and author (1829-1900)
Simplicity is the natural result of profound thought.
Sin is geographical. -Bertrand Russell, philosopher, mathematician, author, Nobel laureate (1872-1970)
Since Auschwitz we know what man is capable of. And since Hiroshima we know what is at stake. -Viktor Frankl, author, neurologist and psychiatrist, Holocaust survivor (1905-1997)
Since light travels faster than sound, isn't that why some people appear bright until you hear them speak? -Steven Wright
Sleep after toil, port after stormy seas, ease after war, death after life does greatly please. -Edmund Spenser, poet (1552-1599)
Slight not what's near through aiming at what's far. -Euripides
Smile, it takes only 13 muscles; A frown takes 64.
Snackmosphere: The 95% air inside bags of potato chips.
So I accept these awards on behalf of the cake bakers and all of those other women who can do some things quite as important, if not more important, than flying, as well as in the name of women flying today. -Amelia Earhart (1897-1937)
So act that your principle of action might safely be made a law for the whole world. -Immanuel Kant, philosopher (1724-1804)
So long as we have enough people in this country willing to fight for their rights, we'll be called a democracy. -Roger Baldwin, civil rights advocate (1884-1981)
So many gods, so many creeds, So many paths that wind and wind, While just the art of being kind is all the sad world needs. -Ella Wheeler Wilcox, poet (1850-1919)
Solitude is a silent storm that breaks down all our dead branches; / Yet it sends our living roots deeper into the living heart of the living earth. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Solitude, though it may be silent as light, is like light, the mightiest of agencies; for solitude is essential to man. All men come into this world alone; all leave it alone. -Thomas De Quincey, writer (1785-1859)
Some fellows pay a compliment like they expected a receipt. -Kin Hubbard, humorist (1868-1930)
Some of the world's greatest feats were accomplished by people not
Some of the world's greatest feats were accomplished by people not smart enough to know they were impossible. -Doug Larson
Some painters transform the sun into a yellow spot; others transform a yellow spot into the sun. -Pablo Picasso (1881-1973)
Some people approach every problem with an open mouth. -Adlai Stevenson
Some people develop eye strain looking for trouble.
Some people think they are worth a lot of money just because they have it. -Fannie Hurst, writer (1889-1968)
Some people would not recognize subtlety if it hit them on the head.
Someday you will get your big chance -- or have you already had it?
Sometime they'll give a war and nobody will come. -Carl Sandburg, poet and biographer (1878-1967)
Sometimes I think we're alone in the universe, and sometimes I think we're not. In either case, the idea is quite staggering. -Arthur C Clarke, science fiction writer (1917- )
Sometimes I wonder whether the world is being run by smart people who are putting us on or by imbeciles who really mean it. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
Sometimes even to live is an act of courage. -Lucius Annaeus Seneca, writer and philosopher (BCE 3-65 CE)
Sometimes it's a little better to travel than to arrive. -Robert Pirsig (Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance)
Sometimes to remain silent is to lie. -Miguel de Unamuno, philosopher and writer (1864-1936)
Sometimes you can observe a lot by watching. -Yogi Berra
Sometimes your joy is the source of your smile, but sometimes your smile can be the source of your joy. -Thich Nhat Hanh
Son, when you grow up you will know who I really am. I am just a child like you who has been forced to act responsibly. -Rod Byrnes
Sorry, but my karma just ran over your dogma.
Space isn't remote at all. It's only an hour's drive away if your car could go straight upwards. -Fred Hoyle, Astronomer, mathematician, writer (1915- )
Speak the truth, then leave quickly. -Serbian Proverb
Speech is conveniently located midway between thought and action, where it often substitutes for both. -John Andrew Holmes
Spring is a natural resurrection, an experience in immortality. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
Springtime is the land awakening. The March winds are the morning yawn. -Lewis Grizzard
Statisticians know that if you put a man's head in a sauna and his feet in a deep freeze, he will feel pretty good - on the average.
Statistics are used as a drunk uses lampposts--for support, not illumination.
"Stay" is a charming word in a friend's vocabulary. -Louisa May Alcott, writer and reformist (1832-1888)
Still round the corner there may wait,/ a new road or a secret gate. -J.R.R. Tolkien
Stocks have reached what looks like a permanently high plateau. -Irving Fisher, Professor of Economics, Yale University,1929
Strange that creatures without backbones have the hardest shells. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Substitute damn every time you're inclined to write very; your editor will delete it and the writing will be just as it should be. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
Success is not measured by the position one has reached in life, rather by the obstacles overcome while trying to succeed. -Booker T. Washington
Success is not the key to happiness. Happiness is the key to success. -Albert Schweitzer, philosopher, physician, musician, Nobel laureate (1875-1965)
Success is the ability to go from failure to failure without losing your enthusiasm. -Winston Churchill
Success usually comes to those who are too busy to be looking for it. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
Superfluous wealth can buy superfluities only. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
Support the strong, give courage to the timid, remind the indifferent, and warn the opposed. -Whitney M. Young
Suppose you were an idiot. And suppose you were a member of Congress. But I repeat myself. -Mark Twain
Swing hard, in case they throw the ball where you're swinging. -Duke Snider
Swords and guns have no eyes. -Chinese proverb
TV is chewing gum for the eyes. -Frank Lloyd Wright, architect (1867-1959)
Tact is the ability to describe others as they see themselves. -Abraham Lincoln, 16th president of the U.S (1809-1865)
Tact is the art of convincing people that they know more than you do. -Raymond Mortimer
Tact is the art of making a point without making an enemy.
Take a music bath once or twice a week for a few seasons, and you will find that it is to the soul what the water bath is to the body. -Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr., US Supreme Court Justice (1841-1935)
Take rest; a field that has rested gives a bountiful crop. -Ovid, poet (43 BCE - CE 17)
Take time to come home to yourself everyday. -Robin Casarjean
Talent develops in tranquillity, character in the full current of human life. -Goethe
Talent develops in tranquillity, character in the full current of human life. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (1749-1832)
Talk doesn't cook rice. -Chinese proverb
Talking is like playing the harp; there is as much in laying the hand on the strings to stop their vibrations as in twanging them to bring out their music. -Oliver Wendell Holmes, Sr., poet, novelist, essayist, and physician (1809-1894)
Taught from infancy that beauty is woman's sceptre, the mind shapes itself to the body, and roaming round its gilt cage, only seeks to adorn its prison. -Mary Wollstonecraft, reformer and writer (1759-1797)
Teachers open the door, but you must enter by yourself. -Chinese Proverb
Teaching a child not to step on a caterpillar is as valuable to the child as it is to the caterpillar. -Bradley Miller
Tears are not arguments. -Machado de Assis, writer (1839-1908)
Technology is dominated by two types of people: those who understand what they do not manage, and those who manage what they do not understand.
Technology...the knack of so arranging the world that we don't have to experience it. -Max Frisch
Television has done much for psychiatry by spreading information about it, as well as contributing to the need for it. -Alfred Hitchcock, film-maker (1899-1980)
Television is an invention whereby you can be entertained in your living room by people you wouldn't have in your house. -David Frost
Television is democracy at its ugliest. -Paddy Chayefsky
Television's perfect. You turn a few knobs, a few of those mechanical adjustments at which the higher apes are so proficient, and lean back and drain your mind of all thought. And there you are watching the bubbles in the primeval ooze. You don't have to concentrate. You don't have to react. You don't have to remember. You don't miss your brain because you don't need it. Your heart and liver and lungs continue to function normally. Apart from that, all is peace and quiet. You are in the man's nirvana. And if some poor nasty minded person comes along and says you look like a fly on a can of garbage, pay him no mind. He probably hasn't got the price of a television set. -Raymond Thornton Chandler, writer (1888-1959)
Tell me how much a nation knows about its own language, and I will tell you how much that nation cares about its own identity. -John Ciardi
Tell me what company thou keepst, and I'll tell thee what thou art. -Miguel de Cervantes, novelist (1547-1616)
Thank you for sending me a copy of your book - I'll waste no time in reading it. -Moses Hadas, teacher and author (1900-1966)
That civilization perishes in which the individual thwarts the revelation of the universal. -Tagore
That life is worth living is the most necessary of assumptions, and were it not assumed, the most impossible of conclusions. -George Santayana
That sorrow which is the harbinger of joy is preferable to the joy which is followed by sorrow. -Saadi, poet (c.1213-1291) [Gulistan]
That you may fail, is not sufficient reason for not trying.
The Hollow Men: Between the idea / And the reality / Between the motion / And the act / Falls the Shadow. -T.S. Eliot, poet (1888-1965)
The Lord prefers common-looking people. That is the reason He makes so many of them. -Abraham Lincoln, 16th president of the U.S. (1809-1865)
The Man who never in his Mind and Thoughts travel'd to Heaven is No Artist. -William Blake
The Senate trying to govern cyberspace is analogous to King George believing he could still govern the colonies even though he had never been there. -John Perry Barlow
The US has a vital interest in that area of the country. -Dan Quayle referring to Latin America
The US is naked, absolutely nude, to attack by the Soviets. -Senator Dan Quayle 8/20/88
The Unspeakable Law. As soon as you mention something ... if it is good it goes away, ... if it is bad it happens.
The abdomen is the reason why man does not easily take himself for a god. -Friedrich Nietzsche
The ability to piece together work that will both satisfy and support us is the secret to surviving, even thriving. -Wendy Reid Crisp
The actions of men are the best interpreters of their thoughts. -John Locke, philosopher (1632-1704)
The aim of an argument or discussion should not be victory, but progress. -Joseph Joubert, essayist (1754-1824)
The angels know that too many practical men eat their bread with the sweat of the dreamer's brow. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
The animals of the world exist for their own reasons. They were not made for humans any more than black people were made for whites or women for men. -Alice Walker
The art of acceptance is the art of making someone who has just done you a small favor wish that he might have done you a greater one. -J. Russell Lynes (1910-1991)
The art of medicine consists in amusing the patient while nature cures the disease. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
The art of progress is to preserve order amid change, and to preserve change amid order. -Alfred North Whitehead, mathematician and philosopher (1861-1947)
The artist brings something into the world that didn't exist before, and he does it without destroying something else. -John Updike, writer (1932- ) 
The artist must raise the cup of his vision aloft to the gods in the high hope that they will pour into it the sweet mellow wine of inspiration. -Paul Brunton
The bamboo that bends is stronger than the oak that resists. -Japanese proverb
The barriers are not erected which can say to aspiring talents and industry, "Thus far and no farther." -Ludwig van Beethoven (1770-1827)
The beginnings and endings of all human undertakings are untidy. -John Galsworthy, author, Nobelist (1867-1933)
The believer is happy; the doubter is wise. -Hungarian proverb
The belly is the reason why man does not mistake himself for a god. -Friedrich Nietzsche (1844-1900) [Beyond Good and Evil, 1886]
The best and most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched. They must be felt with the heart. -Helen Adams Keller (1880-1968)
The best cure for worry, depression, melancholy, brooding, is to go deliberately forth and try to lift with one's sympathy the gloom of somebody else. -Arnold Bennett, novelist (1867-1931)
The best educated human being is the one who understands most about the life in which he is placed. -Helen Keller
The best effect of fine persons is felt after we have left their presence. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
The best index to a person's character is how he treats people who can't do him any good, and how he treats people who can't fight back. -Abigail Van Buren
The best inheritance a parent can give to his children is a few minutes of his time each day. -M. Grundler
The best labor saving device is doing it tomorrow.
The best lack all conviction, while the worst / Are full of passionate intensity. -William Butler Yeats [The Second Coming]
The best lack all conviction, while the worst / Are full of passionate intensity. -William Butler Yeats [The Second Coming]
The best portion of a good man's life is his little, nameless, unremembered acts of kindness and of love. -William Wordsworth
The best thing about the future is that it comes only one day at a time. -Abraham Lincoln (1809-1865)
The best things in life are nearest: Breath in your nostrils, light in your eyes, flowers at your feet, duties at your hand, the path of right just before you. -Robert Louis Stevenson, novelist, essayist, and poet (1850-1894)
The best vitamin for making friends, B-1.
The best way to find yourself is to lose yourself in the service of others. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (1869-1948)
The best way to have a good idea is to have lots of ideas. -Linus Pauling
The best way to inspire fresh thoughts is to seal the envelope.
The best way to predict the future is to invent it. -Alan Kay, inventor (1940- )
The best writing is rewriting. -E.B. White, writer (1899-1985)
The bicycle is the most civilized conveyance known to man. Other forms of transport grow daily more nightmarish. Only the bicycle remains pure in heart. -Iris Murdoch, writer (1919-1999)
The big thieves hang the little ones. -Czech proverb
The bluebird carries the sky on his back. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
The body is a house of many windows: there we all sit, showing ourselves and crying on the passers-by to come and love us. -Robert Louis Stevenson, writer (1850-1894)
The buck stops here. -Harry Truman, 33rd US president (1884-1972)
The business of life is to go forward. -Samuel Johnson
The butterfly counts not years but moments and so has enough time. -Tagore
The charm, one might say the genius of memory, is that it is choosy, chancy and temperamental; it rejects the edifying cathedral and indelibly photographs the small boy outside, chewing a hunk of melon in the dust. -Elizabeth Bowen, novelist (1899-1973)
The common idea that success spoils people by making them vain, egotistic and self-complacent is erroneous; on the contrary it makes them, for the most part, humble, tolerant and kind. -Wlliam Somerset Maugham, writer (1874-1965)
The community as a whole doesn't listen patiently to critics who adopt alternative viewpoints. Although the great lesson of history is that knowledge develops through the conflict of viewpoints. -Walter Gilbert
The concept is interesting and well-formed, but in order to earn better than a 'C,' the idea must be feasible. -A Yale University management professor in response to Fred Smith's paper proposing reliable overnight delivery service. (Smith went on to found Federal Express Corp.)
The cost of a thing is the amount of what I call life which is required to be exchanged for it, immediately or in the long run. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
The course of true love never did run smooth. -William Shakespeare, playwright and poet (1564-1616)
The covers of this book are too far apart. -Ambrose Bierce, reviewing a book.
The creation of a thousand forests is in one acorn. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
The cruelest lies are often told in silence. -Robert Louis Stevenson
The cynic says: the pessimist is a realist who isn't afraid to admit it.
The death of democracy is not likely to be an assassination from ambush. It will be a slow extinction from apathy, indifference, and undernourishment. -Robert Maynard Hutchins, educator (1899-1977)
The decent moderation of today will be the least of human things tomorrow. At the time of the Spanish Inquisition, the opinion of good sense and of the good medium was certainly that people ought not to burn too large a number of heretics; extreme and unreasonable opinion obviously demanded that they should burn none at all. -Maurice Maeterlinck, poet, dramatist, and Nobel laureate (1862-1949)
The deeds you do today may be the only sermon some people will hear today. -St. Francis of Assisi
The deeper that sorrow carves into your being the more joy you can contain. Is not the cup that holds your wine the very cup that was burned in the potter's oven? -Kahlil Gibran, mystic, poet, and artist (1883-1931)
The devil can cite Scripture for his purpose. -William Shakespeare, poet and dramatist (1564-1616)
The dew of compassion is a tear. -Lord Byron, poet (1788-1824)
The difference between perseverance and obstinacy is that one comes from a strong will, and the other from a strong won't. -Henry Ward Beecher
The difference in mind between man and the higher animals, great as it is, certainly is one of degree and not of kind. -Charles Darwin, naturalist and author (1809-1882) [The Descent of Man]
The drying up a single tear has more of honest fame than shedding seas of gore. -Lord Byron, poet (1788-1824)
The early worm gets the bird.
The easiest kind of relationship for me is with ten thousand people. The hardest is with one. -Joan Baez, musician (1941- )
The empires of the future are the empires of the mind. -Winston Churchill
The employer generally gets the employees he deserves. -Walter Bilbey
The end of the human race will be that it will eventually die of civilization. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
The enemy is anybody who's going to get you killed, no matter which side he's on. -Joseph Heller, novelist (1923-1999)
The eyes are not responsible when the mind does the seeing. -Publilius Syrus
The eyes of others our prisons; their thoughts our cages. -Virginia Woolf, writer (1882-1941)
The fact that a believer is happier than a skeptic is no more to the point than the fact than a drunken man is happier than a sober one. -George Bernard Shaw, writer, Nobel laureate (1856-1950)
The fact that astronomies change while the stars abide is a true analogy of every realm of human life and thought, religion not least of all. No existent theology can be a final formulation of spiritual truth. -Harry Emerson Fosdick, preacher and author (1878-1969)
The faculty of imagination is both the rudder and the bridle of the senses. -Leonardo da Vinci
The fate of animals is of greater importance to me than the fear of appearing ridiculous; it is indissolubly connected with the fate of men. -Emile Zola
The fate of animals is of greater importance to me than the fear of appearing ridiculous; it is indissolubly connected with the fate of men. -Emile Zola (1840-1902)
The fear of capitalism has compelled socialism to widen freedom, and the fear of socialism has compelled capitalism to increase equality. -Ariel Durant
The fetters imposed on liberty at home have ever been forged out of the weapons provided for defence against real, pretended, or imaginary dangers from abroad. -James Madison, 4th US president (1751-1836)
The first duty of a revolutionary is to get away with it. -Abbie Hoffman
The first forty years of life give us the text; the next thirty supply the commentary on it. -Arthur Schopenhauer, philosopher (1788-1860)
The first half of life consists of the capacity to enjoy without the chance; the last half consists of the chance without the capacity. -Mark Twain
The first human who hurled an insult instead of a stone was the founder of civilization. -Sigmund Freud, neurologist, founder of psychoanalysis (1856-1939)
The first method for estimating the intelligence of a ruler is to look at the men he has around him. -Niccolo Machiavelli, political philosopher and author (1469-1527)
The first problem for all of us, men and women, is not to learn, but to unlearn. -Gloria Steinem, women's rights activist, editor (1934- )
The first virtue is to restrain the tongue; he approaches nearest to the gods who knows how to be silent, even though he is in the right. -Cato the Younger (BCE 95-46)
The flower that follows the sun does so even on cloudy days. -Robert Leighton (1611-1684)
The fly that does not want to be swatted is safest if it sits on the fly-swat. -G.C. Lichtenberg
The folly of mistaking a paradox for a discovery, a metaphor for a proof, a torrent of verbiage for a spring of capital truths, and oneself for an oracle, is inborn in us. -Paul Valery, poet and philosopher (1871-1945)
The fool doth think he is wise, but the wise man knows himself to be a fool. -William Shakespeare, playwright and poet (1564-1616)
The foolish man seeks happiness in the distance, the wise grows it under his feet. -James Oppenheim
The function of the imagination is not to make strange things settled, so much as to make settled things strange. -G.K. Chesterton, essayist and novelist (1874-1936)
The funny thing about regret is that it's better to regret something you have done than to regret something you haven't. -Gibby Hanes
The gambling known as business looks with austere disfavour upon the business known as gambling. -Ambrose Bierce [The Devil's Dictionary]
The game of life is a game of boomerangs. Our thoughts, deeds and words return to us sooner or later with astounding accuracy. -Florence Scovel Shinn
The gem cannot be polished without friction, nor man perfected without trials. -Chinese Proverb
The generation of random numbers is too important to be left to chance.
The great high of winning Wimbledon lasts for about a week. You go down in the record book, but you don't have anything tangible to hold on to. But having a baby -- there isn't any comparison. -Chris Evert, tennis player (1954- )
The great rulers - the people do not notice their existence. The lesser ones they attach to and praise them. The still lesser ones - they fear them. The still lesser ones - they despise them. For where faith is lacking it cannot be met by faith. -Tao Te Ching
The great tragedy of science -- the slaying of a beautiful hypothesis by an ugly fact. -Thomas Huxley, biologist and writer (1825-1895)
The great use of life is to spend it on something that will outlast it. -William James
The greatest discovery of my generation is that human beings can alter their lives by altering their attitudes of mind. -William James
The greatest good you can do for another is not just share your riches, but reveal to them their own. -Disraeli
The greatest healing therapy is friendship and love. -Hubert Humphrey
The greatest homage to truth is to use it. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
The greatest minds are capable of the greatest vices as well as of the greatest virtues. -Rene Descartes, philosopher and mathematician (1596-1650)
The greatest of faults, I should say, is to be conscious of none. -Thomas Carlyle, writer (1795-1881)
The greatest sign of success for a teacher is to be able to say, "The children are now working as if I did not exist." -Maria Montessori, Italian educator (1870-1952) 
The greatness of a nation can be judged by the way its animals are treated. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
The habit of reading is the only enjoyment in which there is no alloy; it lasts when all other pleasures fade. -Anthony Trollope
The happiest is the person who suffers the least pain; the most miserable who enjoys the least pleasure. -Jean-Jacques Rousseau, philosopher and author (1712-1778)
The happiness of life is made up of minute fractions--the little, soon-forgotten charities of a kiss or smile, a kind look or heartfelt compliment. -Samuel Taylor Coleridge, poet (1772-1834) 
The happiness of your life depends upon the quality of your thoughts: therefore, guard accordingly, and take care that you entertain no notions unsuitable to virtue and reasonable nature. -Marcus Aurelius (121-180 AD)
The heart has its reasons that the mind knows nothing of. -Blaise Pascal
The heart is wiser than the intellect. -Josiah Holland (1819-1881)
The heights by great men reached and kept / Were not attained by sudden flight, / But they, while their companions slept, / Were toiling upward in the night. -Henry Wadsworth Longfellow, poet (1807-1882)
The higher we soar the smaller we appear to those who cannot fly. -Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche, philosopher (1844-1900)
The highest exercise of charity is charity towards the uncharitable. -J.S. Buckminster, clergyman and editor (1784-1812)
The highest purpose is to have no purpose at all. This puts one in accord with nature in her manner of operation. -John Cage, composer (1912-1992)
The highest reward for a man's toil is not what he gets for it but what he becomes by it. -John Ruskin
The highest reward for a person's toil is not what they get for it, but what they become by it. -John Ruskin
The history of liberty is a history of the limitation of government power, not the increase of it. -Woodrow Wilson, 28th president of the U.S., Nobel peace prize winner (1856-1924)
The hottest places in hell are reserved for those who, in time of great moral crisis, maintain their neutrality. -Dante Alighieri, poet (1265-1321)
The human race has one really effective weapon, and that is laughter.
The human race has one really effective weapon, and that is laughter. -Mark Twain, U.S. Author (1835-1910)
The hypothalamus is one of the most important parts of the brain, involved in many kinds of motivation, among other functions. The hypothalamus controls the "Four F's": fighting, fleeing, feeding, and mating. -Heard in a neuropsychology classroom
The idea that is not dangerous is not worthy of being called an idea at all. -Elbert Hubbard
The ideals which have lighted my way, and time after time have given me new courage to face life cheerfully, have been Kindness, Beauty, and Truth. -Albert Einstein
The illiterate of the 21st century will not be those who cannot read and write, but those who cannot learn, unlearn, and relearn. -Alvin Toffler
The illusion that we are separate from one another is an optical delusion of our consciousness. -Albert Einstein
The important thing in life is not the triumph but the struggle. -Pierre de Coubertin
The impossible is often the untried. -Jim Goodwin
The influence of each human being on others in this life is a kind of immortality. -John Quincy Adams, 6th president of the U.S. (1767-1848)
The innocent and the beautiful have no enemy but time. -William Butler Yeats, writer, Nobel laureate (1865-1939)
The instinct of a man is to pursue everything that flies from him, and to fly from all that pursue him. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
The instruction we find in books is like fire. We fetch it from our neighbours, kindle it at home, communicate it to others, and it becomes the property of all. -Voltaire, philosopher and writer (1694-1778)
The intelligent man who is proud of his intelligence is like the condemned man who is proud of his large cell. -Simone Weil
The journey of a thousand leagues begins from beneath your feet. -Lao Tzu
The key to everything is patience. You get the chicken by hatching the egg, not by smashing it. -Arnold H. Glasow
The large print giveth, and the small print taketh away. -Tom Waits
The law, in its majestic equality, forbids the rich as well as the poor to sleep under bridges, to beg in the streets, and to steal bread. -Anatole France
The least initial deviation from the truth is multiplied later a thousandfold. -Aristotle, philosopher (384-322 BCE)
The liar's punishment is not in the least that he is not believed, but that he cannot believe anyone else. -George Bernard Shaw
The lie that exalts us is dearer than a thousand sober truths. -Alexander Pushkin.
The light which experience gives is a lantern on the stern, which shines only on the waves behind us. -Samuel Taylor Coleridge, poet, critic (1772-1834)
The lights of stars that were extinguished ages ago still reach us. So it is with great men who died centuries ago, but still reach us with the radiation of their personalities. -Kahlil Gibran, poet and artist (1883-1931)
The little I know I owe to my ignorance. -George McGovern
The longing to produce great inspirations didn't produce anything but more longing. -Sophie Kerr
The loss of life will be irreplaceable. -Dan Quayle after the San Francisco earthquake
The louder he talked of his honor, the faster we counted our spoons. -Ralph Waldo Emerson [The Conduct of Life]
The louder he talks of honour, the faster we count our spoons. -Emerson
The louder he talks of honour, the faster we count our spoons. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
The love of learning, the sequestered nooks, / And all the sweet serenity of books. -Henry Wadsworth Longfellow, poet (1807-1882)
The luck of having talent is not enough; one must also have a talent for luck. -Louis-Hector Berlioz, composer (1803-1869)
The lust for comfort murders the passions of the soul. -Kahlil Gibran
The machine does not isolate man from the great problems of nature but plunges him more deeply into them. -Antoine De Saint-Exupery [Wind, Sand, Stars]
The main dangers in this life are the people who want to change everything - or nothing. -Nancy Astor, first woman member of Parliament in England (1879-1964)
The main ingredient of stardom is the rest of the team. -John Wooden
The majority of failures in life are simply the victims of their mental defeats.
The man who claims to be the boss in his own home will lie about other things as well -Amish saying
The man who is a pessimist before forty-eight knows too much; if he is an optimist after it, he knows too little. -Mark Twain, author (1835-1910)
The man who is denied the opportunity of taking decisions of importance begins to regard as important the decisions he is allowed to take. -C. Northcote Parkinson, author and historian (1909-1993)
The man who thinks he can do without the world is indeed mistaken; but the man who thinks the world cannot do without him is mistaken even worse. -Francois, duc de La Rochefoucauld
The mark of a good action is that it appears inevitable in retrospect. -Robert Louis Stevenson
The mass of men lead lives of quiet desperation and go to the grave with the song still in them. -Henry David Thoreau
The means by which we live have outdistanced the ends for which we live. Our scientific power has outrun our spiritual power. We have guided missiles and misguided men. -Martin Luther King, Jr., civil-rights leader (1929-1968)
The measure of a man's real character is what he would do if he knew he would never be found out. -Thomas Babington Macaulay, author and statesman (1800-1859)
The meeting of two personalities is like the contact of two chemical substances: if there is any reaction, both are transformed. -Carl Jung, psychiatrist (1875-1961)
The mind cannot long act the role of the heart. -Francois de la Rochefoucauld
The mind commands the body and the body obeys. The mind commands itself and finds resistance. -St. Augustine (354-430)
The mind has exactly the same power as the hands; not merely to grasp the world, but to change it. -Colin Wilson
The mind is but a barren soil; a soil which is soon exhausted, and will produce no crop, or only one, unless it be continually fertilized and enriched with foreign matter. -Joshua Reynolds, painter (1723-1792)
The mind is its own place, and in itself / Can make a heaven of hell, a hell of heaven. -John Milton (1608-1674) [Paradise Lost]
The mind is its own place, and in itself, can make heaven of Hell, and a hell of Heaven. -John Milton
The mind of man is capable of anything - because everything is in it, all the past as well as all the future. -Joseph Conrad (Heart of Darkness)
The miracle is not that we do this work, but that we are happy to do it. -Mother Teresa
The miracle is not to fly in the air, or to walk on the water, but to walk on the earth. -Chinese proverb
The moment of victory is much too short to live for that and nothing else. -Martina Navratilova
The moment one gives close attention to anything, even a blade of grass, it becomes a mysterious, awesome, indescribably magnificent world in itself. -Henry Miller, novelist (1891-1980)
The more I study physics, the more I am drawn to metaphysics. -Albert Einstein
The more I study religions the more I am convinced that man never worshipped anything but himself. -Richard Francis Burton, explorer and writer (1821-1890)
The more original a discovery, the more obvious it seems afterward. -Arther Koestler
The more original a discovery, the more obvious it seems afterward. -Arthur Koestler
The more sand that has escaped from the hourglass of our life, the clearer we should see through it. -Jean-Paul Sartre, writer and philosopher (1905-1980)
The more we live by our intellect, the less we understand the meaning of life. -Leo Tolstoy, author (1828-1910)
The most common way people give up their power is by thinking they don't have any. -Alice Walker (1944-)
The most dangerous of all falsehoods is a slightly distorted truth. -G.C. Lichtenberg (1742-1799)
The most disadvantageous peace is better than the most just war. -Erasmus (1466-1536)
The most effective kind of education is that a child should play amongst lovely things. -Plato, philosopher (427-347 BCE)
The most exciting phrase to hear in science, the one that heralds new discoveries, is not 'Eureka!' but 'That's funny...' -Isaac Asimov
The most favourable laws can do very little towards the happiness of people when the disposition of the ruling power is adverse to them. -Edmund Burke
The most happy marriage I can picture or imagine to myself would be the union of a deaf man to a blind woman. -Samuel Taylor Coleridge, poet, critic, and philosopher (1772-1834)
The most important political office is that of private citizen. -Louis Brandeis, lawyer, judge, and writer (1856-1941)
The most important thing a father can do for his children is to love their mother. -Theodore M. Hesburgh, educator (1917- )
The most perfect technique is that which is not noticed at all. -Pablo Casals, cellist, conductor, and composer (1876-1973)
The most pitiful among men is he who turns his dreams into silver and gold. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
The most valuable of all talents is that of never using two words when one will do. -Thomas Jefferson
The most wasted of all days is one without laughter. -e.e. cummings, poet (1894-1962)
The mountain remains unmoved at seeming defeat by the mist. -Rabindranath Tagore, poet, philosopher, author, songwriter, painter, educator, composer, Nobel laureate (1861-1941)
The negative is the equivalent of the composer's score, and the print the performance. -Ansel Adams, photographer (1902-1984)
The newer people of this modern age are more eager to amass than to realize. -Rabindranath Tagore, poet, philosopher, author, songwriter, painter, educator, composer, Nobel laureate (1861-1941)
The nice thing about egotists is that they don't talk about other people. -Lucille S. Harper
The nice thing about standards is that there are so many of them to choose from. -Andrew S. Tanenbaum , computer science professor (1944- )
The nicest thing about the promise of spring is that sooner or later she'll have to keep it. -Mark Beltaire
The notes I handle no better than many pianists. But the pauses between the notes -- ah, that is where the art resides. -Artur Schnabel, pianist (1882-1951)
The object of education is to prepare the young to educate themselves throughout their lives. -Robert Maynard Hutchins
The old believe everything, the middle-aged suspect everything, the young know everything. -Oscar Wilde
The older I grow, the more I distrust the familiar doctrine that age brings wisdom. -H.L. Mencken
The older a man gets, the farther he had to walk to school as a boy.
The one real object of education is to have a man in the condition of continually asking questions. -Bishop Mandell Creighton
The one serious conviction that a man should have is that nothing is to be taken too seriously. -Samuel Butler
The one thing in the world, of value, is the active soul. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
The one thing that doesn't abide by majority rule is a person's conscience. -Harper Lee, writer (1926- )
The one thing we can never get enough of is love. And the one thing we never give enough is love. -Henry Miller, writer (1891-1980)
The only Zen you find on the tops of mountains is the Zen you bring up there. -Robert M. Pirsig
The only devils in this world are those running around in our own hearts, and that is where all our battles should be fought. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
The only difference between me and a madman is that I'm not mad. -Salvador Dali, painter (1904-1989) 
The only difference between saints and sinners is that every saint has a past while every sinner has a future. -Oscar Wilde, writer (1854-1900)
The only function of economic forecasting is to make astrology look respectable. -John Kenneth Galbraith
The only gift is giving to the poor; / All else is exchange. -Thiruvalluvar, poet (c. 30 BCE)
The only journey is the one within. -Rainer Maria Rilke
The only man who is really free is the one who can turn down an invitation to dinner without giving an excuse. -Jules Renard, writer (1864-1910)
The only maxim of a free government ought to be to trust no man living with power to endanger the public liberty. -John Adams, 2nd US president (1735-1826)
The only person who is educated is the one who has learned how to learn...and change. -Carl Rogers
The only real voyage of discovery consists not in seeking new landscapes but in having new eyes. -Marcel Proust
The only real way to look younger is not to be born so soon. -Charles Schulz, cartoonist (1922-2000)
The only sure bulwark of continuing liberty is a government strong enough to protect the interests of the people, and a people strong enough and well enough informed to maintain its sovereign control over its government. -Franklin D. Roosevelt, 32nd US President (1882-1945)
The only thing one can do with good advice is to pass it on. It is never of any use to oneself. -Oscar Wilde
The only thing you take with you when you're gone is what you leave behind. -John Allston
The only time you don't fail is the last time you try anything--and it works. -William Strong
The only tyrant I accept in this world is the 'still small voice' within me. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
The only way to compel men to speak good of us is to do it. -Voltaire
The only weapon that becomes sharper with constant use is the tongue.
The only wisdom we can hope to acquire is the wisdom of humility: Humility is endless. -T.S Eliot, poet (1888-1965)
The opinion of 10,000 men is of no value if none of them knows anything about the subject. -Marcus Aurelius
The opposite of a correct statement is a false statement. But the opposite of a profound truth may well be another profound truth. -Niels Bohr, physicist (1885-1962)
The optimist proclaims we live in the best of all possible worlds, and the pessimist fears this is true. -James Branch Cabell, novelist, essayist, critic (1879-1958)
The palest ink is better than the best memory. -Chinese proverb
The past exists only in our memories, the future only in our plans. The present is our only reality. -Robert Pirsig
The past is a foreign country; they do things differently there. -L.P. Hartley, writer (1895-1972)
The penalty that good men pay for not being interested in politics is to be governed by men worse than themselves. -Plato, philosopher (427-347 BCE)
The perfection of art is to conceal art. -Quintilian (Marcus Fabius Quintilianus), rhetorician (c. 35-95)
The phrase "working mother" is redundant. -Jane Sellman
The physical distance between people has nothing to do with loneliness. It's the psychic distance. -Robert Pirsig
The poet judges not as a judge judges but as the sun falling around a helpless thing. -Walt Whitman, poet (1819-1892)
The principal contributor to loneliness in this country is television. What happens is that the family 'gets together' alone. -Ashley Montagu, anthropologist and writer (1905-1999)
The principal mark of genius is not perfection but originality, the opening of new frontiers. -Arthur Koestler
The productions of all arts are kinds of poetry and their craftsmen are all poets. -Plato
The progress of the world is the history of men who would not
The public have an insatiable curiosity to know everything. Except what is worth knowing. Journalism, conscious of this, and having tradesman-like habits, supplies their demands. -Oscar Wilde
The purpose of life is a life of purpose. -Robert Byrne
The quarrels of lovers are like summer storms. Everything is more beautiful when they have passed. -Suzanne Necker, author (1739-1794)
The question is not can they reason? Nor can they talk? But can they suffer? -Jeremy Bentham, jurist and philosopher (1748-1832)
The quiet and solitary man apprehends the inscrutable. He seeks nothing, holds to the mean, and remains free from entanglements. -I Ching (BCE 1150?)
The real art of conversation is not only to say the right thing at the right place but to leave unsaid the wrong thing at the tempting moment. -Dorothy Nevill
The reality of the other person is not in what he reveals to you, but in what he cannot reveal to you. Therefore, if you would understand him, listen not to what he says but rather what he does not say. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
The really efficient laborer will be found not to crowd his day with work, but will saunter to his task surrounded by a wide halo of ease and leisure. -Henry David Thoreau
The reason there are so few female politicians is that it is too much trouble to put makeup on two faces. -Maureen Murphy
The reasonable man adapts himself to the world; the unreasonable one persists in trying to adapt the world to himself. Therefore all progress depends on the unreasonable man. -George Bernard Shaw, writer, Nobel laureate (1856-1950)
The refusal to choose is a form of choice; disbelief is a form of belief. -Frank Barron
The road to wisdom? Well it's plain and simple to express: Err and err and err again, but less and less and less. -Piet Hein, poet and scientist (1905-1996)
The road uphill and the road downhill are one and the same. -Heraclitus, philosopher (Ca. 540-470 BCE)
The roots of education are bitter, but the fruit is sweet. -Aristotle
The safest way to double your money is to fold it over and put it in your pocket. -Kin Hubbard
The secret of education is respecting the pupil. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
The secret of happiness is to admire without desiring. -F.H. Bradley
The secret of joy is the mastery of pain. -Anais Nin, writer (1903-1977)
The secret of life is honesty and fair dealing. If you can fake that, you've got it made. -Groucho Marx
The secret of man's being is not only to live but to have something to live for. -Dostoyevsky
The shoe that fits one person pinches another; there is no recipe for living that suits all cases. -Carl Gustav Jung, psychiatrist and psychologist (1875-1961)
The skill of writing is to create a context in which other people can think. -Edwin Schlossberg, designer (1945- )
The sole meaning of life is to serve humanity. -Leo Tolstoy (1828-1910)
The soul is the same in all living creatures, although the body is different. -Hippocrates, physician (460-c.377 BCE)
The soul would have no rainbow had the eyes no tears. -John Vance Cheney, poet (1848-1922)
The sparrow is sorry for the peacock at the burden of his tail. -Rabindranath Tagore, poet, philosopher, author, songwriter, painter, educator, composer, Nobel laureate (1861-1941)
The spirit of democracy cannot be imposed from without. It has to come from within. -Mohandas K. Gandhi (1869-1948)
The spirit of resistance to government is so valuable on certain occasions that I wish it to be always kept alive. It will often be exercised when wrong, but better so than not to be exercised at all. -Thomas Jefferson (1743-1826)
The squirrel that you kill in jest, dies in earnest. -Henry David Thoreau
The sun, with all those planets revolving around it and dependent upon it, can still ripen a bunch of grapes as if it had nothing else in the universe to do. -Galileo Galilei, physicist and astronomer (1564-1642)
The supreme happiness in life is the conviction that we are loved. -Victor Hugo, poet, novelist, and dramatist (1802-1885)
The surest sign of intelligent life in the universe is that they haven't attempted to contact us. -Bill Watterson
The tax which will be paid for the purpose of education is not more than the thousandth part of what will be paid to kings, priests and nobles who will rise up among us if we leave the people in ignorance. -Thomas Jefferson, third US president, architect and author (1743-1826)
The teacher is like the candle which lights others in consuming itself. -Giovanni Ruffini, writer (1807-1881)
The tears of strangers are only water. -Russian proverb
The television, that insidious beast, that Medusa which freezes a billion people to stone every night, staring fixedly, that Siren which called and sang and promised so much and gave, after all, so little. -Ray Bradbury, science-fiction writer (1920- )
The test of ahimsa is the absence of jealousy. The man whose heart never cherishes even the thought of injury to anyone, who rejoices at the prosperity of even his greatest enemy, that man is the bhakta, he is the yogi, he is the guru of all. -Swami Vivekananda (1863-1902)
The things we admire in men, kindness and generosity, openness, honesty, understanding and feeling are the concomitants of failure in our system. And those traits we detest, sharpness, greed, acquisitiveness, meanness, egotism and self-interest are the traits of success. And while men admire the quality of the first they love the produce of the second. -John Steinbeck, novelist, Nobel laureate (1902-1968)
The time will come when men such as I will look upon the murder of animals as they now look on the murder of men. -Leonardo da Vinci
The time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time. -Bertrand Russell
The traveler has to knock at every alien door to come to his own, and he has to wander through all the outer worlds to reach the innermost shrine at the end. -Rabindranath Tagore [Gitanjali]
The trees that are slow to grow bear the best fruit. -Moliere, actor and playwright (1622-1673)
The trouble with doing nothing is that you never know when you are finished.
The trouble with life in the fast lane is that you get to the other end in an awful hurry. -John Jensen
The trouble with most of us is that we would rather be ruined by praise than saved by criticism.
The trouble with political jokes is that they get elected.
The trouble with the world is that the stupid are cocksure and the intelligent are full of doubt. -Bertrand Russell
The trouble with the world is that the stupid are cocksure and the intelligent are full of doubt. -Bertrand Russell, philosopher, mathematician, and author (1872-1970)
The true civilization is where every man gives to every other every right that he claims for himself. -Robert Green Ingersoll, lawyer and orator (1833-1899)
The true danger is when liberty is nibbled away, for expedients, and by parts. -Edmund Burke, statesman and writer (1729-1797)
The true measure of a man is how he treats someone who can do him absolutely no good. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
The true teacher defends his pupils against his own personal influence. -Amos Bronson Alcott
The true test of a civilization is, not the census, nor the size of the cities, nor the crops - no, but the kind of man the country turns out. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, essayist (1803-1882)
The truly just is he who feels half guilty of your misdeeds. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931)
The truth is a precious commodity. That's why I use it so sparingly. -M. Twain
The truth is rarely pure, and never simple. -Oscar Wilde, writer (1854-1900)
The truth must dazzle gradually / Or every man be blind. -Emily Dickinson (1830-1886)
The two great tragedies in life: not getting what one wants and getting it.
The two most engaging powers of an author are to make new things familiar, and familiar things new. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
The ultimate test of a moral society is the kind of world that it leaves to its children. -Dietrich Bonhoeffer, theologian (1906-1945)
The universe is full of magical things, patiently waiting
The universe is full of magical things, patiently waiting for our wits to grow sharper. -Eden Phillpotts
The unluckiest insolvent in the world is the man whose expenditure of speech is too great for his income of ideas. -Christopher Morley, writer (1890-1957)
The urge to save humanity is almost always a false front for the urge to rule. -H.L. Mencken, writer, editor, and critic (1880-1956)
The value of marriage is not that adults produce children, but that children produce adults. -Peter De Vries, editor, novelist (1910-1993) [The Tunnel of Love, 1954]
The value of the average conversation could be enormously improved by the constant use of four simple words: "I do not know." -Andre Maurois
The vast majority of human beings dislike and even dread all notions with which they are not familiar. Hence it comes about that at their first appearance innovators have always been derided as fools and madmen. -Aldous Huxley (1894-1963) 
The violets in the mountains have broken the rocks. -Tennessee Williams, dramatist (1911-1983)
The walls of books around him, dense with the past, formed a kind of insulation against the present world and its disasters. -Ross MacDonald
The wastebasket is a writer's best friend. -Isaac Bashevis Singer, writer, Nobel laureate (1904-1991)
The way I see it, if you want rainbow, you gotta put up with the rain. -Dolly Parton
The way of the mystic and the way of the artist are related, except that the mystic doesn't have the craft. -Jean Erdman
The way to become boring is to say everything. -Voltaire
The way up and the way down are the same. -Dostoevsky
The whole drift of my education goes to persuade me that the world of our present consciousness is only one out of many worlds of consciousness that exist. -William James
The whole point of getting things done is knowing what to leave undone. -Stella, Lady Reading
The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, and wiser people so full of doubts. -Bertrand Russell
The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, and wiser people so full of doubts. -Bertrand Russell, philosopher, mathematician, author, Nobel laureate (1872-1970)
The wild, cruel beast is not behind the bars of the cage. He is in front of it. -Axel Munthe
The willing contemplation of vice is vice. -Arabic proverb
The willow which bends to the tempest, often escapes better than the oak which resists it; and so in great calamities, it sometimes happens that light and frivolous spirits recover their elasticity and presence of mind sooner than those of a loftier character. -Walter Scott (1771-1832)
The wise are instructed by reason, average minds by experience, the stupid by necessity and the brute by instinct. -Marcus Tullius Cicero, statesman, orator and writer (106-43 BCE)
The wise through excessive wisdom is made a fool. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
The woods are lovely, dark and deep. / But I have promises to keep, / And miles to go before I sleep / And miles to go before I sleep. -Robert Frost, poet (1874-1963)
The words of truth are always paradoxical. -Lao Tzu
The world has achieved brilliance without conscience. Ours is a world of nuclear giants and ethical infants. -Gen. Omar Bradley
The world in general doesn't know what to make of originality; it is startled out of its comfortable habits of thought, and its first reaction is one of anger.  -W. Somerset Maugham, writer (1874-1965)
The world is a book, and those who do not travel read only a page. -Saint Augustine
The world is a looking glass and gives back to every man the reflection of his own face. -William Thackeray
The world is a looking glass, and gives back to every man the reflection of his own face. -William Makepeace Thackeray, novelist (1811-1863)
The world is changed not by the self-regarding, but by men and women prepared to make fools of themselves. -P.D. James
The world is filled with willing people; some willing to work, the rest willing to let them. -Robert Frost
The world is made for people who aren't cursed with self-awareness. -the character Annie Savoy in the film Bull Durham
The world is my country, all mankind are my brethren, and to do good is my religion. -Thomas Paine
The world is round and the place which may seem like the end may also be only the beginning. -George Baker (1877-1965)
The world isn't worse. It's just that the news coverage is so much better.
The world of books is the most remarkable creation of man. Nothing else that he builds ever lasts. Monuments fall; nations perish; civilizations grow old and die out; and, after an era of darkness, new races build others. -Clarence Day, writer, (1874-1935)
The world, we are told, was made especially for man--a presumption not supported by all the facts... Why should man value himself as more than a small part of the one great unit of creation? -John Muir, Naturalist and explorer (1838-1914)
The worst misfortune that can happen to an ordinary man is to have an extraordinary father. -Austin O'Malley
The worst of all deceptions is self-deception. -Plato
The worst thing about new books is that they keep us from reading the old ones. -Joseph Joubert (1754-1824)
The worth of a book is to be measured by what you can carry away from it. -James Bryce
The young wish to give their elders the full benefits of their inexperience.
The zoo is a prison for animals who have been sentenced without trial and I feel guilty because I do nothing about it. I wanted to see an oyster-catcher, so I was no better than the people who caged the oyster-catcher for me to see. -Russell Hoban, author (1925- )
There are 10^11 stars in the galaxy. That used to be a huge number. But it's only a hundred billion. It's less than the national deficit! We used to call them astronomical numbers. Now we should call them economical numbers. -Richard Feynman, physicist, Nobel laureate  (1918-1988)
There are a thousand thoughts lying within a man that he does not know till he takes up a pen to write. -William Makepeace Thackeray, novelist (1811-1863)
There are books in which the footnotes or comments scrawled by some reader's hand in the margin are more interesting that the text. The world is one of these books. -George Santayana, philosopher (1863-1952)
There are many ways to be free. One of them is to transcend reality by imagination, as I try to do. -Anais Nin (1903-1977) [The Diary of Anais Nin]
There are men who would quickly love each other if once they were to speak to each other; for when they spoke they would discover that their souls had only separated by phantoms and delusions. -Ernest Hello
There are no facts, only interpretations. -Friedrich Nietzsche
There are no passengers on spaceship earth. We are all crew. -Marshall McLuhan (1911-1980)
There are no persons capable of stooping so low as those who desire to rise in the world. -Lady Marguerite Blessington, writer (1789-1849)
There are only two enterprises that refer to their customers as users, and one is illegal. -Michael Hammer
There are only two kinds of men: the righteous who believe themselves sinners; the sinners who believe themselves righteous. -Blaise Pascal, philosopher and mathematician (1623-1662)
There are only two lasting bequests we can hope to give our
There are only two lasting bequests we can hope to give our children. One of these is roots, the other, wings. -Hodding Carter
There are some things so serious you have to laugh at them. -Niels Henrik David Bohr (1885-1962), Danish chemist, physicist
There are three ingredients to the good life; learning, earning, and yearning. -Christopher Morley, writer (1890-1957)
There are times when we must sink to the bottom of our misery to understand truth, just as we must descend to the bottom of a well to see the stars in broad daylight. -Vaclav Havel, writer, Czech Republic president (1936- )
There are two kinds of fools: One says, "This is old, therefore it is good"; the other says, "This is new, therefore it is better." -William R. Inge, clergyman, scholar, and author (1860-1954)
There are two kinds of light--the glow that illuminates, and the glare that obscures. -James Thurber
There are two kinds of men who never amount to much: those who cannot do what they are told, and those who can do nothing else. -Cyrus Curtis
There are two perfect men; one dead, and the other unborn. -Chinese proverb
There are two ways of exerting one's strength: one is pushing down, the other is pulling up. -Booker T. Washington
There are two ways of spreading light: to be the candle or the mirror that reflects it. -Edith Wharton, novelist (1862-1937)
There are two ways to slide easily through life: to believe everything or to doubt everything; both ways save us from thinking. -Theodore Rubin
There is a budding morrow in midnight. -John Keats
There is a close correlation between getting up in the morning and getting up in the world. -Ron Dentinger
There is a foolish corner in the brain of the wisest man. -Aristotle, philosopher (384-322 BCE)
There is a great man who makes every man feel small. But the real great man is the man who makes every man feel great. -G.K. Chesterton
There is a luxury in self-reproach. When we blame ourselves we feel that no one else has the right to blame us. -Oscar Wilde
There is a pleasure sure, in being mad, which none but madmen know. -John Dryden, poet and dramatist (1631-1700)
There is a point beyond which even justice becomes unjust. -Sophocles, Electra
There is a point beyond which even justice becomes unjust. -Sophocles, Greek dramatist (495?-406 BCE)
There is a wisdom in this beyond the rules of physic: a man's own observation what he finds good of and what he finds hurt of is the best physic to preserve health. -Francis Bacon, essayist, philosopher, and statesman (1561-1626)
There is a word sweeter than mother, home or heaven -- that word is liberty. -Epitaph on the grave of Matilda Joslyn Gage, suffragist, abolitionist (1826-1898)
There is also this benefit in brag, that the speaker is unconsciously expressing his own ideal. Humor him by all means, draw it all out, and hold him to it. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
There is an easy answer to your problem that is neat, plausible, and wrong.
There is hopeful symbolism in the fact that flags do not wave in a vacuum. -Arthur C. Clarke, writer (1917- )
There is more to life than increasing its speed. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi
There is more to life than increasing its speed. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (1869-1948)
There is no agony like bearing an untold story inside of you. -Maya Angelou, poet (1928- )
There is no character, howsoever good and fine, but it can be destroyed by ridicule, howsoever poor and witless. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
There is no course of life so weak and sottish as that which is managed by order, method, and discipline. -Montaigne
There is no den in the wide world to hide a rogue. Commit a crime and the earth is made of glass. Commit a crime, and it seems as if a coat of snow fell on the ground, such as reveals in the woods the track of every partridge, and fox, and squirrel. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
There is no disguise that can for long conceal love where it exists or simulate it where it does not. -Francois de La Rochefoucauld
There is no excellent beauty that hath not some strangeness in the proportion. -Francis Bacon (1561-1626)
There is no fire like passion, there is no shark like hatred, there is no snare like folly, there is no torrent like greed. -Buddha
There is no frigate like a book / To take us lands away, / Nor any coursers like a page / Of prancing poetry. -Emily Dickinson, poet (1830-1886)
There is no fundamental difference between man and the lower animals in their mental faculties... The lower animals, like man, manifestly feel pleasure and pain, happiness, and misery. -Charles Darwin (1809-1882) 
There is no greater sorrow than to recall a time of happiness in misery. -Dante
There is no greatness where there is not simplicity, goodness, and truth. -Leo Tolstoy, novelist and philosopher (1828-1910)
There is no kind of dishonesty into which otherwise good people more easily and frequently fall than that of defrauding the government. -Benjamin Franklin, statesman, author, and inventor (1706-1790)
There is no king who has not had a slave among his ancestors, and no slave who has not had a king among his. -Helen Adams Keller (1880-1968)
There is no need for temples, no need for complicated philosophy. Our own brain, our own heart is our temple; the philosophy is kindness. -Dalai Lama
There is no one, no matter how wise he is, who has not in his youth said things or done things that are so unpleasant to recall in later life that he would expunge them entirely from his memory if that were possible. -Marcel Proust, novelist (1871-1922)
There is no pleasure in having nothing to do; the fun is in having lots to do and not doing it. -Mary Little
There is no point at which you can say, 'Well, I'm successful now. I might as well take a nap.' -Carrie Fisher
There is no religion without love, and people may talk as much as they life about their religion, but if it does not teach them to be good and kind to other animals as well as humans, it is all a sham. -Anna Sewell [Black Beauty]
There is no remedy so easy as books, which if they do not give cheerfulness, at least restore quiet to the most troubled mind. -Lady Mary Wortley Montagu, author (1689-1762)
There is no revenge so complete as forgiveness. -Josh Billings, columnist and humorist (1818-1885)
There is no right way to do wrong.
There is no rule more invariable than that we are paid for our suspicions by finding what we suspect. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
There is no security on this earth. There is only opportunity.
There is no such thing as a 'self-made' man. We are made up of thousands of others. Everyone who has ever done a kind deed for us, or spoken one word of encouragement to us, has entered into the make-up of our character and of our thoughts. -George Matthew Adams
There is no such thing in anyone's life as an unimportant day. -Alexander Woollcott
There is no surer way to misread any document than to read it literally. -Learned Hand, jurist (1872-1961) 
There is no terror in the bang, only in the anticipation of it. -Alfred Hitchcock, film-maker (1899-1980)
There is nothing like dream to create the future. Utopia to-day, flesh and blood tomorrow. -Victor Hugo, poet, novelist, and dramatist (1802-1885)
There is nothing like returning to a place that remains unchanged to find the ways in which you yourself have altered. -Nelson Mandela [A Long Walk to Freedom]
There is nothing more frightful than ignorance in action. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (1749-1832)
There is nothing so disagreeable, that a patient mind cannot find some solace for it. -Lucius Annaeus Seneca, Roman philosopher (BCE 3-65 CE)
There is nothing with which every man is so afraid as getting to know how enormously much he is capable of doing and becoming. -Soren Kierkegaard
There is nothing worse than a sharp image of a fuzzy concept. -Ansel Adams
There is one art of which man should be master, the art of reflection. -Samuel Taylor Coleridge (1772-1834)
There is one art, no more, no less: to do all things with artlessness. -Piet Hein, poet and scientist (1905-1996)
There is one thing stronger that all the armies in the world; and that is an idea whose time has come. -Victor Hugo
There is pleasure in the pathless woods, / There is rapture in the lonely shore, / There is society where none intrudes, / By the deep sea, and music in its roar: / I love not man the less, but nature more. -Lord Byron, poet (1788-1824)
There is this difference between happiness and wisdom, that he that thinks himself the happiest man really is so; but he that thinks himself the wisest is generally the greatest fool. -Charles Caleb Colton (1780-1832)
There is, nevertheless, a certain respect and a general duty of humanity that ties us, not only to beasts that have life and sense, but even to trees and plants. -Michel de Montaigne, essayist (1533-1592)
There lives more faith in honest doubt, / Believe me, than in half the creeds. -Alfred, Lord Tennyson, poet (1809-1892)
There may be times when we are powerless to prevent injustice, but there must never be a time when we fail to protest. -Elie Wiesel, writer, Nobel laureate (1928- )
There must be more to life than sitting wondering if there is more to life.
There never was child so lovely but his mother was glad to get him asleep. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
There never was night that had no morn. -Dinah Mulock Craik
There was never a genius without a tincture of madness. -Aristotle, philosopher (384-322 BCE)
There would be no society if living together depended upon understanding each other. -Eric Hoffer, philosopher and author (1902-1983)
There're two possible outcomes: If the result confirms the hypothesis, then you've made a measurement. If the result is contrary to the hypothesis, then you've made a discovery. -Enrico Fermi, physicist and Nobel laureate (1901-1954)
There's a fine line between being on the leading edge and being in the lunatic fringe. -Frank Armstrong [Preparing for Tomorrow's Challenges]
There's a fine line between genius and insanity. I have erased this line. -Oscar Levant
There's a schizoid quality to our relationship with animals, in which sentiment and brutality exist side by side. Half the dogs in America will receive Christmas presents this year, yet few of us pause to consider the miserable life of the pig -- an animal easily as intelligent as a dog -- that becomes the Christmas ham. -Michael Pollan, professor and writer (1955- )
There's no sauce in the world like hunger. -Miguel de Cervantes, novelist (1547-1616)
There's not enough sax and violins on television.
There's nothing that keeps its youth, / So far as I know, but a tree and truth. -Oliver Wendell Holmes, Sr., poet, novelist, essayist, and physician (1809-1894)
Thesaurus: n. ancient reptile with large vocabulary.
These are only my opinions. You should see my convictions.
These are the tries that time men's soles. -Heard at a track and field tryout
These days people seek knowledge, not wisdom. Knowledge is of the past, wisdom is of the future. -Vernon Cooper
They also serve who only stand and wait. -John Milton, poet (1608-1674)
They are ill discoverers that think there is no land, when they can see nothing but sea. -Francis Bacon, essayist, philosopher, and statesman (1561-1626)
They asked me to go in front of the Reagans. I'm not used to going in front of President Reagan, so we went out behind the Bushes. -Dan Quayle, Former U.S. Vice President (1947-)
They called me mad, and I called them mad, and damn them, they outvoted me. -Nathaniel Lee (on being consigned to a mental institution, circa 17th c.)
They came for the communists, and I did not speak up because I wasn't a communist; They came for the socialists, and I did not speak up because I was not a socialist; They came for the union leaders, and I did not speak up because I wasn't a union leader; They came for the Jews, and I didn't speak up because I wasn't a Jew. Then they came for me, and there was no one left to speak up for me. -Martin Niemoller (1892-1984)
They know enough who know how to learn. -Henry Adams (1838-1918)
They may forget what you said, but they will never forget how you made them feel. -Carl W. Buechner
They say that God is everywhere, and yet we always think of Him as somewhat of a recluse. -Emily Dickinson, poet (1830-1886)
They that can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety deserve neither liberty nor safety. -Benjamin Franklin, statesman, author, and inventor (1706-1790)
They used to say that knowledge is power. I used to think so, but I now know that they mean money. -Lord Byron, poet (1788-1824)
Think like a man of action, act like a man of thought. -Henri Bergson
Think not those faithful who praise all thy words and actions; but those who kindly reprove thy faults. -Socrates, philosopher (469?-399 BCE)
This 'telephone' has too many shortcomings to be seriously considered as a means of communication. The device is inherently of no value to us. -Western Union internal memo, 1876
This above all: to thine own self be true, / And it must follow, as the night the day, / Thou canst not then be false to any man. -Shakespeare
This grand show is eternal. It is always sunrise somewhere: the dew is never all dried at once: a shower is forever falling, vapor is ever rising. Eternal sunrise, eternal sunset, eternal dawn and gloaming, on sea and continents and islands, each in its turn, as the round earth rolls. -John Muir, naturalist, explorer, and writer (1838-1914)
This is his first punishment, that by the verdict of his own heart no guilty man is acquitted. -Juvenal, poet (c. 60-140)
This is my rule of married life: it's better to be happy than to be right. -Click & Clack, the Tappet Brothers
This is the devilish thing about foreign affairs: they are foreign and will not always conform to our whim. -James Reston, journalist (1909-1995)
This is the final test of the gentleman: his respect for those who can be of no possible service to him. -William Lyon Phelps
This is the way the world ends / Not with a bang but a whimper. -T.S. Eliot, poet (1888-1965)
This isn't right. This isn't even wrong. -Wolfgang Pauli
This president is going to lead us out of this recovery. It will happen. -Dan Quayle at a campaign stop
This sentance has threee errors.
This sentence no verb.
This statement is in no way to be construed as a disclaimer.
This time, like all times, is a very good one, if we but know what to do with it. -Emerson
This time, like all times, is a very good one, if we but know what to do with it. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
This will never be a civilized country until we spend more money for books than we do on chewing gum. -Elbert Hubbard
Those of you who think you know everything are annoying those of us who do.
Those who are incapable of committing great crimes do not readily suspect them in others. -Francois De La Rochefoucauld (1613-1680)
Those who are lifting the world upward and onward are those who encourage more than criticize. -Elizabeth Harrison
Those who bring sunshine to the lives of others cannot keep it from themselves. -James Matthew Barrie, author (1860-1937)
Those who cannot forgive others break the bridge over which they themselves must pass. -Confucius
Those who cannot remember the past are condemned to repeat it. -George Santayana, philosopher (1863-1952)
Those who dream by day are cognizant of many things which escape those who dream only by night. -Edgar Allan Poe, poet and short-story writer (1809-1849)
Those who failed to oppose me, who readily agreed with me, accepted all my views, and yielded easily to my opinions, were those who did me the most injury, and were my worst enemies, because, by surrendering to me so easily, they encouraged me to go too far... I was then too powerful for any man, except myself, to injure me. -Napoleon Bonaparte, emperor of France 1769-1821)
Those who give you a serpent when you ask for a fish, may have nothing but serpents to give. It is then generosity on their part. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Those who insist on the dignity of their office show they have not deserved it. -Baltasar Gracian, philosopher and writer (1601-1658)
Those who know nothing of foreign languages know nothing of their own. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, dramatist, novelist, and philosopher (1749-1832)
Those who profess to favor freedom and yet deprecate agitation, are men who want crops without plowing the ground. -Frederick Douglass, abolitionist, editor and orator (1817-1895)
Those who will not reason, are bigots, those who cannot, are fools, and those who dare not, are slaves. -Lord Byron (1788-1824)
Those who wish to sing always find a song. -Swedish proverb
Those who would have nothing to do with thorns must neve attempt to gather flowers.
Those who would have nothing to do with thorns must never attempt to gather flowers.
Those who write against vanity want the glory of having written well, and their readers the glory of reading well, and I who write this have the same desire, as perhaps those who read this have also. -Blaise Pascal (1623-1662)
Those who write clearly have readers, those who write obscurely have commentators. -Albert Camus, writer and philosopher (1913-1960)
Though we travel the world over to find the beautiful, we must carry it with us or we find it not. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
Thought is the blossom; language the bud; action the fruit behind it. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Thought is the blossom; language the bud; action the fruit behind. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Thought is the labour of the intellect, reverie is its pleasure. -Victor Hugo
Three grand essentials to happiness in this life are something to do, something to love, and something to hope for. -Joseph Addison, writer (1672-1719)
Through all the world there goes one long cry from the heart of the artist: Give me leave to do my utmost. -Isak Dinesen (pen name of Karen Blixen), author (1885-1962)
Time engraves our faces with all the tears we have not shed. -Natalie Clifford Barney, Author (1876-1972)
Time has a wonderful way of weeding out the trivial. -Richard Ben Sapir
Time is a great teacher, but unfortunately it kills all its pupils. H.Berlioz
Time is an illusion perpetrated by the manufacturers of space.
Time is but the stream I go a-fishing in. -Henry David Thoreau
Time is nature's way of making sure everything doesn't happen at once.
Time is the best teacher; unfortunately, it kills all its students.
Time is the coin of your life. It is the only coin you have, and only you can determine how it will be spent. Be careful lest you let other people spend it for you. -Carl Sandburg, poet (1878-1967)
Time spent laughing is time spent with the gods. -Japanese proverb
Times are bad. Children no longer obey their parents, and everyone is writing a book. -Marcus Tullius Cicero, statesman, orator and writer (106-43 BCE)
'Tis very certain that each man carries in his eye the exact indication of his rank in the immense scale of men, and we are always learning to read it. A complete man should need no auxiliaries to his personal presence. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
To a worm in horseradish, the whole world is horseradish. -Yiddish proverb
To announce that there must be no criticism of the President, or that we are to stand by the President, right or wrong, is not only unpatriotic and servile, but is morally treasonable to the American public. -Theodore Roosevelt, 26th US President (1858-1919)
To appreciate nonsense requires a serious interest in life. -Gelett Burgess (1866-1951)
To avoid criticism do nothing, say nothing, be nothing. -Elbert Hubbard
To be a philosopher is not merely to have subtle thoughts, nor even to found a school, but so to love wisdom as to live according to its dictates, a life of simplicity, independence, magnanimity, and trust. -Henry David Thoreau, naturalist and author (1817-1862)
To be able under all circumstances to practice five things constitutes perfect virtue; these five things are gravity, generosity of soul, sincerity, earnestness and kindness. -Confucius, philosopher and teacher (c. 551-478 BCE)
To be satisfied with what one has; that is wealth. As long as one sorely needs a certain additional amount, that man isn't rich. -Mark Twain (1835-1910)
To be sure, the dog is loyal. But why, on that account, should we take him as an example? He is loyal to man, not to other dogs. -Karl Kraus
To be well informed, one must read quickly a great number of merely instructive books. To be cultivated, one must read slowly and with a lingering appreciation the comparatively few books that have been written by men who lived, thought, and felt with style. -Aldous Huxley, writer (1894-1963)
To be without some of the things you want is an indispensable part of happiness.  -Bertrand Russell
To be without some of the things you want is an indispensable part of happiness. -Bertrand Russell
To believe that what has not occured in history will not occur at all, is to argue disbelief in the dignity of man. -Mahatma Gandhi
To believe that what has not occurred in history will not occur at all, is to argue disbelief in the dignity of man. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
To call war the soil of courage and virtue is like calling debauchery the soil of love. -George Santayana (1863-1952)
To confront a person with his own shadow is to show him his own light. -Carl G. Jung, psychiatrist (1875-1961)
To cultivate kindness is a valuable part of the business of life. -Samuel Johnson (1709-1784)
To do great work a man must be very idle as well as very industrious. -Samuel Butler, poet (1612-1680)
To do nothing is sometimes a good remedy. -Hippocrates, physician (460-c.377 BCE)
To feed men and not to love them is to treat them as if they were barnyard cattle. To love them and not respect them is to treat them as if they were household pets. -Mencius, philosopher (c. 380-289 BCE)
To find the universal elements enough; to find the air and the water exhilarating; to be refreshed by a morning walk or an evening saunter... to be thrilled by the stars at night; to be elated over a bird's nest or a wildflower in spring - these are some of the rewards of the simple life. -John Burroughs, naturalist and writer (1837-1921)
To gain that worth having, it may be necessary to lose everything else. -Bernadette Devlin
To give pleasure to a single heart by a single act is better than a thousand heads bowing in prayer. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
To give pleasure to a single heart by a single kind act is better than a thousand head-bowings in prayer. -Saadi, poet (c. 1200 AD)
To have and not to give is often worse than to steal. -Marie Von Ebner-Eschenbach
To have doubted one's own first principles is the mark of a civilized man. -Oliver Wendell Holmes, Sr., poet, novelist, essayist, and physician (1809-1894)
To have great poets, there must be great audiences. -Walt Whitman, poet (1819-1892)
To himself everyone is immortal; he may know that he is going to die, but he can never know that he is dead. -Samuel Butler, writer (1835-1902)
To hold and fill to overflowing Is not as good as to stop in time. Sharpen a knife-edge to its very sharpest, And the edge will not last long. -Lao-Tzu, Chinese philosopher (circa 600 BCE)
To kill time is not murder, it's suicide. -William James, psychologist and philosopher (1842-1910)
To know how to hide one's ability is great skill. -Francois de La Rochefoucauld, writer (1613-1680)
To know the road ahead, ask those coming back. -Chinese Proverb
To laugh often and much; to win the respect of intelligent people and the affection of children; to earn the appreciation of honest critics and endure the betrayal of false friends; to appreciate beauty; to find the best in others; to leave the world a bit better, whether by a healthy child, a garden patch or a redeemed social condition; to know even one life has breathed easier because you have lived. This is to have succeeded. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
To listen to some devout people, one would imagine that God never laughs. -Aurobindo Ghose, Indian philosopher (1872-1950)
To live content with small means; to seek elegance rather than luxury, and refinement rather than fashion; to be worthy, not respectable, and wealthy, not, rich; to listen to stars and birds, babes and sages, with open heart; to study hard; to think quietly, act frankly, talk gently, await occasions, hurry never; in a word, to let the spiritual, unbidden and unconscious, grow up through the common--this is my symphony. -William Henry Channing, clergyman, reformer (1810-1884)
To live for some future goal is shallow. It's the sides of the mountain that sustain life, not the top. -Robert M. Pirsig, author [Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance]
To live is so startling, it leave little time for anything else. -Emily Dickinson (1830-1886)
To love and be loved is to feel the sun from both sides. -David Viscott
To love is to admire with the heart; to admire is to love with the mind. -Theophile Gautier, writer (1811-1872)
To love is to receive a glimpse of heaven. -Karen Sunde, playwright
To love oneself is the beginning of a lifelong romance. -Oscar Wilde, writer (1854-1900)
To my mind to kill in war is not a whit better than to commit ordinary murder. -Albert Einstein
To my mind to kill in war is not a whit better than to commit ordinary murder. -Albert Einstein (1879-1955)
To my mind, the life of a lamb is no less precious than that of a human being. I should be unwilling to take the life of the lamb for the sake of the human body. I hold that, the more helpless a creature, the more entitled it is to protection by man from the cruelty of man. -Mahatma Gandhi
To my mind, the life of a lamb is no less precious than that of a human being. I should be unwilling to take the life of the lamb for the sake of the human body. I hold that, the more helpless a creature, the more entitled it is to protection by man from the cruelty of man. -Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)
To own a bit of ground, to scratch it with a hoe, to plant seeds and watch their renewal of life -- this is the commonest delight of the race, the most satisfactory thing a man can do. -Charles Dudley Warner, author, editor, and publisher (1829-1900)
To philosophize is to doubt. -Montaigne
To remain caught up in ideas and words about Zen is, as the old masters say, to "stink of Zen." -Alan Watts
To resist the frigidity of old age one must combine the body, the mind and the heart - and to keep them in parallel vigor one must exercise, study and love. -Karl Viktor von Bonstetten, author (1745-1832)
To see a world in a grain of sand, / And a heaven in a wild flower, / Hold infinity in the palm of your hand, / And eternity in an hour. -William Blake, poet, engraver, and painter (1757-1827)
To see things in the seed, that is genius. -Lao-tzu
To sit alone in the lamplight with a book spread out before you, and hold intimate converse with men of unseen generations--such is a pleasure beyond compare. -Kenko Yoshida, essayist (1283-1352)
To stumble twice against the same stone is a proverbial disgrace. -Cicero
To succeed in politics, it is often necessary to rise above your principles.
To talk goodness is not good... Only to do it is. -Chinese Proverb
To teach is to learn twice. -Joseph Joubert (1754-1824)
To the complaint, 'There are no people in these photographs,' I respond, 'There are always two people: the photographer and the viewer.' -Ansel Adams, photographer (1902-1984)
To the mind that is still, the whole universe surrenders. -Lao-Tzu, philosopher (6th century BCE)
To the question whether I am a pessimist or an optimist, I answer that my knowledge is pessimistic, but my willing and hoping are optimistic. -Albert Schweitzer, philosopher, physician, musician, Nobel laureate (1875-1965)
To those who do not know mathematics it is difficult to get across a real feeling as to the beauty, the deepest beauty of nature. If you want to learn about nature, to appreciate nature, it is necessary to understand the language that she speaks in. -Richard Feynman (1918-1988)
To travel hopefully is a better thing than to arrive, and the true success is to labour. -Robert L. Stevenson
To understand the heart and mind of a person, look not at what he has already achieved, but at what he aspires to. -Kahlil Gibran, mystic, poet, and artist (1883-1931)
To understand your parents' love, bear your own children. -Chinese saying
To wish to be well is a part of becoming well. -Seneca
Today I am more than ever frightened. I wish it would dawn upon engineers that, in order to be an engineer, it is not enough to be an engineer. -Jose Ortega y Gasset
Today is the tomorrow you worried about yesterday.
Today the real test of power is not capacity to make war but capacity to prevent it. -Anne O'Hare McCormick
Toe: A part of the foot used to find furniture in the dark. -Rilla May
Too bad all the people who know how to run the country are busy driving cabs and cutting hair. -George Burns
Too many have dispensed with generosity in order to practice charity. -Albert Camus, writer and philosopher (1913-1960)
Too many people spend money they haven't earned, to buy things they don't want, to impress people they don't like. -Will Rogers
Too much consistency is as bad for the mind as for the body. -Aldous Huxley
Too much sanity may be madness. And maddest of all, to see life as it is and not as it should be! -Miguel de Cervantes, writer (1547-1616)
Too often we enjoy the comfort of opinion without the discomfort of thought. -John F. Kennedy, 35th US president (1917-1963)
Too often we underestimate the power of a touch, a smile, a kind word, a listening ear, an honest compliment, or the smallest act of caring, all of which have the potential to turn a life around. -Leo Buscaglia, author (1924-1998)
Travel is fatal to prejudice, bigotry, and narrow-mindedness. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
Traveling is a fool's paradise... I pack my trunk, embrace my friends, embark on the sea and at last wake up in Naples, and there besides me is the stern fact, the sad self, unrelenting, identical, that I fled from. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, philosopher and writer (1803-1882)
Treat people as if they were what they ought to be, and you help them to become what they are capable of being. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (1749-1832)
Trees are not known by their leaves, nor even by their blossoms, but by their fruits. -Eleanor of Aquitaine (1122-1204)
Trees are the earth's endless effort to speak to the listening heaven. -Rabindranath Tagore, poet, philosopher, author, songwriter, painter, educator, composer, Nobel laureate (1861-1941)
Triumph is just "umph" added to try.
Troubles are like babies; they only grow by nursing.
True friendship is a plant of slow growth, and must undergo and withstand the shocks of adversity before it is entitled to the appellation. -George Washington (1732-1799)
True friendship is like sound health; the value of it is seldom known until it be lost. -Charles Caleb Colton (1780-1832)
True happiness consists not in the multitude of friends, but in their worth and choice. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
Trust in Allah, but tie your camel. -Arabic saying
Trust men and they will be true to you; treat them greatly and they will show themselves great. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Truth can never be told so as to be understood, and not be believed. -William Blake
Truth often suffers more by the heat of its defenders than the arguments of its opposers. -William Penn
Truth, like gold, is to be obtained not by its growth, but by washing away from it all that is not gold. -Leo Tolstoy
Try to learn something about everything and everything about something. -Thomas Henry Huxley, biologist (1825-1895)
Try to relax and enjoy the crisis. -Ashleigh Brilliant, writer (1933- )
Turn your face to the sun and the shadows fall behind you. -Maori Proverb
Two rules to success in life: 1. Don't tell people everything you know.
Two step formula for handling stress: 1. Don't sweat the small stuff. 2. Remember that it's all small stuff. -Anthony Robbins
Ultimately, the only power to which man should aspire is that which he exercises over himself. -Elie Wiesel, writer, Nobel laureate (1928- )
Uncertainty and mystery are energies of life. Don't let them scare you unduly, for they keep boredom at bay and spark creativity. -R. I. Fitzhenry
Under democracy one party always devotes its chief energies to trying to prove that the other party is unfit to rule - and both commonly succeed, and are right. -H.L. Mencken, writer, editor, and critic (1880-1956)
Under-Achievers Anonymous has an 11-step program.
Understanding a person does not mean condoning; it only means that one does not accuse him as if one were God or a judge placed above him. -Erich Fromm, psychoanalyst and author (1900-1980)
Uneasy lies the head that wears a crown. -William Shakespeare, playwright and poet (1564-1616)
Unless a man has been taught what to do with success after getting it, the achievement of it must inevitably leave him a prey to boredom. -Bertrand Russell
Unthinking respect for authority is the greatest enemy of truth. -Albert Einstein, physicist, Nobel laureate (1879-1955)
Until he extends the circle of his compassion to all living things, man will not himself find peace. -Albert Schweitzer, philosopher, physician, and musician (Nobel 1952)
Until it is kindled by a spirit as flamingly alive as the one which gave it birth a book is dead to us. Words divested of their magic are but dead hieroglyphs. -Henry Miller, novelist (1891-1980)
Until lions have their historians, tales of the hunt shall always glorify the hunter. -African proverb
Until you make peace with who you are, you'll never be content with what you have. -Doris Mortman
Until you've lost your reputation, you never realize what a burden it was or what freedom really is. -Margaret Mitchell, novelist (1900-1949)
Use the talents you possess, for the woods would be a very silent place if no birds sang except the best. -Henry Van Dyke
Vague and insignificant forms of speech, and abuse of language have so long passed for mysteries of science; and hard and misapplied words, with little or no meaning, have, by prescription, such a right to be mistaken for deep learning and height of speculation, that it will not be easy to persuade either those who speak or those who hear them, that they are but the covers of ignorance, and hindrance of true knowledge. -John Locke, philosopher (1632-1704)
Vanity made the revolution; liberty was only a pretext. -Napoleon
Very few profundities can be expressed in less than 80 characters.
Violence is the last resort of the incompetent.
Visits always give pleasure - if not the arrival, the departure. -Portuguese Proverb
Volcano: A mountain with hiccups.
Walking is also an ambulation of mind. -Gretel Ehrlich, novelist, poet, and essayist (1946- )
Walking is man's best medicine. -Hippocrates, the Father of Medicine (460-377 BCE)
War is God's way of teaching Americans geography. -Ambrose Bierce, writer (1842-1914)
War is an instrument entirely inefficient toward redressing wrong; and multiplies, instead of indemnifying losses. -Thomas Jefferson (1743-1826) [The New Dictionary of Thoughts]
War spares not the brave, but the cowardly.
Warranty and guaranty clauses are voided by payment of the invoice.
Was there ever any domination that did not appear natural to those who possessed it? -John Stuart Mill (1806-1873)
Washing one's hands of the conflict between the powerful and the powerless means to side with the powerful, not to be neutral. -Paulo Freire
Washing one's hands of the conflict between the powerful and the powerless means to side with the powerful, not to be neutral. -Paulo Freire, educator (1921-1997)
We aim above the mark to hit the mark. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
We aim above the mark to hit the mark. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
We allow our ignorance to prevail upon us and make us think we can survive alone, alone in patches, alone in groups, alone in races, even alone in genders. -Maya Angelou, poet (1928- )
We are all born into the world with nothing. Everything we acquire after that is profit. -Sam Ewing
We are all born originals - why is it so many of us die copies? -Edward Young, poet (1683-1765)
We are always paid for our suspicion by finding what we suspect. -Henry David Thoreau
We are born with our eyes closed and our mouths open, and we spend our whole lives trying to reverse that mistake of nature. -Dale E.Turner
We are each of us angels with only one wing, and we can only fly by embracing one another. -Luciano de Crescenzo
We are not going to be able to operate our Spaceship Earth successfully nor for much longer unless we see it as a whole spaceship and our fate as common. It has to be everybody or nobody. -Buckminster Fuller
We are not in a position in which we have nothing to work with. We already have capacities, talents, direction, missions, callings. -Abraham Maslow
We are not retreating - we are advancing in another direction. -General Douglas MacArthur (1880-1964)
We are only figments of God's imagination.
We are so fond of being out among nature, because it has no opinions about us. -Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche, philosopher (1844-1900)
We are so vain that we even care for the opinion of those we don't care for. -Marie Ebner von Eschenbach, writer (1830-1916)
We are usually convinced more easily by reasons we have found ourselves than by those which have occurred to others. -Blaise Pascal (1623-1662) [Pensees]
We call them dumb animals, and so they are, for they cannot tell us how they feel, but they do not suffer less because they have no words. -Anna Sewell, writer (1820-1878)
We can be knowledgeable with other men's knowledge but we cannot be wise with other men's wisdom. -Michel de Montaigne, essayist (1533-1592)
We can pay our debt to the past by putting the future in debt to ourselves. -John Buchan (1875-1940) Scottish author
We can put television in its proper light by supposing that Gutenberg's great invention had been directed at printing only comic books. -Robert M. Hutchins, educator (1899-1977)
We cannot be more sensitive to pleasure without being more sensitive to pain. -Alan Watts
We cannot glimpse the essential life of a caged animal, only the shadow of [her] former beauty. -Julia Allen Field [Reflections on the Death of an Elephant]
We choose our joys and sorrows long before we experience them. -Kahlil Gibran, mystic, poet, and artist (1883-1931)
We confess our little faults to persuade people that we have no large ones. -Francois de La Rochefoucauld, writer (1613-1680)
We could never learn to be brave and patient, if there were only joy in the world. -Helen Adams Keller (1880-1968)
We could never learn to be brave and patient, if there were only joy in the world. -Helen Keller
We despise all reverences and all objects of reverence which are outside the pale of our list of sacred things. And yet, with strange inconsistency, we are shocked when other people despise and defile the things which are holy to us. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910) 
We do not inherit the earth from our ancestors, we borrow it from our children. -Haida Indian Saying
We do not remember days; we remember moments.
We do not see things as they are, we see things as we are. -Talmudic Saying
We don't understand life any better at forty than at twenty, but we know it and admit it. -Jules Renard, writer (1864-1910
We grow tyrannical fighting tyranny. The most alarming spectacle today is not the spectacle of the atomic bomb in an unfederated world, it is the spectacle of the Americans beginning to accept the device of loyalty oaths and witchhunts, beginning to call anybody they don't like a Communist. -E.B. White, writer (1899-1985)
We hang the petty thieves and appoint the great ones to public office. -Aesop, Greek fabulist
We have enslaved the rest of the animal creation, and have treated our distant cousins in fur and feathers so badly that beyond doubt, if they were able to formulate a religion, they would depict the Devil in human form. -William R. Inge, clergyman, scholar, and author (1860-1954)
We have forty million reasons for failure, but not a single excuse.
We have just enough religion to make us hate but not enough to make us love one another. -Jonathan Swift, satirist (1667-1745)
We have met the enemy and he is us. -Walt Kelly, cartoonist (1913-1973)
We judge ourselves by what we feel capable of doing, while others judge us by what we have already done. -Henry Wadsworth Longfellow (1807-1882)
We know accurately only when we know little, with knowledge doubt increases. -Goethe (1749-1832)
We know the human brain is a device to keep the ears from grating on one another. -Peter de Vries
We know what we are, but know not what we may be. -Shakespeare
We learn from history that we do not learn anything from history.
We may pass violets looking for roses. We may pass contentment looking for victory. -Bern Williams
We meet no Stranger, but Ourself. -Emily Dickinson (1830-1886)
We must believe in luck. For how else can we explain the success of those we don't like? -Jean Cocteau, author and painter (1889-1963)
We must bring no Twilight/ to one who has lost her Dawn. -Emily Dickinson
We often borrow from our tomorrows to pay our debts to our yesterdays. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
We often forgive those who bore us, but we cannot forgive those whom we bore. -Francois, Duc de La Rochefoucauld (1613-1680) [Maxims]
We ought not to treat living creatures like shoes or household belongings, which when worn with use we throw away. -Plutarch, biographer (c. 46-120)
We require from buildings, as from men, two kinds of goodness: first, the doing their practical duty well: then that they be graceful and pleasing in doing it; which last is itself another form of duty. -John Ruskin, author, art critic, and social reformer (1819-1900)
We see but dimly through the mists and vapors; / Amid these earthly damps / What seem to us but sad, funeral tapers / May be heaven's distant lamps. -Longfellow (1807-1882)
We shall not cease from exploration / And the end of all our exploring / Will be to arrive where we started / And know the place for the first time. -T.S. Eliot
We should consider ourselves as spirits having a human experience, rather than humans having an occasional spiritual experience.
We should every night call ourselves to an account: What infirmity have I mastered today? what passions opposed? what temptation resisted? what virtue acquired? Our vices will abate of themselves if they be brought every day to the shrift. -Seneca (BCE 3-65 A.D.)
We should manage our fortunes as we do our health - enjoy it when good, be patient when it is bad, and never apply violent remedies except in an extreme necessity. -Francois de La Rochefoucauld, writer (1613-1680)
We should measure affection, not like youngsters by the ardour of its passion, but by its strength and constancy. -Marcus Tullius Cicero, statesman, orator, writer (106-43 BCE)
We succeed in enterprises which demand the positive qualities we possess, but we excel in those which can also make use of our defects. -Alexis de Tocqueville (1805-1859)
We think caged birds sing, when indeed they cry. -John Webster
We understand death for the first time when he puts his hand upon one whom we love. -Madame De Stael, writer (1766-1817)
We who lived in concentration camps can remember the men who walked through the huts comforting others, giving away their last piece of bread. They may have been few in number, but they offer sufficient proof that everything can be taken from a man but one thing: the last of the human freedoms -- to choose one's attitude in any given set of circumstances, to choose one's own way. -Viktor Frankl, author, neurologist and psychiatrist, Holocaust survivor (1905-1997)
We will cross out that bridge when we come back to it later.
We would often be ashamed of our finest actions if the world understood all the motives which produced them. -Duc de La Rochefoucauld, writer (1613-1680)
We'd all like a reputation for generosity and we'd all like to buy it cheap. -Mignon McLaughlin
We're in such a hurry most of the time we never get much chance to talk. The result is a kind of endless day-to-day shallowness, a monotony that leaves a person wondering years later where all the time went and sorry that it's all gone. -Robert M. Pirsig [Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance]
We've heard that a million monkeys at a million keyboards could produce the Complete Works of Shakespeare; now, thanks to the Internet, we know this is not true. -Robert Wilensky
Wear your learning, like your watch, in a private pocket, and do not pull it out and strike it merely to show you have one. If you are asked what o'clock it is, tell it, but do not proclaim it hourly and unasked, like the watchman. -Lord Chesterfield
Weather is a great bluffer. I guess the same is true of our human society - things can look dark, then a break shows in the clouds, and all is changed. -E.B. White
Well-timed silence is the most commanding expression. -Mark Helprin
Westheimer's Discovery: A couple of months in the laboratory can save a couple of hours in the library. -Frank H. Westheimer, chemistry professor (1912- )
What I do today is important because I am paying a day of my life for it. What I accomplish must be worthwhile because the price is high.
What a child doesn't receive he can seldom later give. -P.D. James, writer (1920- )
What a heavy oar the pen is, and what a strong current ideas are to row in! -Gustave Flaubert, novelist (1821-1880)
What a man says drunk he has thought sober. -Flemish proverb
What a strange illusion it is to suppose that beauty is goodness. -Leo Tolstoy, novelist and philosopher (1828-1910)
What a strange machine man is! You fill him with bread, wine, fish, and radishes, and out comes sighs, laughter, and dreams. -Nikos Kazantzakis, poet and novelist (1883-1957) 
What did the Floating Point say to the Integer? "Get Real!"
What government is the best? That which teaches us to govern ourselves. -Goethe (1749-1832)
What hunger is in relation to food, zest is in relation to life. -Bertrand Russell
What if there were no hypothetical situations? -Andrew Kohlsmith
What if this weren't a hypothetical question?
What is Art? It is the response of man's creative soul to the call of the Real. -Rabindranath Tagore, Indian Poet (1861-1941)
What is art but a way of seeing? -Thomas Berger, writer (1924- )
What is art? Nature concentrated. -Honore de Balzac, novelist (1799-1850)
What is called discretion in men is called cunning in animals. -Jean de la Fontaine, poet and fabulist (1621-1695)
What is done well is done quickly enough. -Augustus Caesar
What is laid down, ordered, factual is never enough to embrace the whole truth: life always spills over the rim of every cup. -Boris Pasternak
What is life? It is the flash of a firefly in the night. It is the breath of a buffalo in the wintertime. It is the little shadow which runs across the grass and loses itself in the sunset. -Crowfoot, Native American warrior and orator (1821-1890)
What is reading, but silent conversation. -Walter Savage Landor, writer (1775-1864)
What is the purpose of the giant sequoia tree? The purpose of the giant sequoia tree is to provide shade for the tiny titmouse. -Edward Abbey, naturalist and author (1927-1989)
What is to give light must endure burning. -Viktor Frankl, author, neurologist and psychiatrist, Holocaust survivor (1905-1997)
What other dungeon is so dark as one's own heart! What jailer is as inexorable as one's self! -Nathaniel Hawthorne, novelist and short-story writer (1804-1864)
What really flatters a man is that you think him worth flattering. -George Bernard Shaw
What sculpture is to a block of marble, education is to a human soul. -Joseph Addison, essayist and poet (1672-1719)
What soap is for the body, tears are for the soul. -Jewish proverb
What the Caterpillar calls the end of the world, the Master calls a butterfly. -Richard Bach, [Illusions]
What we hope ever to do with ease, we must learn first to do with diligence. -Samuel Johnson
What we say is important... for in most cases the mouth speaks what the heart is full of. -Jim Beggs
What we see depends on mainly what we look for. -John Lubbock
What wisdom can you find that is greater than kindness? -Jean Jacques Rousseau, philosopher and author (1712-1778)
What you are thunders so that I cannot hear what you say to the contrary. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
What you do is of little significance; but it is very important that you do it. -Mohandas K. Gandhi (1869-1948)
What you do speaks so loud that I cannot hear what you say. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
What you get out depends on what you put in; and as the grandest mill in the world will not extract wheat-flour from peascods, so pages of formulae will not get a definite result out of loose data. -Thomas Henry Huxley, biologist and writer (1825-1895)
Whatever games are played with us, we must play no games with ourselves, but deal in our privacy with the last honesty and truth. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Whatever happens, behave like you meant it to happen.
Whatever you do may seem insignificant, but it is most important that you do it. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (1869-1948)
When Alexander the Great visited Diogenes and asked whether he could do anything for the famed teacher, Diogenes replied: 'Only stand out of my light.' Perhaps some day we shall know how to heighten creativity. Until then, one of the best things we can do for creative men and women is to stand out of their light. -John W. Gardner, author and educator (1912-2002)
When I am working on a problem I never think about beauty. I only think about how to solve the problem. But when I have finished, if the solution is not beautiful, I know it is wrong. -R. Buckminster Fuller, engineer, designer, and architect (1895-1983)
When I approach a child, he inspires in me two sentiments; tenderness for what he is, and respect for what he may become. -Louis Pasteur, chemist and bacteriologist (1822-1895)
When I despair, I remember that all through history, the way of truth and love has always won. There have been murderers and tyrants, and for a time they can seem invincible. But in the end they always fall. Think of it, always. -Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (1869-1948)
When I eventually met Mr. Right I had no idea that his first name was Always. -Rita Rudner, comedienne (1955- )
When I have been asked during these last weeks who caused the riots and the killing in L.A., my answer has been direct and simple: Who is to blame for the riots? The rioters are to blame. Who is to blame for the killings? The killers are to blame. -Dan Quayle, Former U.S. Vice President (1947-)
When I have been asked during these last weeks who caused the riots and the killing in L.A., my answer has been direct and simple: Who is to blame for the riots? The rioters are to blame. Who is to blame for the killings? The killers are to blame. -US Vice President J. Danforth Quayle
When I hear somebody sigh, "Life is hard," I am always tempted to ask, "Compared to what?" -Sydney J. Harris
When I play with my cat, how do I know that she is not passing time with me rather than I with her? -Montaigne
When I play with my cat, who knows whether I do not make her more sport than she makes me? -Michel de Montaigne, essayist (1533-1592)
When I was a boy I was told that anybody could become President. Now I'm beginning to believe it. -Clarence Darrow, lawyer and author (1857-1938)
When I was a boy I was told that anybody could become President; I'm beginning to believe it. -Clarence Darrow
When I was a boy of fourteen, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be twenty-one, I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years. -Mark Twain
When Life does not find a singer to sing her heart she produces a philosopher to speak her mind. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
When a man is wrapped up in himself he makes a pretty small package. -John Ruskin
When a man wants to murder a tiger he calls it sport; when the tiger wants to murder him he calls it ferocity. -George Bernard Shaw, writer, Nobel laureate (1856-1950)
When a person can no longer laugh at himself, it is time for others to laugh at him. -Thomas Szasz
When a stupid man is doing something he is ashamed of, he always declares that it is his duty. -George Bernard Shaw
When a thing is funny, search it carefully for a hidden truth. -George Bernard Shaw, writer, Nobel laureate (1856-1950)
When a train goes through a tunnel and it gets dark, you don't throw away the ticket and jump off. You sit still and trust the engineer. -Corrie Ten Boom, author and Holocaust survivor
When an idea is wanting, a word can always be found to take its place. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (1749-1832)
When cryptography is outlawed, bayl bhgynjf jvyy unir cevinpl.
When eating bamboo sprouts, remember the man who planted them. -Chinese Proverb
When governments fear the people there is liberty. When the people fear the government there is tyranny. -Thomas Jefferson, third US president, architect and author (1743-1826)
When in doubt, do as doubters do.
When it is dark enough, you can see the stars. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
When looking for faults use a mirror, not a telescope.
When love and skill work together, expect a masterpiece. -John Ruskin, author, art critic, and social reformer (1819-1900)
When money speaks, the truth keeps silent. -Russian proverb
When nations grow old, the arts grow cold and commerce settles on every tree. -William Blake
When nations grow old, the arts grow cold and commerce settles on every tree. -William Blake, poet, engraver, and painter (1757-1827)
When old words die out on the tongue, new melodies break forth from the heart; and where the old tracks are lost, new country is revealed with its wonders. -Rabindranath Tagore, poet, philosopher, author, songwriter, painter, educator, composer, Nobel laureate (1861-1941)
When one door of happiness closes, another opens; but often we look so long at the closed door that we do not see the one which has been opened for us. -Helen Adams Keller (1880-1968)
When one door of happiness closes, another opens; but often we look so long at the closed door that we do not see the one which has been opened for us. -Helen Keller
When one has too great a dread of what is impending, one feels some relief when the trouble has come. -Joseph Joubert, essayist (1754-1824)
When people tell you how young you look, they are also telling you how old you are. -Cary Grant, actor (1904-1986)
When professors want your opinion, they'll give it to you.
When spiders unite, they can tie down a lion. -Ethiopian proverb
When the effective leader is finished with his work, the people say it happened naturally. -Lao-Tzu, Chinese philosopher (6th century BCE)
When the eyes say one thing and the tongue another, the practiced person relies on the language of the first. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
When the fox preaches, look to the geese. -German Proverb
When the gods wish to punish us, they answer our prayers. -Oscar Wilde, writer (1854-1900)
When the master has come to do everything through the slave, the slave becomes his master, since he cannot live without him. -George Bernard Shaw, writer, Nobel laureate (1856-1950)
When there's more sick ones than well ones, by golly the sick ones will lock the well ones up. -Eric F. Goldman [Crucial Decade]
When things go wrong - don't go wrong with them.
When things look dark, hold your head high so it can rain up your nose.
When two elephants fight it is the grass that gets trampled. -African proverb
When we are unable to find tranquility within ourselves, it is useless to seek it elsewhere. -Francois de La Rochefoucauld
When we ask advice, we are usually looking for an accomplice. -Marquis de la Grange
When we kill animals to eat them, they end up killing us because their flesh, which contains cholesterol and saturated fat, was never intended for human beings. -William Clifford Roberts, M.D., Editor-in-Chief of The American Journal of Cardiology
When we quit thinking primarily about ourselves and our own self- preservation, we undergo a truly heroic transformation of consciousness. -Joseph Campbell
When we quit thinking primarily about ourselves and our own self-preservation, we undergo a truly heroic transformation of consciousness. -Joseph Campbell
When we see men of a contrary character, we should turn inwards and examine ourselves. -Confucius (551-479 BCE)
When we seek to discover the best in others, we somehow bring out the best in ourselves. -William Arthur Ward
When we try to pick out anything by itself, we find it hitched to everything else in the universe. -John Muir, naturalist, explorer, and writer (1838-1914)
When will our consciences grow so tender that we will act to prevent human misery rather than avenge it? -Eleanor Roosevelt, diplomat and writer (1884-1962)
When women love us, they forgive us everything, even our crimes; when they do not love us, they give us credit for nothing, not even our virtues. -Honore de Balzac, novelist (1799-1850)
When you are a mother, you are never really alone in your thoughts....A mother always has to think twice, once for herself and once for her child. -Sophia Loren
When you are in it up to your ears, keep your mouth shut.
When you choose the lesser of two evils, always remember that it is still an evil. -Max Lerner
When you enjoy loving your neighbor it ceases to be a virtue. -Kahlil Gibran, mystic, poet, and artist (1883-1931)
When you have eliminated the impossible, whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth. -Arthur Conan Doyle (1859-1930)
When you have only two pennies left in the world, buy a loaf of bread with one, and a lily with the other. -Chinese proverb
When you have solved all mysteries of life you long for death, for it is but another mystery of life. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
When you have to make a choice and don't make it, that is in itself a choice. -William James, psychologist (1842-1910)
When you hire people that are smarter than you are, you prove you are smarter than they are. -R. H. Grant
When you live in the shadow of insanity, the appearance of another mind that thinks and talks as yours does is something close to a blessed event. -R. Pirsig
When you make your mark in the world, watch out for guys with erasers.
When you re-read a classic, you do not see more in the book than you did before; you see more in yourself than there was before. -Clifton Fadiman, editor and critic (1904-1999)
When you say that you agree to a thing in principle, you mean that you have not the slightest intention of carrying it out. -Otto von Bismarck
When you see a man led to prison say in your heart, "Mayhap he is escaping from a narrower prison." / And when you see a man drunken say in your heart, "Mayhap he sought escape from something still more unbeautiful." -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
When you sell a man a book you don't sell him just twelve ounces of paper and ink and glue--you sell him a whole new life. -Christopher Darlington Morley (1890-1957) [Parnassus on Wheels, 1917]
When you starve with a tiger, the tiger starves last. -Griffin's Thought
When you want to test the depths of a stream, don't use both feet. -Chinese Proverb
When you've seen one non-sequitur, the price of tea in China.
Whenever 'A' attempts by law to impose his moral standards upon 'B', 'A' is most likely a scoundrel. -H.L. Mencken, writer, editor, and critic (1880-1956)
Whenever books are burned men also in the end are burned. -Heinrich Heine
Whenever books are burned men also in the end are burned. -Heinrich Heine Almansor
Whenever people say 'We mustn't be sentimental,' you can take it they are about to do something cruel. And if they add 'We must be realistic,' they mean they are going to make money out of it. -Brigid Brophy
Whenever you commend, add your reasons for doing so; it is this which distinguishes the approbation of a man of sense from the flattery of sycophants and admiration of fools. -Richard Steele, author and editor (1672-1729)
Whenever you fall, pick something up. -Oswald Avery
Whenever you're called on to make up your mind, / and you're hampered by not having any, / the best way to solve the dilemma, you'll find, / is simply by spinning a penny. / No - not so that chance shall decide the affair / while you're passively standing there moping; / but the moment the penny is up in the air, / you suddenly know what you're hoping. -Piet Hein, poet and scientist (1905-1996)
Where is the wisdom we have lost in knowledge? Where is the knowledge we have lost in information? -T. S. Eliot (1888-1965)
Where it is a duty to worship the sun, it is pretty sure to be a crime to examine the laws of heat. -John Morley, statesman and writer (1838-1923)
Where so many hours have been spent in convincing myself that I am right, is there not some reason to fear I may be wrong? -Jane Austen
Where the spirit does not work with the hand there is no art. -Leonardo da Vinci
Where there is a will, there is an Inheritance Tax.
Wherever there is a human being, there is an opportunity for kindness. -Seneca
While grief is fresh, every attempt to divert only irritates. You must wait till it be digested, and then amusement will dissipate the remains of it. -Samuel Johnson, lexicographer (1709-1784)
While one person hesitates because he feels inferior, another is busy making mistakes and becoming superior. -Henry C. Link
While one person hesitates because he feels inferior, the other is busy making mistakes and becoming superior. -Henry C. Link
While we are asleep in this world, we are awake in another one. -Salvador Dali, painter (1904-1989)
Who can refute a sneer? -William Paley
Who is content with nothing possesses all things. -Nicolas Boileau-Despreaux, poet (1636-1711)
Who is more to be pitied, a writer bound and gagged by policemen or one living in perfect freedom who has nothing more to say? -Kurt Vonnegut, Jr. (1922-) [Bluebeard, 1987]
Who, being loved, is poor? -Oscar Wilde, writer (1854-1900)
Whoever heard of a hundred thousand animals rushing together to butcher each other, as men do everywhere [during war]?" -Desiderius Erasmus (1466-1536)
Whoever undertakes to set himself up as a judge of Truth and Knowledge is shipwrecked by the laughter of the gods. -Albert Einstein
Why do grandparents and grandchildren get along so well? They have the same enemy--the mother. -Claudette Colbert
Why does no one confess his sins? Because he is yet in them. It is for a man who has awoke from sleep to tell his dreams. -Lucius Annaeus Seneca, writer and philosopher (BCE 3-65 CE)
Why is it that we rejoice at a birth and grieve at a funeral? It is because we are not the person involved. -Mark Twain, author and humorist (1835-1910)
Why is it that you drive on the parkway, and park on the driveway?
Why is it when we talk to God we're praying -- but when God talks to us, we're schizophrenic? -Lily Tomlin
Why isn't "phonetic" spelled the way it's said?
Why kill time when one can employ it. -French proverb
Why should I fear death? If I am, death is not. If death is, I am not. Why should I fear that which cannot exist when I do? -Epicurus, philosopher (c. 341-270 BCE)
Why should we be in such desperate haste to succeed, and in such desperate enterprises? If a man does not keep pace with his companions, perhaps it is because he hears a different drummer. -Henry David Thoreau
Winter is an etching, spring a watercolor, summer an oil painting and autumn a mosaic of them all. -Stanley Horowitz
Wisdom ceases to be wisdom when it becomes too proud to weep, too grave to laugh, and too selfful to seek other than itself. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Wisdom sends us back to our childhood. -Pascal
Wise men talk because they have something to say; fools, because they have to say something. -Plato
Wise sayings often fall on barren ground; but a kind word is never thrown away. -Arthur Helps (1813-1875)
Wit is educated insolence. -Aristotle (384-322 BCE) [The Art of Rhetoric]
Wit makes its own welcome, and levels all distinctions. No dignity, no learning, no force of character, can make any stand against good wit. -Ralph Waldo Emerson (1803-1882)
With enough 'ifs' we could put Paris in a bottle. -French saying
With lies you may go ahead in the world, but you can never go back. -Russian Proverb
With time and patience the mulberry leaf becomes a silk gown. -Chinese proverb
Without darkness there are no dreams. -Karla Kuban, novelist
Won't you come into the garden? I would like my roses to see you. -Richard Brinsley Sheridan, playwright (1751-1816)
Words are like leaves; and where they most abound / Much fruit of sense beneath is rarely found. -Alexander Pope
Words are, of course, the most powerful drug used by mankind. -Kipling
Words without thoughts never to heaven go. -Shakespeare, poet and dramatist (1564-1616)
Work is of two kinds: first, altering the position of matter at or near the earth's surface relative to other matter; second, telling other people to do so. The first is unpleasant and ill-paid; the second is pleasant and highly paid. -Bertrand Russell, philosopher, mathematician, and author (1872-1970)
Work on good prose has three steps: a musical stage when it is composed, an architectonic one when it is built, and a textile one when it is woven. -Walter Benjamin, critic and philosopher (1892-1940)
Work saves us from three great evils: boredom, vice and need. -Voltaire, philosopher (1694-1778)
Work to become, not to acquire. -Elbert Hubbard
Works of imagination should be written in very plain language; the more purely imaginative they are the more necessary it is to be plain. -Samuel Taylor Coleridge, poet and philosopher (1772-1834)
Worry is interest paid on trouble before it comes due. -William R. Inge, clergyman, scholar, and author (1860-1954)
Worry is like a rocking chair - it gives you something to do but it doesn't get you anywhere. -Dorothy Galyean
Would you live with ease, do what you ought, and not what you please. -Benjamin Franklin
Write down the advice of him who loves you, though you like it not at present. -English Proverb
Write the bad things that are done to you in the sand, but write the good things that happen to you on a piece of marble. -Arabian wisdom
Writers, like teeth, are divided into incisors and grinders. -Walter Bagehot, economist and journalist (1826-1877)
Writing is like driving a car at night. You can only see as far as the headlights, but you make the whole trip that way. -E.L. Doctorow, writer (1931- )
Wrongs are often forgiven, but contempt never is. Our pride remembers it forever. -Lord Chesterfield, statesman and writer (1694-1773)
Yes, there is Nirvanah; it is in leading your sheep to a green pasture, and in putting your child to sleep, and in writing the last line of your poem. -Kahlil Gibran (1883-1931) [Sand and Foam]
Yes, you can be a dreamer and a doer too, if you will remove one word from your vocabulary: impossible. -H. Robert Schuller
Yesterday is a canceled check; tomorrow is a promissory note; today is the only cash you have. Spend it wisely.
You are never given a wish without also being given the power to make it true. You may have to work for it, however -Richard Bach
You are never too old to be what you might have been. -George Eliot (Mary Ann Evans), novelist (1819-1880)
You are not paranoid if they're really after you...
You become a champion by fighting one more round. When things are tough, you fight one more round. -James Corbett (Boxer)
You become writer by writing. It is a yoga. -R.K. Narayan, novelist (1906-2001)
You campaign in poetry. You govern in prose. -Mario M Cuomo, 52nd Governor of NY (1932- )
You can always get a good book out of a bad habit. -Oscar Levant
You can always spot a well informed man - his views are the same as yours. -Ilka Chase
You can complain because roses have thorns, or you can rejoice because thorns have roses. -Ziggy
You can discover more about a person in an hour of play than in a year of discussion. -Plato, philosopher (427-347 BCE)
You can discover what your enemy fears most by observing the means he uses to frighten you. -Eric Hoffer, philosopher and author (1902-1983)
You can lead a computer to the Superhighway but you can't make it think. -Des Waller
You can never solve a problem on the level on which it was created. -Albert Einstein, physicist, Nobel laureate (1879-1955)
You can no more win a war than you can win an earthquake. -Jeanette Rankin
You can preach a better sermon with your life than with your lips. -Oliver Goldsmith
You can sometimes count every orange on a tree but never all the trees in a single orange. -A.K. Ramanujan, poet (1929-1993)
You can't always get what you want. But if you try, sometimes you'll find what you need. -Rolling Stones
You can't always get what you want. But if you try, sometimes you'll get what you need.
You can't depend on your judgment when your imagination is out of focus. -Mark Twain
You can't direct the wind, but you can adjust your sails.
You can't have a better tomorrow if you are thinking about yesterday all the time. -Charles F. Kettering
You can't hear it, but the universe is laughing at you behind your back.
You can't say civilization isn't advancing, in every war they kill you in a new way. -Will Rogers, humorist (1879-1935)
You can't sit on the lid of progress. If you do, you will be blown to pieces. -Henry Kaiser
You can't turn back the clock. But you can wind it up again. -Bonnie Prudden, fitness trainer and author (1914- )
You can't wake a person who is pretending to be asleep. -Navajo Proverb
You cannot be lonely if you like the person you're alone with. -Wayne Dyer
You cannot depend on your eyes when your imagination is out of focus. -Mark Twain
You cannot do a kindness too soon, for you never know how soon it will be too late. -Ralph Waldo Emerson, writer and philosopher (1803-1882)
You cannot shake hands with a clenched fist. -Indira Gandhi 
You desire to know the art of living, my friend? It is contained in one phrase: make use of suffering. -Henri Frederic Amiel, philosopher and writer (1821-1881)
You don't have to fear defeat if you believe it may reveal powers that you didn't know you possessed. -Napoleon Hill
You give but little when you give of your possessions. It is when you give of yourself that you truly give. -Kahlil Gibran, mystic, poet and artist (1883-1931)
You have not converted a man because you have silenced him. -John Morley, statesman and writer (1838-1923)
You have reached the pinnacle of success as soon as you become uninterested in money, compliments, or publicity. -Thomas Wolfe, novelist (1900-1938)
You have to decide at the end of the day if you can live with yourself. -Princess Anne
You have to hold your audience in writing to the very end -- much more than in talking, when people have to be polite and listen to you. -Brenda Ueland, writer (1891-1985)
You know the oxygen masks on airplanes ? I don't think there's really any oxygen. I think they're just to muffle the screams. -Rita Rudner
You may call God love, you may call God goodness. But the best name for God is compassion. -Meister Eckhart, theologian (c. 1260-1327)
You may have a fresh start any moment you choose, for this thing we call failure' is not the falling down, but the staying down. -Mary Pickford
You must allow people to be right, because it consoles them for not being anything else. -Andre' Gide
You must be the change you wish to see in the world. -Mahatma Gandhi
You must have been warned against letting the golden hours slip by. Yes, but some of them are golden only because we let them slip by. -James M. Barrie
You must not lose faith in humanity. Humanity is an ocean; if a few drops of the ocean are dirty, the ocean does not become dirty. -Mohandas K. Gandhi (1869-1948)
You never know till you try to reach them how accessible men are; but you must approach each man by the right door. -Henry Ward Beecher, preacher and writer (1813-1887)
You put a baby in a crib with an apple and a rabbit. If it eats the rabbit and plays with the apple, I'll buy you a new car. -Harvey Diamond
You see things and say, "Why?" but I dream things that never were and say, "Why not?" -George Bernard Shaw
You simply *must* stop taking other people's advice.
You take your life in your own hands, and what happens? A terrible thing: no one to blame. -Erica Jong, writer (1942- )
You think your pains and heartbreaks are unprecedented in the history of the world, but then you read. It was books that taught me that the things that tormented me were the very things that connected me with all the people who were alive, or who have ever been alive. -James Baldwin, writer (1924-1987)
You train people how to treat you by how you treat yourself. -Martin Rutte
You will find as you look back upon your life that the moments when you have really lived are the moments when you have done things in a spirit of love.
You will find that silence or very gentle words are the most exquisite revenge for insult. -Judge Hall
You will soon break the bow if you keep it always stretched. -Phaedrus (fl. 25 A.D.)
You wish to see; listen. Hearing is a step toward Vision. -St. Bernard
You won't be happy with more until you're happy with what you've got. -Viki King
You've got to do your own growing, no matter how tall your grandfather was. -Irish Proverb
Your assumptions are your windows on the world. Scrub them off every once in a while, or the light won't come in. -Alan Alda, actor and director (1936-)
Your children need your presence more than your presents. -Jesse Jackson, clergyman and civil rights leader (1941- )
Your lucky number is 364958674928. Watch for it everywhere.
Your only obligation in any lifetime is to be true to yourself. Being true to anyone else or anything else is ... impossible. -Richard Bach, writer (1936- )
Your pain is the breaking of the shell that encloses your understanding. -Kahlil Gibran, mystic, poet, and artist (1883-1931)
Youth is the first victim of war - the first fruit of peace. It takes 20 years or more of peace to make a man; it takes only 20 seconds of war to destroy him. -Boudewijn I, King of Belgium (1934-1993)
`Automatic' simply means that you can't repair it yourself. -Mary H. Waldrip
apologize, v.i.: To lay the foundation for a future offence. -Ambrose Bierce, The Devil's Dictionary (1906)
critic, n. A person who boasts himself hard to please because nobody tries to please him. -Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914) [The Devil's Dictionary]
program (pro'-gram) [n] A magic spell cast over a computer allowing it to turn one's input into error messages.
program (pro'-gram) [vi] To engage in a pastime similar to banging one's head against a wall but with fewer opportunities for reward.
